
Leon Trotsky



IN DEFENSE OF MARXISM


(1939/1940)

------------------------------------------------------------------------

First Published: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENSE OF MARXISM, New York 1942.
Reprinted: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENCE OF MARXISM, London 1966.
eBook format: Kollektiv Yakov Perelman, from the edition available at
Trotsky Internet Archive in December 2013. Cover provided by Cm Nikas.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

  -   A Letter to James P. Cannon, (September 12, 1939)
       
  -   The USSR in War, (September 25, 1939) 
       
  -   A Letter to Sherman Stanley, (October 8, 1939) 
       
  -   Again and Once More Again on the Nature of the USSR, (October
      18, 1939) 
       
  -   The Referendum and Democratic Centralism, (October 21, 1939) 
       
  -   A Letter to Sherman Stanley, (October 22, 1939)
       
  -   A Letter to James P. Cannon, (October 28, 1939)
       
  -   A Letter to Max Shachtman, (November 6, 1939)
       
  -   A Letter to James P. Cannon, (December 15, 1939)
       
  -   A Petty-Bourgeois Opposition in the Socialist Workers Party,
      (December 15, 1939)
       
  -   A Letter to John G. Wright, (December 19, 1939)
       
  -   A Letter to Max Shachtman, (December 20, 1939)
       
  -   Four Letters to the National Committee Majority, (December 26-27,
      1939 and January 3-4, 1940)
       
  -   A Letter to Joseph Hansen, (January 5, 1940)
       
  -   An Open Letter to Comrade Burnham, (January 7, 1940)
       
  -   A Letter to James P. Cannon, (January 9, 1940)
       
  -   A Letter to Farrell Dobbs, (January 10, 1940)
       
  -   A Letter to John G. Wright, (January 13, 1940)
       
  -   A Letter to James P. Cannon, (January 16, 1940)
       
  -   A Letter to William F. Warde, (January 16, 1940)
       
  -   A Letter to Joseph Hansen, (January 18, 1940)
       
  -   From a Scratch – To the Danger of Gangrene, (January 24, 1940)
       
  -   A Letter to Martin Abern, (January 29, 1940)
       
  -   Two Letters to Albert Goldman, (February 10 and 19, 1940)
       
  -   Back to the Party, (February 21, 1940)
       
  -   “Science and Style”, (February 23, 1940)
       
  -   A Letter to James P. Cannon, (February 27, 1940)
       
  -   A Letter to Joseph Hansen, (February 29, 1940)
       
  -   Three Letters to Farrell Dobbs, (March 4 and April 4 & 16, 1940)
       
  -   Petty-Bourgeois Moralists and the Proletarian Party, (April
      23, 1940)
       
  -   Balance Sheet of the Finnish Events, (April 25, 1940)
       
  -   A Letter to James P. Cannon, (May 28, 1940)
       
  -   A Letter to Albert Goldman, (June 5, 1940)
       
  -   On the “Workers” Party, (August 7, 1940)
       
  -   A Letter to Albert Goldman, (August 9, 1940)
       
  -   A Letter to Chris Andrews, (August 17, 1940)
       



A LETTER TO JAMES P. CANNON [1]


 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

First Published: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENSE OF MARXISM, New York 1942.
Checked against: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENCE OF MARXISM, London 1966,
pp.1-2.
All footnotes stem from the latter edition.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

September 12, 1939

Dear Jim:

I am writing now a study on the social character of the USSR in
connection with the war question. The writing, with its translation,
will take at least one week more. The fundamental ideas are as follows:

1. Our definition of the USSR can be right or wrong, but I do not see
any reason to make our definition dependent on the German-Soviet pact.

2. The social character of the USSR is not determined by her friendship
with democracy or fascism. who adopts such a point of view becomes a
prisoner of the Stalinist conception of the People’s Front epoch.

3. Who says that the USSR is no more a degenerate workers’ state, but a
new social formation, should clearly say what he adds to our _political
conclusions_.

4. The USSR question cannot be isolated as unique from the whole
historic process of our times. either the Stalin state is a transitory
formation, it is a deformation of a workers’ state in a backward and
isolated state, or “bureaucratic collectivism” (Bruno R., _La
Bureaucratisation du Monde_, Paris 1939) is a new social formation,
which is replacing capitalism throughout the world (Stalinism, Fascism,
New Deals, etc.). The terminological experiments (workers’ state, not
workers’ state; class, not class; etc.) receive a sense only under this
historic aspect. who chooses the second alternative admits, openly or
silently, that all teh revolutionary potentialities of the world
proletariat are exhausted, that the socialist movement is bankrupt, and
that the old capitalism is transforming itself into “bureaucratic
collectivism” with a new exploiting class.

The tremendous importance of such a conclusion is self-explanatory. It
concedrns the whole fate of the world proletariat and mankind. Have we
the slightest right to induce ourselves by purely terminological
experiments in a new historic conception which occurs to be in an
absolute contradiction with our program, strategy and tactics? Such an
adventuristic jump would be doubly criminal now in view of the world war
when the perspective of the socialist revolution becomes an imminent
reality and when the case of the USSR will appear to everybody as a
transitorial episode in the process of world socialist revolution.

I write these lines in haste, which explains their insufficiency, but in
a week I hope to send you my more complete thesis.

Comradely greetings,
V.T.O. [_Leon Trotsky_] [2]

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. This letter was written by Trotsky in English.

2. Because of the conditions of his residence in the various countries
in which he lived after his exile, Trotsky often used pseudonyms in his
letters. His letters were frequently signed with the name of his English
secretary. – _Ed._



THE USSR IN WAR


 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Written: 25 September 1939.
Source: THE NEW INTERNATIONAL [New York], Vol.5 No.11, November 1939,
pp.325-332.
Translated: NEW INTERNATIONAL.
Reprinted: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENSE OF MARXISM, New York 1942.
British Edition: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENCE OF MARXISM, London 1966,
pp.3-26.
Transcription/HTML Markup: David Walters.
Proofread/Editing: Andy Pollack & Einde O’Callaghan.
Public Domain: Leon Trotsky Internet Archive 2005. This work is
completely free to copy and distribute.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The German Soviet Pact and the Character of the USSR

Is it possible after the conclusion of the German Soviet Pact to
consider the USSR a workers’ state? The future of the Soviet State has
again and again aroused discussion in our midst. Small wonder; we have
before us the first experiment in the workers’ state in history. Never
before and nowhere else has this phenomenon been available for analysis.
In the question of the social character of the USSR, mistakes commonly
flow, as we have previously stated, from replacing the historical fact
by the programmatic norm. Concrete fact departs from the norm. This does
not signify, however, that it has overthrown the norm; on the contrary,
it has reaffirmed it, from the negative side. The degeneration of the
first workers’ state, ascertained and explained by us, has only the more
graphically shown what the workers’ state should be, what it could and
would be under certain historical conditions. The contradiction between
the concrete fact and the norm constrains us not to reject the norm but,
on the contrary, to fight for it by means of the revolutionary road. The
program of the approaching revolution in the USSR is determined on the
one hand by our appraisal of the USSR, as an objective historical
_fact_, and on the other hand, by a _norm_ of the workers’ state. We do
not say: “Everything is lost, we must begin all over again.” We clearly
indicate those elements of the workers’ state which at the given stage
can be salvaged, preserved, and further developed.

Those who seek nowadays to prove that the Soviet-German pact changes our
appraisal of the Soviet State take their stand, in essence, on the
position of the Comintern – to put it more correctly, on yesterday’s
position of the Comintern. According to this logic, the historical
mission of the workers’ state is the struggle for imperialist democracy.
The “betrayal” of the democracies in favor of fascism divests the USSR
of its being considered a workers’ state. In point of fact, the signing
of the treaty with Hitler supplies only an extra gauge with which to
measure the degree of degeneration of the Soviet bureaucracy, and its
contempt for the international working class, including the Comintern,
but it does not provide any basis whatsoever for a reevaluation of the
sociological appraisal of the USSR

 

Are the Differences Political or Terminological?

Let us begin by posing the question of the nature of the Soviet state
not on the abstract sociological plane but on the plane of concrete
political tasks. Let us concede for the moment that the bureaucracy is a
new “class” and that the present regime in the USSR is a special system
of class exploitation. What new political conclusions follow for us from
these definitions? The Fourth International long ago recognized the
necessity of overthrowing the bureaucracy by means of a revolutionary
uprising of the toilers. Nothing else is proposed or can be proposed by
those who proclaim the bureaucracy to be an exploiting “class.” The goal
to be attained by the overthrow of the bureaucracy is the
reestablishment of the rule of the Soviets, expelling from them the
present bureaucracy. Nothing different can be proposed or is proposed by
the Leftist critics. [1] It is the task of the regenerated Soviets to
collaborate with the world revolution and the building of a socialist
society. The overthrow of the bureaucracy therefore presupposes the
preservation of state property and of planned economy. Herein is the nub
of the whole problem.

Needless to say, the distribution of productive forces among the various
branches of economy and generally the entire content of the plan will be
drastically changed when this plan is determined by the interests not of
the bureaucracy but of the producers themselves. But inasmuch as the
question of overthrowing the parasitic oligarchy still remains linked
with that of preserving the nationalized (state) property, we called the
future revolution _political_. Certain of our critics (Ciliga, Bruno,
and others) want, come what may, to call the future revolution _social_.
Let us grant this definition. What does it alter in essence? To those
tasks of the revolution which we have enumerated it adds nothing
whatsoever.

Our critics as a rule take the facts as we long ago established them.
They add absolutely nothing essential to the appraisal either of the
position of the bureaucracy and the toilers, or of the role of the
Kremlin on the international arena. In all these spheres, not only do
they fail to challenge our analysis, but on the contrary they base
themselves completely upon it and even restrict themselves entirely to
it. The sole accusation they bring against us is that we do not draw the
necessary “conclusions.” Upon analysis it turns out, however, that these
conclusions are of a purely terminological character. Our critics refuse
to call the degenerated workers’ state – a workers’ state. They demand
that the totalitarian bureaucracy be called a ruling class. The
revolution against this bureaucracy they propose to consider not
political but social. Were we to make them these terminological
concessions, we would place our critics in a very difficult position,
inasmuch as they themselves would not know what to do with their purely
verbal victory.

 

Let Us Check Ourselves Once Again

It would therefore be a piece of monstrous nonsense to split with
comrades who on the question of the sociological nature of the USSR have
an opinion different from ours, insofar as they solidarize with us in
regard to the political tasks. But on the other hand, it would be
blindness on our part to ignore purely theoretical and even
terminological differences, because in the course of further development
they may acquire flesh and blood and lead to diametrically opposite
political conclusions. Just as a tidy housewife never permits an
accumulation of cobwebs and garbage, just so a revolutionary party
cannot tolerate lack of clarity, confusion and equivocation. Our house
must be kept clean!

Let me recall for the sake of illustration, the question of Thermidor.
For a long time we asserted that Thermidor in the USSR was only being
prepared but had not yet been consummated. Later, investing the analogy
to Thermidor with a more precise and well deliberated character, we came
to the conclusion that Thermidor had already taken place long ago. This
open rectification of our own mistake did not introduce the slightest
consternation in our ranks. Why? Because the _essence_ of the processes
in the Soviet Union was appraised identically by all of us, as we
jointly studied day by day the growth of reaction. For us it was only a
question of rendering more precise an historical analogy, nothing more.
I hope that still today despite the attempt of some comrades to uncover
differences on the question of the “defense of the USSR” – with which we
shall deal presently – we shall succeed by means of simply rendering our
own ideas more precise to preserve unanimity on the basis of the program
of the Fourth International.

 

Is It a Cancerous Growth or a New Organ?

Our critics have more than once argued that the present Soviet
bureaucracy bears very little resemblance to either the bourgeois or
labor bureaucracy in capitalist society; that to a far greater degree
than fascist bureaucracy it represents a new and much more powerful
social formation. This is quite correct and we have never closed our
eyes to it. But if we consider the Soviet bureaucracy a “class,” then we
are compelled to state immediately that this class does not at all
resemble any of those propertied classes known to us in the past: our
gain consequently is not great. We frequently call the Soviet
bureaucracy a caste, underscoring thereby its shut in character, its
arbitrary rule, and the haughtiness of the ruling stratum who consider
that their progenitors issued from the divine lips of Brahma whereas the
popular masses originated from the grosser portions of his anatomy. But
even this definition does not of course possess a strictly scientific
character. Its relative superiority lies in this, that the make shift
character of the term is clear to everybody, since it would enter
nobody’s mind to identify the Moscow oligarchy with the Hindu caste of
Brahmins. The old sociological terminology did not and could not prepare
a name for a new social event which is in process of evolution
(degeneration) and which has not assumed stable forms. All of us,
however, continue to call the Soviet bureaucracy a bureaucracy, not
being unmindful of its historical peculiarities. In our opinion this
should suffice for the time being.

Scientifically and politically – and not purely terminologically – the
question poses itself as follows: does the bureaucracy represent a
temporary growth on a social organism or has this growth already become
transformed into an historically indispensable organ? Social
excrescences can be the product of an “accidental” (_i.e._ temporary and
extraordinary) enmeshing of historical circumstances. A social organ
(and such is every class, including an exploiting class) can take shape
only as a result of the deeply rooted inner needs of production itself.
If we do not answer this question, then the entire controversy will
degenerate into sterile toying with words.

The Early Degeneration of the Bureaucracy

The historical justification for every ruling class consisted in this –
that the system of exploitation it headed raised the development of the
productive forces to a new level. Beyond the shadow of a doubt, the
Soviet regime gave a mighty impulse to economy. But the source of this
impulse was the nationalization of the means of production and the
planned beginnings, and by no means the fact that the bureaucracy
usurped command over the economy. On the contrary, bureaucratism, as a
system, became the worst brake on the technical and cultural development
of the country. This was veiled for a certain time by the fact that
Soviet economy was occupied for two decades with transplanting and
assimilating the technology and organization of production in advanced
capitalist countries. The period of borrowing and imitation still could,
for better or for worse, be accommodated to bureaucratic automatism,
i.e., the suffocation of all initiative and all creative urge. But the
higher the economy rose, the more complex its requirements became, all
the more unbearable became the obstacle of the bureaucratic régime. The
constantly sharpening contradiction between them leads to uninterrupted
political convulsions, to systematic annihilation of the most
outstanding creative elements in all spheres of activity. Thus, before
the bureaucracy could succeed in exuding from itself a “ruling class,”
it came into irreconcilable contradiction with the demands of
development. The explanation for this is to be found precisely in the
fact that the bureaucracy is not the bearer of a new system of economy
peculiar to itself and impossible without itself, but is a parasitic
growth on a workers’ state.

 

The Conditions for the Omnipotence and Fall of the Bureaucracy

The Soviet oligarchy possesses all the vices of the old ruling classes
but lacks their historical mission. In the bureaucratic degeneration of
the Soviet State it is not the general laws of modern society from
capitalism to socialism which find expression but a special exceptional
and temporary refraction of these laws under the conditions of a
backward revolutionary country in a capitalist environment. The scarcity
in consumers’ goods and the universal struggle to obtain them generate a
policeman who arrogates to himself the function of distribution. Hostile
pressure from without imposes on the policeman the role of “defender” of
the country, endows him with national authority, and permits him doubly
to plunder the country.

Both conditions for the omnipotence of the bureaucracy – the
backwardness of the country and the imperialist environment – bear,
however, a temporary and transitional character and must disappear with
the victory of the world revolution. Even bourgeois economists have
calculated that with a planned economy it would be possible to raise the
national income of the United States rapidly to 200 billion dollars a
year and thus assure the entire population not only the satisfaction of
its primary needs but real comforts. On the other hand, the world
revolution would do away with the danger from without as the
supplementary cause of bureaucratization. The elimination of the need to
expend an enormous share of the national income on armaments would raise
even higher the living and cultural level of the masses. In these
conditions the need for a policeman distributor would fall away by
itself. Administration as a gigantic cooperative would very quickly
supplant state power. There would be no room for a new ruling class or
for a new exploiting regime, located between capitalism and socialism.

 

And What if the Socialist Revolution Is Not Accomplished?

The disintegration of capitalism has reached extreme limits, likewise
the disintegration of the old ruling class. The further existence of
this system is impossible. The productive forces must be organized in
accordance with a plan. But who will accomplish this task – the
proletariat, or a new ruling class of “commissars” – politicians,
administrators and technicians? Historical experience bears witness, in
the opinion of certain rationalizers that one cannot entertain hope in
the proletariat. The proletariat proved “incapable” of averting the last
imperialist war although the material prerequisites for a socialist
revolution already existed at that time. The successes of Fascism after
the war were once again the consequence of the “incapacity” of the
proletariat to lead capitalist society out of the blind alley. The
bureaucratization of the Soviet State was in its turn the consequence of
the “incapacity” of the proletariat itself to regulate society through
the democratic mechanism. The Spanish revolution was strangled by the
Fascist and Stalinist bureaucracies before the very eyes of the world
proletariat. Finally, last link in this chain is the new imperialist
war, the preparation of which took place quite openly, with complete
impotence on the part of the world proletariat. If this conception is
adopted, that is, if it is acknowledged that the proletariat does not
have the forces to accomplish the socialist revolution, then the urgent
task of the statification of the productive forces will obviously be
accomplished by somebody else. By whom? By a new bureaucracy, which will
replace the decayed bourgeoisie as a new ruling class on a world scale.
That is how the question is beginning to be posed by those “leftists”
who do not rest content with debating over words.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The Present War and the Fate of Modern Society

By the very march of events this question is now posed very concretely.
The second world war has begun. It attests incontrovertibly to the fact
that society can no longer live on the basis of capitalism. Thereby it
subjects the proletariat to a new and perhaps decisive test.

If this war provokes, as we firmly believe, a proletarian revolution, it
must inevitably lead to the overthrow of the bureaucracy in the USSR and
regeneration of Soviet democracy on a far higher economic and cultural
basis than in 1918. In that case the question as to whether the
Stalinist bureaucracy was a “class” or a growth on the workers’ state
will be automatically solved. To every single person it will become
clear that in the process of the development of the world revolution the
Soviet bureaucracy was only an _episodic_ relapse.

If, however, it is conceded that the present war will provoke not
revolution but a decline of the proletariat, then there remains another
alternative: the further decay of monopoly capitalism, its further
fusion with the state and the replacement of democracy wherever it still
remained by a totalitarian regime. The inability of the proletariat to
take into its hands the leadership of society could actually lead under
these conditions to the growth of a new exploiting class from the
Bonapartist fascist bureaucracy. This would be, according to all
indications, a regime of decline, signalizing the eclipse of
civilization.

An analogous result might occur in the event that the proletariat of
advanced capitalist countries, having conquered power, should prove
incapable of holding it and surrender it, as in the USSR, to a
privileged bureaucracy. Then we would be compelled to acknowledge that
the reason for the bureaucratic relapse is rooted not in the
backwardness of the country and not in the imperialist environment but
in the congenital incapacity of the proletariat to become a ruling
class. Then it would be necessary in retrospect to establish that in its
fundamental traits the present USSR was the precursor of a new
exploiting régime on an international scale.

We have diverged very far from the terminological controversy over the
nomenclature of the Soviet state. But let our critics not protest: only
by taking the necessary historical perspective can one provide himself
with a correct judgment upon such a question as the replacement of one
social régime by another. The historic alternative, carried to the end,
is as follows: either the Stalin régime is an abhorrent relapse in the
process of transforming bourgeois society into a socialist society, or
the Stalin régime is the first stage of a new exploiting society. If the
second prognosis proves to be correct, then, of course, the bureaucracy
will become a new exploiting class. However onerous the second
perspective may be, if the world proletariat should actually prove
incapable of fulfilling the mission placed upon it by the course of
development, nothing else would remain except openly to recognize that
the socialist program based on the internal contradictions of capitalist
society, ended as a Utopia. It is self evident that a new “minimum”
program would be required for the defense of the interests of the slaves
of the totalitarian bureaucratic society.

But are there such incontrovertible or even impressive objective data as
would compel us today to renounce the prospect of the socialist
revolution? That is the whole question.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The Theory of “Bureaucratic Collectivism”

Shortly after the assumption of power by Hitler, a German “left
communist,” Hugo Urbahns, came to the conclusion that in place of
capitalism a new historical era of “state capitalism” was impending. The
first examples of this regime he named as Italy, the USSR, Germany.
Urbahns, however, did not draw the political conclusions of his theory.
Recently, an Italian “left communist,” Bruno R., who formerly adhered to
the Fourth International, came to the conclusion that “bureaucratic
collectivism” was about to replace capitalism. (Bruno R. – LA
BUREAUCRATISME DU MONDE, Paris 1939, 350 pp.) The new bureaucracy is a
class, its relations to the toilers is collective exploitation, the
proletarians are transformed into the slaves of totalitarian exploiters.

Bruno R. brackets together planned economy in the USSR, Fascism,
National Socialism, and Roosevelt’s “New Deal.” All these regimes
undoubtedly possess common traits, which in the last analysis are
determined by the collectivist tendencies of modern economy. Lenin even
prior to the October Revolution formulated the main peculiarities of
imperialist capitalism as follows: Gigantic concentration of productive
forces, the heightening fusion of monopoly capitalism with the state, an
organic tendency toward naked dictatorship as a result of this fusion.
The traits of centralization and collectivization determine both the
politics of revolution and the politics of counter revolution; but this
by no means signifies that it is possible to equate revolution,
Thermidor, fascism, and American “reformism.” Bruno has caught on to the
fact that the tendencies of collectivization assume, as a result of the
political prostration of the working class, the form of “bureaucratic
collectivism.” The phenomenon in itself is incontestable. But where are
its limits, and what is its historical weight? What we accept as the
deformity of a transitional period, the result of the unequal
development of multiple factors in the social process, is taken by Bruno
R. for an independent social formation in which the bureaucracy is the
ruling class. Bruno R. in any case has the merit of seeking to transfer
the question from the charmed circle of terminological copy book
exercises to the plane of major historical generalizations. This makes
it all the easier to disclose his mistake.

Like many ultra-lefts, Bruno R. identifies in essence Stalinism with
Fascism. On the one side the Soviet bureaucracy has adopted the
political methods of Fascism; on the other side the Fascist bureaucracy,
which still confines itself to “partial” measures of state intervention,
is heading toward and will soon reach complete statification of economy.
The first assertion is absolutely correct. But Bruno’s assertion that
fascist “anti capitalism” is capable of arriving at the expropriation of
the bourgeoisie is completely erroneous. “Partial” measures of state
intervention and of nationalization in reality differ from planned state
economy just as reforms differ from revolution. Mussolini and Hitler are
only “coordinating” the interests of the property owners and
“regulating” capitalist economy, and, moreover, primarily for war
purposes. The Kremlin oligarchy is something else again: it has the
opportunity of directing economy as a body only owing to the fact that
the working class of Russia accomplished the greatest overturn of
property relations in history. This difference must not be lost sight
of.

But even if we grant that Stalinism and Fascism from opposite poles will
some day arrive at one and the same type of exploitive society
(“Bureaucratic Collectivism” according to Bruno R.’s terminology) this
still will not lead humanity out of the blind alley. The crisis of the
capitalist system is produced not only by the reactionary role of
private property but also by the no less reactionary role of the
national state. Even if the various fascist governments did succeed in
establishing a system of planned economy at home then, aside from the,
in the long run, inevitable revolutionary movements of the proletariat
unforeseen by any plan, the struggle between the totalitarian states for
world domination would be continued and even intensified. Wars would
devour the fruits of planned economy and destroy the bases of
civilization. Bertrand Russell thinks, it is true, that some victorious
state may, as a result of the war, unify the entire world in a
totalitarian vise. But even if such a hypothesis should be realized,
which is highly doubtful, military “unification” would have no greater
stability than the Versailles treaty. National uprisings and
pacifications would culminate in a new world war, which would be the
grave of civilization. Not our subjective wishes but the objective
reality speaks for it, that the only way out for humanity is the world
socialist revolution. The alternative to it is the relapse into
barbarism.

 

Proletariat and its Leadership

We shall very soon devote a separate article to the question of the
relation between the class and its leadership. We shall confine
ourselves here to the most indispensable. Only vulgar “Marxists” who
take it that politics is a mere and direct “reflection” of economics,
are capable of thinking that leadership reflects the class directly and
simply. In reality leadership, having risen above the oppressed class,
inevitably succumbs to the pressure of the ruling class. The leadership
of the American trade unions, for instance, “reflects” not so much the
proletariat, as the bourgeoisie. The selection and education of a truly
revolutionary leadership, capable of withstanding the pressure of the
bourgeoisie, is an extraordinarily difficult task. The dialectics of the
historic process expressed itself most brilliantly in the fact that the
proletariat of the most backward country, Russia, under certain historic
conditions, has put forward the most farsighted and courageous
leadership. On the contrary, the proletariat in the country of the
oldest capitalist culture, Great Britain, has even today the most dull
witted and servile leadership.

The crisis of capitalist society which assumed an open character in
July, 1914, from the very first day of the war produced a sharp crisis
in the proletarian leadership. During the 25 years that have elapsed
since that time, the proletariat of the advanced capitalist countries
has not yet created a leadership that could rise to the level of the
tasks of our epoch. The experience of Russia testifies, however, that
such a leadership can be created. (This does not mean, of course, that
it will be immune to degeneration.) The question consequently stands as
follows: Will objective historical necessity in the long run cut a path
for itself in the consciousness of the vanguard of the working class;
that is, in the process of this war and those profound shocks which it
must engender will a genuine revolutionary leadership be formed capable
of leading the proletariat to the conquest of power?

The Fourth International has replied in the affirmative to this
question, not only through the text of its program, but also through the
very fact of its existence. All the various types of disillusioned and
frightened representatives of pseudo-Marxism proceed _on the contrary_
from the assumption that the bankruptcy of the leadership only
“reflects” the incapacity of the proletariat to fulfill its
revolutionary mission. Not all our opponents express this thought
clearly, but all of them – ultra-lefts, centrists, anarchists, not to
mention Stalinists and social democrats – shift the responsibility for
the defeats from themselves to the shoulders of the proletariat. None of
them indicate under precisely what conditions the proletariat will be
capable of accomplishing the socialist overturn.

If we grant as true that the cause of the defeats is rooted in the
social qualities of the proletariat itself then the position of modern
society will have to be acknowledged as hopeless. Under conditions of
decaying capitalism the proletariat grows neither numerically nor
culturally. There are no grounds, therefore, for expecting that it will
sometime rise to the level of the revolutionary tasks. Altogether
differently does the case present itself to him who has clarified in his
mind the profound antagonism between the organic, deep going,
insurmountable urge of the toiling masses to tear themselves free from
the bloody capitalist chaos, and the conservative, patriotic, utterly
bourgeois character of the outlived labor leadership. We must choose one
of these two irreconcilable conceptions.

 

Totalitarian Dictatorship – A Condition of Acute Crisis and Not a Stable Regime

The October Revolution was not an accident. It was forecast long in
advance. Events confirmed this forecast. The degeneration does not
refute the forecast, because Marxists never believed that an isolated
workers’ state in Russia could maintain itself indefinitely. True
enough, we expected the wrecking of the Soviet State, rather than its
degeneration; to put it more correctly, we did not sharply differentiate
between those two possibilities. But they do not at all contradict each
other. Degeneration must inescapably end at a certain stage in downfall.

A totalitarian régime, whether of Stalinist or Fascist type, by its very
essence can be only a temporary transitional régime. Naked dictatorship
in history has generally been the product and the symptom of an
especially severe social crisis, and not at all of a stable régime.
Severe crisis cannot be a permanent condition of society. A totalitarian
state is capable of suppressing social contradictions during a certain
period, but it is incapable of perpetuating itself. The monstrous purges
in the USSR are most convincing testimony of the fact that Soviet
society organically tends toward ejection of the bureaucracy.

It is an astonishing thing that Bruno R. sees precisely in the Stalinist
purges proof of the fact that the bureaucracy has become a ruling class,
for in his opinion only a ruling class is capable of measures on so
large a scale. [2] He forgets however that Czarism, which was not a
“class,” also permitted itself rather large scale measures in purges and
moreover precisely in the period when it was nearing its doom.
Symptomatic of his oncoming death agony, by the sweep and monstrous
fraudulence of his purge, Stalin testifies to nothing else but the
incapacity of the bureaucracy to transform itself into a stable ruling
class. Might we not place ourselves in a ludicrous position if we
affixed to the Bonapartist oligarchy the nomenclature of a new ruling
class just a few years or even a few months prior to its inglorious
downfall? Posing this question clearly should alone in our opinion
restrain the comrades from terminological experimentation and overhasty
generalizations.

 

The Orientation Towards World Revolution and the Regeneration of the USSR

A quarter of a century proved too brief a span for the revolutionary
rearming of the world proletarian vanguard, and too long a period for
preserving the Soviet system intact in an isolated backward country.
Mankind is now paying for this with a new imperialist war; but the basic
task of our epoch has not changed, for the simple reason that it has not
been solved. A colossal asset in the last quarter of a century and a
priceless pledge for the future is constituted by the fact that one of
the detachments of the world proletariat was able to demonstrate in
action how the task must be solved.

The second imperialist war poses the unsolved task on a higher
historical stage. It tests anew not only the stability of the existing
regimes but also the ability of the proletariat to replace them. The
results of this test will undoubtedly have a decisive significance for
our appraisal of the modern epoch as the epoch of proletarian
revolution. If contrary to all probabilities the October Revolution
fails during the course of the present war, or immediately thereafter,
to find its continuation in any of the advanced countries; and if, on
the contrary, the proletariat is thrown back everywhere and on all
fronts – then we should doubtlessly have to pose the question of
revising our conception of the present epoch and its driving forces. In
that case it would be a question not of slapping a copy book label on
the USSR or the Stalinist gang but of reevaluating the world historical
perspective for the next decades if not centuries: Have we entered the
epoch of social revolution and socialist society, or on the contrary the
epoch of the declining society of totalitarian bureaucracy?

The twofold error of schematists like Hugo Urbahns and Bruno R.
consists, first, in that they proclaim this latter régime as having been
already finally installed; secondly, in that they declare it a prolonged
transitional state of society between capitalism and socialism. Yet it
is absolutely self-evident that if the international proletariat, as a
result of the experience of our entire epoch and the current new war
proves incapable of becoming the master of society, this would signify
the foundering of all hope for a socialist revolution, for it is
impossible to expect any other more favorable conditions for it; in any
case no one foresees them now, or is able to characterize them. Marxists
do not have the slightest right (if disillusionment and fatigue are not
considered “rights”) to draw the conclusion that the proletariat has
forfeited its revolutionary possibilities and must renounce all
aspirations to hegemony in an era immediately ahead. Twenty-five years
in the scales of history, when it is a question of profoundest changes
in economic and cultural systems, weigh less than an hour in the life of
man. What good is the individual, who because of empirical failures in
the course of an hour or a day renounces a goal that he set for himself
on the basis of the experience and analysis of his entire previous
lifetime? In the years of darkest Russian reaction (1907 to 1917) we
took as our starting point those revolutionary possibilities which were
revealed by the Russian proletariat in 1905. In the years of world
reaction we must proceed from those possibilities which the Russian
proletariat revealed in 1917. The Fourth International did not by
accident call itself the world party of the socialist revolution. Our
road is not to be changed. We steer our course toward the world
revolution and by virtue of this very fact toward the regeneration of
the USSR as a worker’s state.

 

Foreign Policy is the Continuation of Domestic Policy

What do we defend in the USSR? Not that in which it resembles the
capitalist countries but precisely that in which it differs from them.
In Germany also we advocate an uprising against the ruling bureaucracy,
but only in order immediately to overthrow capitalist property. In the
USSR the overthrow of the bureaucracy is indispensable for the
preservation of state property. Only in this sense do we stand for the
defense of the USSR

There is not one among us who doubts that the Soviet workers should
defend the state property, not only against the parasitism of the
bureaucracy, but also against the tendencies toward private ownership,
for example, on the part of the Kolkhoz aristocracy. But after all,
foreign policy is the continuation of policy at home. If in domestic
policy we correlated defense of the conquests of the October Revolution
with irreconcilable struggle against the bureaucracy, then we must do
the same thing in foreign policy as well. To be sure, Bruno R.
proceeding from the fact that “bureaucratic collectivism” has already
been victorious all along the line, assures us that no one threatens
state property, because Hitler (and Chamberlain?) is as much interested,
you see, in preserving it as Stalin. Sad to say, Bruno R.’s assurances
are frivolous. In event of victory Hitler will in all probability begin
by demanding the return to German capitalists of all the property
expropriated from them; then he will secure a similar restoration of
property for the English, the French, and the Belgians so as to reach an
agreement with them at the expense of the USSR; finally, he will make
Germany the contractor of the most important state enterprises in the
USSR in the interests of the German military machine. Right now Hitler
is the ally and friend of Stalin; but should Hitler, with the aid of
Stalin, come out victorious on the Western Front, he would on the morrow
turn his guns against the USSR. Finally Chamberlain, too, in similar
circumstances would act no differently from Hitler.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The Defense of the USSR and the Class Struggle

Mistakes on the question of defense of the USSR most frequently flow
from an incorrect understanding of the methods of “defense”. Defense of
the USSR does not at all mean rapprochement with the Kremlin
bureaucracy, the acceptance of its politics, or a conciliation with the
politics of her allies. In this question, as in all others, we remain
completely on the ground of the international class struggle.

In the tiny French periodical, QUE FAIRE, it was recently stated that
inasmuch as the “Trotskyites” are defeatists in relation to France and
England they are therefore defeatists also in relation to the USSR. In
other words: If you want to defend the USSR you must stop being
defeatists in relation to her imperialist allies. QUE FAIRE calculated
that the “democracies” would be the allies of the USSR.

What these sages will say now we don’t know. But that is hardly
important, for their very method is rotten. To renounce defeatism in
relation to that imperialist camp to which the USSR adheres today or
might adhere tomorrow is to push the workers of the enemy camp to the
side of their government; it means to renounce defeatism in general. The
renunciation of defeatism under the conditions of imperialist war which
is tantamount to the rejection of the socialist revolution – rejection
of revolution in the name of “defense of the USSR” – would sentence the
USSR to final decomposition and doom.

“Defense of the USSR”, as interpreted by the Comintern, like yesterday’s
“struggle against fascism” is based on renunciation of independent class
politics. The proletariat is transformed – for various reasons in
varying circumstances, but always and invariably – into an auxiliary
force of one bourgeois camp against another. In contradistinction to
this, some of our comrades say: Since we do not want to become tools of
Stalin and his allies we therefore renounce the defense of the USSR. But
by this they only demonstrate that their understanding of “defense”
coincides essentially with the understanding of the opportunists; they
do not think in terms of the independent politics of the proletariat. As
a matter of fact, we defend the USSR as we defend the colonies, as we
solve all our problems, not by supporting some imperialist governments
against others, but by the method of international class struggle in the
colonies as well as in the metropolitan centers.

We are not a government party; we are the party of irreconcilable
opposition, not only in capitalist countries but also in the USSR. Our
tasks, among them the “defense of the USSR”, we realize not through the
medium of bourgeois governments and not even through the government of
the USSR, but exclusively through the education of the masses through
agitation, through explaining to the workers what they should defend and
what they should overthrow. Such a “defense” cannot give immediate
miraculous results. But we do not even pretend to be miracle workers. As
things stand, we are a revolutionary minority. Our work must be directed
so that the workers on whom we have influence should correctly appraise
events, not permit themselves to be caught unawares, and prepare the
general sentiment of their own class for the revolutionary solution of
the tasks confronting us.

The defense of the USSR coincides for us with the preparation of world
revolution. Only those methods are permissible which do not conflict
with the interests of the revolution. The defense of the USSR is related
to the world socialist revolution as a tactical task is related to a
strategic one. A tactic is subordinated to a strategic goal and in no
case can be in contradiction to the latter.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The Question of Occupied Territories

As I am writing these lines the question of the territories occupied by
the Red Army still remains obscure. The cable dispatches contradict each
other, since both sides lie a great deal; but the actual relationships
on the scene are no doubt still extremely unsettled. Most of the
occupied territories will doubtlessly become part of the USSR in what
form? Let us for a moment conceive that in accordance with the treaty
with Hitler, the Moscow government leaves untouched the rights of
private property in the occupied areas and limits itself to “control”
after the Fascist pattern. Such a concession would have a deep going
principled character and might become a starting point for a new chapter
in the history of the Soviet regime: and consequently a starting point
for a new appraisal on our part of the nature of the Soviet state.

It is more likely, however, that in the territories scheduled to become
a part of the USSR, the Moscow government will carry through the
expropriation of the large landowners and statification of the means of
production. This variant is most probable not because the bureaucracy
remains true to the socialist program but because it is neither desirous
nor capable of sharing the power, and the privileges the latter entails,
with the old ruling classes in the occupied territories. Here an analogy
literally offers itself. The first Bonaparte halted the revolution by
means of a military dictatorship. However, when the French troops
invaded Poland, Napoleon signed a decree: “Serfdom is abolished.” This
measure was dictated not by Napoleon’s sympathies for the peasants, nor
by democratic principles but rather by the fact that the Bonapartist
dictatorship based itself not on feudal, but on bourgeois property
relations. Inasmuch as Stalin’s Bonapartist dictatorship bases itself
not on private but on state property, the invasion of Poland by the Red
Army should, in the nature of the case, result in the abolition of
private capitalist property, so as thus to bring the regime of the
occupied territories into accord with the regime of the USSR.

This measure, revolutionary in character – ”the expropriation of the
expropriators” – is in this case achieved in a military bureaucratic
fashion. The appeal to independent activity on the part of the masses in
the new territories – and without such an appeal, even if worded with
extreme caution it is impossible to constitute a new regime – will on
the morrow undoubtedly be suppressed by ruthless police measures in
order to assure the preponderance of the bureaucracy over the awakened
revolutionary masses. This is one side of the matter. But there is
another. In order to gain the possibility of occupying Poland through a
military alliance with Hitler, the Kremlin for a long time deceived and
continues to deceive the masses in the USSR and in the whole world, and
has thereby brought about the complete disorganization of the ranks of
its own Communist International. The primary political criterion for us
is not the transformation of property relations in this or another area,
however important these may be in themselves, but rather the change in
the consciousness and organization of the world proletariat, the raising
of their capacity for defending former conquests and accomplishing new
ones. From this one, and the only decisive standpoint, the politics of
Moscow, taken as a whole, wholly retain their reactionary character and
remain the chief obstacle on the road to the world revolution.

Our _general_ appraisal of the Kremlin and Comintern does not, however,
alter the _particular_ fact that the statification of property in the
occupied territories is in itself a progressive measure. We must
recognize this openly. Were Hitler on the morrow to throw his armies
against the East, to restore “law and order” in Eastern Poland, the
advanced workers would defend against Hitler these new property forms
established by the Bonapartist Soviet bureaucracy.

 

We Do Not Change Our Course!

The statification of the means of production is, as we said, a
progressive measure. But its progressiveness is relative; its specific
weight depends on the sum-total of all the other factors. Thus, we must
first and foremost establish that the extension of the territory
dominated by bureaucratic autocracy and parasitism, cloaked by
“socialist” measures, can augment the prestige of the Kremlin, engender
illusions concerning the possibility of replacing the proletarian
revolution by bureaucratic maneuvers and so on. This evil by far
outweighs the progressive content of Stalinist reforms in Poland. In
order that nationalized property in the occupied areas, as well as in
the USSR, become a basis for genuinely progressive, that is to say
socialist development, it is necessary to overthrow the Moscow
bureaucracy. Our program retains, consequently, all its validity. The
events did not catch us unaware. It is necessary only to interpret them
correctly. It is necessary to understand clearly that sharp
contradictions are contained in the character of the USSR and in her
international position. It is impossible to free oneself from those
contradictions with the help of terminological sleight of hand (“Workers
State” – “Not Workers State.”) We must take the facts as they are. We
must build our policy by taking as our starting point the real relations
and contradictions.

We do not entrust the Kremlin with any historic mission. We were and
remain against seizures of new territories by the Kremlin. We are for
the independence of Soviet Ukraine, and if the Byelo-Russians themselves
wish – of Soviet Byelo-Russia. At the same time in the sections of
Poland occupied by the Red Army, partisans of the Fourth International
must play the most decisive part in expropriating the landlords and
capitalists, in dividing the land among the peasants, in creating
Soviets and Workers’ Committees, etc. While so doing, they must preserve
their political independence, they must fight during elections the
Soviets and factory committees for the complete independence of the
latter from the bureaucracy, and they must conduct revolutionary
propaganda in the spirit of distrust towards the Kremlin and its local
agencies.

But let us suppose that Hitler turns his weapons against the East and
invades territories occupied by the Red Army. Under these conditions,
partisans of the Fourth International, without changing in any way their
attitude toward the Kremlin oligarchy, will advance to the forefront as
the most urgent task of the hour, the military resistance against
Hitler. The workers will say, “We cannot cede to Hitler the overthrowing
of Stalin; that is our own task”. During the military struggle against
Hitler, the revolutionary workers will strive to enter into the closest
possible comradely relations with the rank and file fighters of the Red
Army. While arms in hand they deal blows to Hitler, the
Bolshevik-Leninists will at the same time conduct revolutionary
propaganda against Stalin preparing his overthrow at the next and
perhaps very near stage.

This kind of “defense of the USSR” will naturally differ, as heaven does
from earth, from the official defense which is now being conducted under
the slogan: “For the Fatherland! For Stalin!” _Ou_r defense of the USSR
is carried on under the slogan: “For Socialism! For the world
revolution! Against Stalin!” In order that these two varieties of
“Defense of the USSR” do not become confused in the consciousness of the
masses it is necessary to know clearly and precisely how to formulate
slogans which correspond to the concrete situation. But above all it is
necessary to establish clearly just _what_ we are defending, just how we
are defending it, against _whom_ we are defending it. Our slogans will
create confusion among the masses only if we ourselves do not have a
clear conception of our tasks.

 

Conclusions

We have no reasons whatsoever at the present time for changing our
principled position in relation to the USSR.

War accelerates the various political processes. It may accelerate the
process of the revolutionary regeneration of the USSR. But it may also
accelerate the process of its final degeneration. For this reason it is
indispensable that follow painstakingly and without prejudice these
modifications which war introduces into the internal life of the USSR so
that we may give ourselves a timely accounting of them.

Our tasks in the occupied territories remain basically the same as in
the USSR itself; but inasmuch as they are posed by events in an
extremely sharp form, they enable us all the better to clarify our
general tasks in relation to the USSR.

We must formulate our slogans in such a way that the workers see clearly
just what we are defending in the USSR, (state property and planned
economy), and against whom we are conducting a ruthless struggle (the
parasitic bureaucracy and their Comintern). We must not lose sight for a
single moment of the fact that the question of overthrowing the Soviet
bureaucracy is for us subordinate to the question of preserving state
property in the means of production of the USSR: that the question of
preserving state property in the means of production in the USSR is
subordinate for us to the question of the world proletarian revolution.

_September_ 25, 1939.
_L. Trotsky_

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. We recollect that some of those comrades who are inclined to consider
the bureaucracy a new class, at the same time objected strenuously to
the exclusion of the bureaucracy from the Soviets.

2. True enough, in the last section of his book, which consists of
fantastic contradictions, Bruno R. quite consciously and articulately
refutes his own theory of “bureaucratic collectivism” unfolded in the
first section of the book and declares that Stalinism, Fascism, and
Nazism are transitory and parasitic formations, historical penalties for
the impotence of the proletariat. In other words, after having subjected
the views of the Fourth International to the sharpest kind of criticism.
Bruno B,. unexpectedly returns to those views, but only in order to
launch a new series or blind rumblings. We see no grounds for following
in the footsteps of a writer who has obviously lost his balance. We are
interested in those of his arguments by means of which he seeks to
substantiate his views that the bureaucracy is a class.



A LETTER TO SHERMAN STANLEY [1]


 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

First Published: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENSE OF MARXISM, New York 1942.
Checked against: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENCE OF MARXISM, London 1966,
pp.27-28.
All footnotes stem from the latter edition.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

October 8, 1939.

Dear Comrade Stanley,

I received your letter to O’Brien in view of his departure. The letter
produced upon me a strange impression, because in opposition to your
very good articles, it is full of contradictions.

I didn’t receive as yet any material about the plenum and don’t know
either the text of the majority resolution or that of M.S. [2], but you
affirm that there is not an irreconcilable opposition between the two
texts. At the same time you affirm that a “disaster” approaches the
party. Why? Even if there have been two _irreconcilable_ positions, it
would signify not a “disaster” but a necessity to fight out the
political struggle to the end. But if both motions represent only
nuances of the same point of view expressed in the program of the 4th
International, how can arise from this unprincipled (in your opinion)
divergence, a catastrophe? That the majority preferred their own nuance
(if it is only a nuance) is natural. But what is absolutely unnatural is
that the minority proclaims: “because you, the majority, accept your own
nuance and not ours we foretell catastrophe.” From the side of whom
? ? ? ... And you affirm that you “look objectively upon the different
groupings.” It is not my impression at all.

You write for example that from my article “one page _for some reason or
other_ was missing.” You express in this way a very venomis suspicion
towards responsible comrades. The page was missing by a regrettable
nonchalance in our office here, and we sent already a new, complete text
for translation. [3]

Your argument about the degenerated “workers’ _empire_” seems to me not
a very happy invention. “Czarist expansion program” was objected to [4]
the Bolsheviks almost from the first day of the October Revolution. Even
a sound workers state would tend toward expansion, and the geographical
lines would inevitably coincide with the general lines of the Czarist
expansion because revolutions don’t ordinarily change geographical
conditions. What we object to about the Kremlin gang is not the
expansion and not the geographical direction of the expansion but the
bureaucratic, counter-revolutionary methods of the expansion. But at the
same time because we as Marxists “look objectively” upon historic
happenings we recognize that neither the Czar, nor Hitler, nor
Chamberlain had or have the custom of abolishing, in the occupied
countries, capitalist property, and this fact, a very progressive one,
depends upon another fact; namely, that the October Revolution is not
definitely assassinated by the bureaucracy, and that the last is forced
by its position to take measures which we must defend in a given
situation against imperialist enemies. These progressive measures are,
of course, incomparably less important than the general
counter-revolutionary activity of the bureaucracy: it is why we find it
necessary to overthrow the bureaucracy ...

The comrades are very indignant about the Stalin-Hitler pact. It is
comprehensible. They wish to get revenge on Stalin. Very good. But today
we are weak, and we cannot immediately overthrow the Kremlin. Some
comrades try then to find a purely verbalistic satisfaction: they strike
out from the USSR the title workers’ state, as Stalin deprives a
disgraced functionary of the order of Lenin. I find it, my dear friend,
a bit childish. Marxist sociology and hysteria are absolutely
irreconcilable.

With best comradely greetings,
CRUX [_Leon Trotsky_]

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. This letter was written by Trotsky in English.

2. The reference is to Max Shachtman. – _Ed._

3. The document, _The USSR in War_, arrived while the plenum of the
National Committee was in session. One page was missing. The political
line of this document was endorsed by the majority of the plenum. the
minority raised a hue and cry about the missing page, charging, among
other things, that it was being deliberately suppressed. – _Ed._

4. i.e., charged against. – _Ed._



AGAIN AND ONCE MORE AGAIN ON THE NATURE OF THE USSR


 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

First Published: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENSE OF MARXISM, New York 1942.
Checked against: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENCE OF MARXISM, London 1966,
pp.29-39.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Psychoanalysis and Marxism

Certain comrades, or former comrades, such as Bruno R., having forgotten
the past discussions and decisions of the Fourth International, attempt
to explain my personal estimate of the Soviet state psychoanalytically.
“Since Trotsky participated in the Russian Revolution, it is difficult
for him to lay aside the idea of the workers’ state inasmuch as he would
have to renounce his whole life’s cause,” etc. I think that the old
Freud, who was very perspicacious, would have cuffed the ears of
psychoanalysts of this ilk a little. Naturally I would never risk taking
such action myself. Nevertheless I dare assure my critics that
subjectivity and sentimentality are not on my side but on theirs.

Moscow’s conduct, which has passed all bounds of abjectness and
cynicism, calls forth an easy revolt within every proletarian
revolutionary. Revolt engenders need for rejection. When the forces for
immediate action are absent, impatient revolutionaries are inclined to
resort to artificial methods. Thus arises, for example, the tactic of
individual terror. More frequently resort is taken to strong
expressions, to insults, and to imprecation. In the case which concerns
us certain comrades are manifestly inclined to seek compensation through
“terminological” terror. However, even from this point of view the mere
fact of qualifying the bureaucracy as a class is worthless. If the
Bonapartist riff-raff is a class this means that it is not an abortion
but a viable child of history. If its marauding parasitism is
“exploitation” in the scientific sense of the term, this means that the
bureaucracy possesses a historical future as the ruling class
indispensable to the given system of economy. Here we have the end to
which impatient revolt leads when it cuts itself loose from Marxist
discipline!

When an emotional mechanic considers an automobile in which, let us say,
gangsters have escaped from police pursuit over a bad road, and finds
the frame bent, the wheels out of line, and the motor partially damaged,
he might quite justifiably say: “It is not an automobile – devil knows
what it is!” Such an estimate would lack any technical and scientific
value, but it would express the legitimate reaction of the mechanic at
the work of the gangsters. Let us suppose, however, that this same
mechanic must recondition the object which he named
“devil-knows-what-it-is.” In this case he will start with the
recognition that it is a damaged automobile before him. He will
determine which parts are still good and which are beyond repair in
order to decide how to begin work. The class-conscious worker will have
a similar attitude toward the USSR. He has full right to say that the
gangsters of the bureaucracy have transformed the workers’ state into
“devil-knows-what-it-is.” But when he passes from this explosive
reaction to the solution of the political problem, he is forced to
recognize that it is a damaged workers’ state before him, in which the
motor of economy is damaged, but which still continues to run and which
can be completely reconditioned with the replacement of some parts. Of
course this is only an analogy. Nevertheless it is worth reflecting
over.

 

“A Counter-Revolutionary Workers’ State”

Some voices cry out: “If we continue to recognize the USSR as a workers’
state, we will have to establish a new category: the
counter-revolutionary workers’ state.” This argument attempts to shock
our imagination by opposing a good programmatic norm to a miserable,
mean, even repugnant reality. But haven’t we observed from day to day
since 1923 how the Soviet state has played a more and more
counter-revolutionary role on the international arena? Have we forgotten
the experience of the Chinese Revolution, of the 1926 general strike in
England and finally the very fresh experience of the Spanish Revolution?
There are two completely counter-revolutionary workers’ internationals.
These critics have apparently forgotten this “category.” The trade
unions of France, Great Britain, the United States and other countries
support completely the counterrevolutionary politics of their
bourgeoisie. This does not prevent us from labeling them trade unions,
from supporting their progressive steps and from defending them against
the bourgeoisie. Why is it impossible to employ the same method with the
counter-revolutionary workers’ state? In the last analysis a workers’
state is a trade union which has conquered power. The difference in
attitude in these two cases is explainable by the simple fact that the
trade unions have a long history and we have become accustomed to
consider them as realities and not simply as “categories” in our
program. But, as regards the workers’ state there is being evinced an
inability to learn to approach it as a real historical fact which has
not subordinated itself to our program.

 

Imperialism?

Can the present expansion of the Kremlin be termed imperialism? First of
all we must establish what social content is included in this term.
History has known the “imperialism” of the Roman state based on slave
labor, the imperialism of feudal land-ownership, the imperialism of
commercial and industrial capital, the imperialism of the Czarist
monarchy, etc. The driving force behind the Moscow bureaucracy is
indubitably the tendency to expand its power, its prestige, its
revenues. This is the element of “imperialism” in the widest sense of
the word which was a property in the past of all monarchies,
oligarchies, ruling castes, medieval estates and classes. However, in
contemporary literature, at least Marxist literature, imperialism is
understood to mean the _expansionist policy of finance capital_ which
has a very sharply defined economic content. To employ the term
“imperialism” for the foreign policy of the Kremlin – without
elucidating exactly what this signifies – means simply to identify the
policy of the Bonapartist bureaucracy with the policy of monopolistic
capitalism on the basis that both one and the other utilize military
force for expansion. Such an identification, capable of sowing only
confusion, is much more proper to petty-bourgeois democrats than to
Marxists.

 

Continuation of the Policy of Czarist Imperialism

The Kremlin participates in a new division of Poland, the Kremlin lays
hands upon the Baltic states, the Kremlin orients toward the Balkans,
Persia and Afghanistan; in other words, the Kremlin continues the policy
of Czarist imperialism. Do we not have the right in this case to label
the policy of the Kremlin itself imperialist? This
historical-geographical argument is no more convincing than any of the
others. The proletarian revolution, which occurred on the territory of
the Czarist empire, attempted from the very beginning to conquer and for
a time conquered the Baltic countries; attempted to penetrate Rumania
and Persia and at one time led its armies up to Warsaw (1920). The lines
of revolutionary expansion were the same as those of Czarism, since
revolution does not change geographical conditions. That is precisely
why the Mensheviks at that time already spoke of Bolshevik imperialism
as borrowed from the traditions of Czarist diplomacy. The
petty-bourgeois democracy willingly resorts to this argument even now.
We have no reason, I repeat, for imitating them in this.

 

Agency of Imperialism?

However, aside from the manner in which to appraise the expansionist
policy of the USSR itself, there remains the question of the help which
Moscow provides the imperialist policy of Berlin. Here first of all, it
is necessary to establish that under certain conditions – up to a
certain degree and in a certain form – the support of this or that
imperialism would be inevitable even for a completely healthy workers’
state – in virtue of the impossibility of breaking away from the chains
of world imperialist relations. The Brest-Litovsk peace without the
least doubt temporarily reinforced German imperialism against France and
England. An isolated workers’ state cannot fail to maneuver between the
hostile imperialist camps. Maneuvering means temporarily supporting one
of them against the other. To know exactly which one of the two camps it
is more advantageous or less dangerous to support at a certain moment is
not a question of principle but of practical calculation and foresight.
The inevitable disadvantage which is engendered as a consequence of this
constrained support for one bourgeois state against another is more than
covered by the fact that the isolated workers’ state is thus given the
possibility of continuing its existence.

But there is maneuvering and maneuvering. At Brest-Litovsk the Soviet
government sacrificed the national independence of the Ukraine in order
to salvage the workers’ state. Nobody could speak of treason toward the
Ukraine, since all the class-conscious workers understood the forced
character of this sacrifice. It is completely different with Poland. The
Kremlin has never and at no place represented the question as if it had
been _constrained_ to sacrifice Poland. On the contrary, it boasts
cynically of its combination, which affronts, rightfully, the most
elementary democratic feelings of the oppressed classes and peoples
throughout the world and thus weakens extremely the international
situation of the Soviet Union. The economic transformations in the
occupied provinces do not compensate for this by even a tenth part!

The entire foreign policy of the Kremlin in general is based upon a
scoundrelly embellishment of the “friendly” imperialism and thus leads
to the sacrifice of the fundamental interests of the world workers’
movement for secondary and unstable advantages. After five years of
duping the workers with slogans for the “defense of the democracies”
Moscow is now occupied with covering up Hitler’s policy of pillage. This
in itself still does not change the USSR into an imperialist state. But
Stalin and his Comintern are now indubitably the most valuable agency of
imperialism.

If we want to define the foreign policy of the Kremlin exactly, we must
say that it is the policy, of the _Bonapartist bureaucracy of a
degenerated workers’ state in imperialist encirclement_. This definition
is not as short or as sonorous as “imperialist policy,” but in return it
is more precise.

 

“The Lesser Evil”

The occupation of eastern Poland by the Red Army is to be sure a “lesser
evil” in comparison with the occupation of the same territory by Nazi
troops. But this lesser evil was obtained because Hitler was assured of
achieving a greater evil. If somebody sets, or helps to set a house on
fire and afterward saves five out of ten of the occupants of the house
in order to convert them into his own semi-slaves, that is to be sure a
lesser evil than to have burned the entire ten. But it is dubious that
this firebug merits a medal for the rescue. If nevertheless a medal were
given to him he should be shot immediately after as in the case of the
hero in one of Victor Hugo’s novels.

 

“Armed Missionaries”

Robespierre once said that people do not like missionaries with
bayonets. By this he wished to say that it is impossible to impose
revolutionary ideas and institutions on other people through military
violence. This correct thought does not signify of course the
inadmissibility of military intervention in other countries in order to
cooperate in a revolution. But such an intervention, as part of a
revolutionary international policy, must be understood by the
international proletariat, must correspond to the desires of the toiling
masses of the country on whose territory the revolutionary troops enter.
The theory of socialism in one country is not capable, naturally, of
creating this active international solidarity which alone can prepare
and justify armed intervention. The Kremlin poses and resolves the
question of military intervention, like all other questions of its
policy, absolutely independently of the ideas and feelings of the
international working class. Because of this, the latest diplomatic
“successes” of the Kremlin monstrously compromise the USSR and introduce
extreme confusion into the ranks of the world proletariat.

 

Insurrection on Two Fronts

But if the question thus shapes itself – some comrades say – is it
proper to speak of the defense of the USSR and the occupied provinces?
Is it not more correct to call upon the workers and peasants in both
parts of former Poland to arise against Hitler as well as against
Stalin? Naturally, this is very attractive. If revolution surges up
simultaneously in Germany and in the USSR, including the newly occupied
provinces, this would resolve many questions at one blow. But our policy
cannot be based upon only the most favorable, the most happy combination
of circumstances. The question is posed thus: What to do if Hitler,
before he is crushed by revolution, attacks the Ukraine before
revolution has smashed Stalin? Will the partisans of the Fourth
International in this case fight against the troops of Hitler as they
fought in Spain in the ranks of the Republican troops against Franco? We
are completely and whole-heartedly for an independent (of Hitler as well
as of Stalin) Soviet Ukraine. But what to do if, before having obtained
this independence, Hitler attempts to seize the Ukraine which is under
the domination of the Stalinist bureaucracy? The Fourth International
answers: Against Hitler we will defend this Ukraine enslaved by Stalin.

 

“Unconditional Defense of the USSR”

What does “unconditional” defense of the USSR mean? It means that we do
not lay any conditions upon the bureaucracy. It means that independently
of the motive and causes of the war we defend the social basis of the
USSR, if it is menaced by danger on the part of imperialism.

Some comrades say: “And if the Red Army tomorrow invades India and
begins to put down a revolutionary movement there shall we in this case
support it?” Such a way of posing a question is not at all consistent.
It is not clear above all why India is implicated. Is it not simpler to
ask: If the Red Army menaces workers’ strikes or peasant protests
against the bureaucracy in the USSR shall we support it or not? Foreign
policy is the continuation of the internal. We have never promised to
support _all_ the actions of the Red Army which is an instrument in the
hands of the Bonapartist bureaucracy. We have promised to defend only
the USSR as a workers’ state and solely those things within it which
belong to a workers’ state.

An adroit casuist can say: If the Red Army, independently of the
character of the “work” fulfilled by it, is beaten by the insurgent
masses in India, this will weaken the USSR. To this we will answer: The
crushing of a revolutionary movement in India, with the cooperation of
the Red Army, would signify an incomparably greater danger to the social
basis of the USSR than an episodical defeat of counter-revolutionary
detachments of the Red Army in India. In every case the Fourth
International will know how to distinguish where and when the Red Army
is acting solely as an instrument of the Bonapartist reaction and where
it defends the social basis of the USSR.

A trade union led by reactionary fakers organizes a strike against the
admission of Negro workers into a certain branch of industry. Shall we
support such a shameful strike? Of course not. But let us imagine that
the bosses, utilizing the given strike, make an attempt to crush the
trade union and to make impossible in general the organized self-defense
of the workers. In this case we will defend the trade union as a matter
of course in spite of its reactionary leadership. Why is not this same
policy applicable to the USSR?

 

The Fundamental Rule

The Fourth International has established firmly that in all imperialist
countries, independent of the fact as to whether they are in alliance
with the USSR or in a camp hostile to it, the proletarian parties during
the war must develop the class struggle with the purpose of seizing
power. At the same time the proletariat of the imperialist countries
must not lose sight of the interests of the USSR’s defense (or of that
of colonial revolutions) and in case of real necessity must resort to
the most decisive action, for instance, strikes, acts of sabotage, etc.
The groupings of the powers since the time the Fourth International
formulated this rule have changed radically. But the rule itself retains
all its validity. If England and France tomorrow menace Leningrad or
Moscow, the British and French workers should take the most decisive
measures in order to hinder the sending of soldiers and military
supplies. If Hitler finds himself constrained by the logic of the
situation to send Stalin military supplies, the German workers, on the
contrary, would have no reason for resorting in this concrete case to
strikes or sabotage. Nobody, I hope, will propose any other solution.

 

“Revision of Marxism”?

Some comrades evidently were surprised that I spoke in my article (<_The
USSR in the War_) of the system of “bureaucratic collectivism” as a
theoretical possibility. They discovered in this even a complete
revision of Marxism. This is an apparent misunderstanding. The Marxist
comprehension of historical necessity has nothing in common with
fatalism. Socialism is not realizable “by itself,” but as a result of
the struggle of living forces, classes and their parties. The
proletariat’s decisive advantage in this struggle resides in the fact
that it represents historical progress, while the bourgeoisie incarnates
reaction and decline. Precisely in this is the source of our conviction
in victory. But we have full right to ask ourselves: What character will
society take if the forces of reaction conquer?

Marxists have formulated an incalculable number of times the
alternative: either socialism or return to barbarism. After the Italian
“experience” we repeated thousands of times: either communism or
fascism. The real passage to socialism cannot fail to appear
incomparably more complicated, more heterogeneous, more contradictory
than was foreseen in the general historical scheme. Marx spoke about the
dictatorship of the proletariat and its future withering away but said
nothing about bureaucratic degeneration of the dictatorship. We have
observed and analyzed for the first time in experience such a
degeneration. Is this revision of Marxism?

The march of events has succeeded in demonstrating that the delay of the
socialist revolution engenders the indubitable phenomena of
barbarism-chronic unemployment, pauperization of the petty bourgeoisie,
fascism, finally wars of extermination which do not open up any new
road. What social and political forms can the new “barbarism” take, if
we admit theoretically that mankind should not be able to elevate itself
to socialism? We have the possibility of expressing ourselves on this
subject more concretely than Marx. Fascism on one hand, degeneration of
the Soviet state on the other outline the social and political forms of
a neo-barbarism. An alternative of this kind – socialism or totalitarian
servitude – has not only theoretical interest, but also enormous
importance in agitation, because in its light the necessity for
socialist revolution appears most graphically.

If we are to speak of a revision of Marx, it is in reality the revision
of those comrades who project a new type of state, “nonbourgeois” and
“non-worker.” Because the alternative developed by me leads them to draw
their own thoughts up to their logical conclusion, some of these
critics, frightened by the conclusions of their own theory, accuse me
... of revising Marxism. I prefer to think that it is simply a friendly
jest.

 

The Right of Revolutionary Optimism

I endeavored to demonstrate in my article _The USSR in the War_ that the
perspective of a non-worker and non-bourgeois society of exploitation,
or “bureaucratic collectivism,” is the perspective of complete defeat
and the decline of the international proletariat, the perspective of the
most profound historical pessimism.

Are there any genuine reasons for such a perspective? It is not
superfluous to inquire about this among our class enemies.

In the weekly of the well-known newspaper PARIS-SOIR of August 31, 1939,
an extremely instructive conversation is reported between the French
ambassador Coulondre and Hitler on August 25, at the time of their last
interview. (The source of the information is undoubtedly Coulondre
himself.) Hitler sputters, boasts of the pact which he concluded with
Stalin (“a realistic pact”) and “regrets” that German and French blood
will be spilled.

“But,” Coulondre objects, “Stalin displayed great double-dealing. The
real victor (in case of war) will be Trotsky. Have you thought this
over?”

“I know,” – der Fuehrer responds, “but why did France and Britain give
Poland complete freedom of action ?” etc.

These gentlemen like to give a personal name to the specter of
revolution. But this of course is not the essence of this dramatic
conversation at the very moment when diplomatic relations were ruptured.
“War will inevitably provoke revolution,” the representative of
imperialist democracy, himself chilled to the marrow, frightens his
adversary.

“I know,” Hitler responds, as if it were a question decided long ago. “I
know.” Astonishing dialogue.

Both of them, Coulondre and Hitler, represent the barbarism which
advances over Europe. At the same time neither of them doubts that their
barbarism will be conquered by socialist revolution. Such is now the
awareness of the ruling classes of all the capitalist countries of the
world. Their complete demoralization is one of the most important
elements in the relation of class forces. The proletariat has a young
and still weak revolutionary leadership. But the leadership of the
bourgeoisie rots on its feet. At the very outset of the war which they
could not avert, these gentlemen are convinced in advance of the
collapse of their regime. This fact alone must be for us the source of
invincible revolutionary optimism!

October 18, 1939



THE REFERENDUM AND DEMOCRATIC CENTRALISM [1]


 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

First Published: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENSE OF MARXISM, New York 1942.
Checked against: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENCE OF MARXISM, London 1966,
pp.40-41.
All footnotes stem from the latter edition.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

We demand a referendum on the war question because we want to paralyze
or weaken the centralism of the imperialist state. But can we recognize
the referendum as a normal method for deciding issues in our own party?
It is not possible to answer this question except in the negative.

Whoever is in favor of a referendum recognizes by this that a party
decision is simply an arithmetical total of local decisions, every one
of the locals being inevitably restricted by its own forces and by its
limited experience. Whoever is in favor of a referendum must be in favor
of imperative mandates; that is, in favor of such a procedure that every
local has the right to _compel_ its representative at a party convention
to vote in a definite manner. Whoever recognizes imperative mandates
automatically denies the significance of conventions as the highest
organ of the party. Instead of a convention it is sufficient to
introduce a counting of local votes. The party as a centralized whole
disappears. By accepting a referendum the influence of the most advanced
locals and most experienced and far-sighted comrades of the capital or
industrial centers is substituted for the influence of the least
experienced, backward sections, etc.

Naturally we are in favor of an all-sided examination and of voting upon
every question by each party local, by each party cell. But at the same
time every delegate chosen by a local must have the right to weigh all
the arguments relating to the question in the convention and to vote as
his political judgment demands of him. If he votes in the convention
against the majority which delegated him, and if he is not able to
convince his organization of his correctness after the convention, then
the organization can subsequently deprive him of its political
confidence. Such cases are inevitable. But they are incomparably a
lesser evil than the system of referendums or imperative mandates which
completely kill the party as a whole.

_Coyoacan, D.F._, October 21, 1939

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. In the course of its factional struggle, the minority put forward the
demand for a referendum on the isue in dispute concerning the USSR. The
majority opposed this. Trotsky came out in support of the majority’s
rejection of a referendum. – _Ed._



A LETTER TO SHERMAN STANLEY [1]


 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

First Published: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENSE OF MARXISM, New York 1942.
Checked against: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENCE OF MARXISM, London 1966,
pp.27-28.
All footnotes stem from the latter edition.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

October 22, 1939

Dear Comrade Stanley:

It is with some delay that I answer your letter of October 11.

(1) You say that “there can be no serious differences or disagreements”
on the Russian question. If this is so, why the terrible alarm in the
party against the National Committee, i.e., its majority? You should not
substitute your own conceptions for that of the minority members of the
National Committee who considered the question serious and burning
enough to provoke a discussion just at the threshold of the war.

(2) I cannot agree with you that my statement does not contradict that
of Comrade M.S. The contradiction concerns two fundamental points:

+-----------------------------------------------------------------------+
| -   the class nature of the USSR;                                     |
|                                                                       |
| -   the defense of the USSR.                                          |
+-----------------------------------------------------------------------+

On the first question, Comrade M.S. places a question mark, which
signifies that he denies the old decision and postpones making a new
decision. A revolutionary party cannot live between two decislons, one
annihilated, the other not presented. In the question of the defense of
the USSR or the new occupied territories against Hitler’s (or Great
Britain’s) attack, Comrade M.S. proposes a revolution against Stalin and
Hitler. This abstract formula signifies negating the defense in a
concrete situation. I attempted to analyze this question in a new
article sent yesterday by airmail to the National Committee.

(3) I agree with you completely that only a serious discussion can
clarify the matter, but I don’t believe that voting simultaneously for
the statement of the majority and that of Comrade M.S. could conribute
to the necessary clarification.

(4) You state in your letter that the main issue is not the Russian
question but the “internal regime.” I have heard this accusation often
since almost the very beginning of the existence of our movement in the
United States. The formulations varied a bit, the groupings too, but a
number of comrades always remained in opposition to the “regime.” They
were, for example, against the entrance into the Socialist Party (not to
go further into the past). However it immediately occurred that not the
entrance was the “main issue” but the regime. Now the same formula is
repeated in connection with the Russian question.

(5) I for my part believe that the passage through the Socialist Party
was a salutary action for the whole development of our party and that
the "regime" (or the leadership) which assured this passage was correct
against the opposition which at that time represented the tendency of
stagnation.

(6) Now at the beginning of the war a new sharp opposition arises on the
Russian question. It concerns the correctness of our program elaborated
through innumerable disputes, polemics, and discussions during at least
ten years. Our decisions are of course not eternal. If somebody in a
leading position has doubts and only doubts, it is his duty toward the
party to clarify himself by fresh studies or by discussions inside the
leading party bodies before throwing the question into the party – not
in the form of elaborated new decisions, but in the form of doubts. Of
course from the point of view of the statutes of the party, everybody,
even a member of the Political Committee, has the right to do so, but I
don’t believe that this right was used in a sound manner which could
contribute to the amelioration of the party regime.

(7) Often in the past I have heard accusations from comrades against the
National Committee as a whole – its lack of initiative, and so on. I am
not the attorney of the National Committee and I am sure that many
things have been omitted which should have been done. But whenever I
insisted upon concretization of the accusations, I learned often that
the dissatisfaction with their own local activity, with their own lack
of initiative, was transformed into an accusation against the National
Committee which was supposed to be Omniscient, Omnipresent,
Omnibenevolent.

(8) In the present case the National Committee is accused of
“conservatism.” I believe that to defend the old programmatic decision
until it is replaced by a new one is the elementary duty of the National
Committee. I believe that such “conservatism” is dictated by the
self-preservation of the party itself.

(9) Thus in two most important issues of the last period comrades
dissatisfied with the “regime” have had in my opinion a false political
attitude. The regime must be an instrument for correct policy and not
for false. When the incorrectness of their policy becomes clear, then
its protagonists are often tempted to say that not this special issue is
decisive but the general regime. During the development of the Left
Opposition and the Fourth International we opposed such substitutions
hundreds of times. When Vereecken or Sneevilet or even Molinier were
beaten on all their points of difference, they declared that the genuine
trouble with the Fourth International is not this or that decision but
the bad regime.

(10) I don’t wish to make the slightest analogy between the leaders of
the present opposition in our American party and the Vereeckens,
Sneevliets and so on; I know very well that the leaders of the
opposition are highly qualified comrades and I hope sincerely that we
will continue to work together in the most friendly manner. But I cannot
help being disquieted by the fact that some of them repeat the same
error at every new stage of the development of the party with the
support of a group of personal adherents. I believe that in the present
discussion this kind of procedure must be analyzed and severely
condemned by the general opinion of the party which now has tremendous
tasks to fulfill.

With best comradely greetings,
CRUX [_Leon Trotsky_]

P.S. – In view of the fact that I speak in this letter about the
majority and the minority of the National Committee, especially of the
comrades of the M.S. resolution, I am sending a copy of this letter to
Comrades Cannon and Shachtman.

C.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. This letter was written by Trotsky in English.



A LETTER TO JAMES P. CANNON [1]


 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

First Published: James P. Cannon, THE STRUGGLE FOR A PROLETQARIAN PARTY.
Checked against: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENCE OF MARXISM, London 1966,
pp.45-47.
All footnotes stem from the latter book.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

October 28, 1939

Dear Jim,

Two things are clear to me from your letter of October 24: (1) that a
very serious ideological fight has become inevitable and politically
necessary; (2) that it would be extremely prejudicial if not fatal to
connect the ideological fight with the perspective of a split, of a
purge, or expulsions, and so on and so forth.

I heard for example that Comrade Gould proclaimed in a membership
meeting: “You wish to expel us.” But I don’t know what reaction came
from the other side to this. I for my part would immediately protest
with the greatest vehemence such suspicions. I would propose the
creation of a special control commission in order to check such
affirmations and rumours. If it happens that someone of the majority
launches such threats I for my part would vote for a censure or severe
warning.

You may have many new members or uneducated youth. They need a serious
educational discussion in the light of the great events. If their
thoughts at the beginning are obsessed by the perspective of personal
degradation, i.e., demotions, loss of prestige, disqualifications,
eliminations from Central Committee, etc., and so on, the whole
discussion would become envenomed and the authority of the leadership
would be compromised.

If the leadership on the contrary opens a ruthless fight against
petty-bourgeois idealistic conceptions and organizational prejudices but
at the same time guarantees for the discussion itself and for the
minority, the result would be not only be an ideological victory but an
important growth in the authority of the leadership.

“A conciliation and a compromise at the top” on the questions which form
the matter of the divergences would of course be a crime. But I for my
part would propose to the minority at the top an agreement, kif you
wish, a compromise on the methods of discussion and parallelly on the
political collaboration. For example (a) both sides eliminate from the
discussion any threats, personal denigration and so on; (b) both sides
take the obligation of loyal collaboration during the discussion; (c)
every false move (threats, or rumours of threats, or a rumour of alleged
threats, resignations, and so on) should be investigated by the National
Committee or a special commission as a particular fact and not thrown
into the discussion and so on.

If the majority accepts such an agreement you will have the possibility
of disciplining the discussion and also the advantage of having taken a
good initiative. If they reject it you can at every party membership
meeting present your written proposition to the minority as the best
refutation of their complaints and as an example of “our regime”.

It seems to me that the last convention failed at a very bad moment (the
time was not ripe) and became a kind of abortion. The genuine discussion
comes some time after the convention. This signifies that you can’t
avoid a convention at Christmas or so. The idea of a referendum is
absurd. It could only facilitate a split on local lines. I believe that
the majority in the above-mentioned agreement can propose to the
minority a new convention on the basis of two platforms with all the
organizational guarantees for the minority.

The convention is expensive but I don’t see any other means of
concluding the present discussion and the party crisis it produces.

J. HANSEN [_Leon Trotsky_]

P.S. – Every serious and sharp discussion can of course lead to some
desertions, departures, or even expulsions, but the whole party should
be convinced from the logic of the facts that they are inevitable
results occurred in spite of the best will of the leadership, and not an
objective of aim of the leadership, and not the point of departure of
the whole discussion. This is in my mind the decisive point of the whole
matter.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. This letter was inadvertently omitted from the volume IN DEFENSE OF
MARXISM and was printed for the first time in James P. Cannon’s THE
STRUGGLE FOR A PROLETARIAN PARTY, pp.98-99 footnote.



A LETTER TO MAX SHACHTMAN [1]


 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

First Published: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENSE OF MARXISM, New York 1942.
Checked against: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENCE OF MARXISM, London 1966,
pp.48-53.
All footnotes stem from the latter edition.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

November 6, 1939.

Dear Comrade Shachtman:

I received the transcript of your speech of October 15 [2] which you
sent me, and I read it, of course, with all the attention it deserves. I
found a lot of excellent ideas and formulations which seemed to me in
full accordance with our common position as it is expressed in the
fundamental documents of the Fourth International. But what I could not
find was an explanation for your attack upon our previous position as
“insufficient, inadequate and outdated.”

You say that “It is the concreteness of the events which differ from our
theoretical hypothesis and predictions that changes the situation.”
(Page 17) But unfortunately you speak about the “concreteness” of the
events very abstractly so that I cannot see in what respect they change
the situation and what are the consequences of these changes for our
politics. You mention some examples from the past. Hence, according to
you, we “saw and foresaw” the degeneration of the Third International
(page 18); but only after the Hitler victory did we find it necessary to
proclaim the Fourth International. This example is not formulated
exactly. We foresaw not only the degeneration of the Third International
but also the possibility of its regeneration. Only the German experience
of 1929-1933 convinced us that the Comintern was doomed and nothing
could regenerate it. But then we changed our policy fundamentally: To
the Third International we opposed the Fourth International.

But we did not draw the same conclusions concerning the Soviet state.
Why? The Third International was a party, a selection of people on the
basis of ideas and methods. This selection became so fundamentally
opposed to Marxism that we were obliged to abandon all hope of
regenerating it. But the Soviet state is not only an ideological
selection, it is a complex of social institutions which continues to
persist in spite of the fact that the ideas of the bureaucracy are now
almost the opposite of the ideas of the October Revolution. That is why
we did not renounce the possibility of regenerating the Soviet state by
political revolution. Do you believe now that we must change this
attitude? If not, and I am sure that you don’t propose it, where is the
fundamental change produced by the “concreteness” of events?

In this connection you quote the slogan of the _independent Soviet
Ukraine_ which, as I see with satisfaction, you accept. But you add: “As
I understand our basic position it always was to oppose separatist
tendencies in the Federated Soviet Republic.” (Page 19) In respect to
this you see a fundamental “change in policy.” But: (1) The slogan of an
independent Soviet Ukraine was proposed before the Hitler-Stalin pact.
(2) This slogan is only an application on the field of the national
question of our general slogan for the revolutionary overthrow of the
bureaucracy. You could with the same right say: “As I understand our
basic position it was always to oppose any rebellious acts against the
Soviet government.” Of course, but we changed this basic position
several years ago. I don’t really see what new change you propose in
this connection now.

You quote the march of the Red Army in 1920 into Poland and into Georgia
and you continue: “Now, if there is nothing new in the situation, why
does not the majority propose to hail the advance of the Red Army into
Poland, into the Baltic countries, into Finland ... (Page 20) In this
decisive part of your speech you establish that something is “new in the
situation” between 1920 and 1939. Of course! This newness in the
situation is the bankruptcy of the Third International, the degeneracy
of the Soviet state, the development of the Left Opposition, and the
creation of the Fourth International. This “concreteness of events”
occurred precisely between 1920 and 1939. And these events explain
sufficiently why we have radically changed our position toward the
politics of the Kremlin, including its military politics.

It seems that you forget somewhat that in 1920 we supported not only the
deeds of the Red Army but also the deeds of the GPU. From the point of
view of our appreciation of the state there is no principled difference
between the Red Army and the GPU. In their activities they are not only
closely connected but intermeshed. We can say that in 1918 and the
following years we hailed the Cheka in their fight against Russian
counter-revolutionaries and imperialist spies but in 1927 when the GPU
began to arrest, to exile and to shoot the genuine Bolsheviks we changed
our appreciation of this institution. This concrete change occurred at
least 11 years before the Soviet-German pact. That is why I am rather
astonished when you speak sarcastically about “the refusal even (!) of
the majority to take the same position today that we all took in 1920
...” (Page 20) We began to change this position in 1923. We proceeded by
stages more or less in accordance with the objective developments. The
decisive point of this evolution was for us 1933-34. If we fail to see
just what the new fundamental changes are which you propose in our
policy, it doesn’t signify that we go back to 1920!

You insist especially on the necessity of abandoning the slogan for the
unconditional defense of the USSR, whereupon you interpret this slogan
in the past as our unconditional support of every diplomatic and
military action of the Kremlin; i.e., of Stalin’s policy. No, my dear
Shachtman, this presentation doesn’t correspond to the “concreteness of
events.” Already in 1927 we proclaimed in the Central Committee: “For
the socialist fatherland? Yes! For the Stalinist course? No!” (THE
STALIN SCHOOL OF FALSIFICATION, p.177.) Then you seem to forget the
so-called “thesis on Clemenceau” which signified that in the interests
of the genuine defense of the USSR, the proletarian vanguard can be
obliged to eliminate the Stalin government and replace it with its own.
This was proclaimed in 1927! Five years later we explained to the
workers that this change of government can be effectuated only by
political revolution. Thus we separated fundamentally our defense of the
USSR as a _workers’ state_ from the bureaucracy’s defense of the USSR.
Whereupon you interpret our past policy as unconditional support of the
diplomatic and military activities of Stalin! Permit me to say that this
is a horrible deformation of our whole position not only since the
creation of the Fourth International but since the very beginning of the
Left Opposition.

Unconditional defense of the USSR signifies, namely, that our policy is
not determined by the deeds, maneuvers or crimes of the Kremlin
bureaucracy but only by our conception of the interests of the Soviet
state and world revolution.

At the end of your speech you quote Trotsky’s formula concerning the
necessity of subordinating the defense of the nationalized property in
the USSR to the interests of the world revolution, and you continue:
“Now my understanding of our position in the past was that we vehemently
deny any possible conflict between the two ... I never understood our
position in the past to mean that we _subordinate_ the one to the other.
If I understand English, the term implies either that there is a
conflict between the two or the possibility of such a conflict.” (Page
37) And from this you draw the impossibility of maintaining the slogan
of unconditional defense of the Soviet Union.

This argument is based upon at least two misunderstandings. How and why
could the interests of maintaining the nationalized property be in
“conflict” with the interests of the world revolution? Tacitly you infer
that the _Kremlin’s_ (not our) policy of defense can come into conflict
with the interests of the world revolution. Of course! At every step! In
every respect! However our policy of defense is not conditioned by the
Kremlin’s policy. This is the first misunderstanding. But, you ask, if
there is not a conflict why the necessity of subordination? Here is the
second misunderstanding. We must subordinate the defense of the USSR to
the world revolution insofar as we subordinate a _part_ to a _whole_. In
1918 in the polemics with Bukharin, who insisted upon a revolutionary
war against Germany, Lenin answered approximately: “If there should be a
revolution in Germany now, then it would be our duty to go to war even
at the risk of losing. Germany’s revolution is more important than ours
and we should if necessary sacrifice the Soviet power in Russia (for a
while) in order to help establish it in Germany.” A strike in Chicago at
this time could be unreasonable in and of itself, but if it is a matter
of helping a general strike on the national scale, the Chicago workers
should subordinate their interests to the interests of their class and
call a strike. If the USSR is involved in the war on the side of
Germany, the German revolution could certainly menace the immediate
interests of the defense of the USSR. Would we advise the German workers
not to act? The Comintern would surely give them such advice, but not
we. We will say: “We must subordinate the interests of the defense of
the Soviet Union to the interests of the world revolution.”

Some of your arguments are, it seems to me, answered in Trotsky’s last
article, _Again and Once More Again on the Nature of the USSR_, which
was written before I received the transcript of your speech.

You have hundreds and hundreds of new members who have not passed
through our common experience. I am fearful that your presentation can
lead them into the error of believing that we were unconditionally for
the support of the Kremlin, at least on the international field, that we
didn’t foresee such a possibility as the Stalin-Hitler collaboration,
that we were taken unawares by the events, and that we must
fundamentally change our position. That is not true! And independently
from all the other questions which are discUSSRd or only touched upon in
your speech (leadership, conservatism, party regime and so on) we must,
in my opinion, again check our position on the Russian question with all
the necessary carefulness in the interest of the American section as
well as of the Fourth International as a whole.

The real danger now is not the “unconditional” defense of that which is
worthy of defense, but direct or indirect help to the political current
which tries to identify the USSR with the fascist states for the benefit
of the democracies, or to the related current which tries to put all
tendencies in the same pot in order to compromise Bolshevism or Marxism
with Stalinism. We are the only party which really foresaw the events,
not in their empirical concreteness, of course, but in their general
tendency. Our strength consists in the fact that we do not need to
change our orientation as the war begins. And I find it very false that
some of our comrades, moved by the factional fight for a “good regime”
(which they, so far as I know, have never defined), persist in shouting:
“We were taken unawares! Our orientation turned out to be false! We must
improvise a new line! And so on.” This seems to me completely incorrect
and dangerous.

With warmest comradely greetings,
LUND [_Leon Trotsky_]

CC to J.P. Cannon.

P.S. – The formulations in this letter are far from perfect since it is
not an elaborated article, but only a letter dictated by me in English
and corrected by my collaborator during the dictation.

L.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. This letter was written by Trotsky in English.

2. This speech was delivered to a membership meeting of the New York
organization of the Socialist Workers Party. It is reproduced in the
INTERNAL BULLETIN, Vol.II No.3, issued on November 14, 1939. – _Ed._



A LETTER TO JAMES P. CANNON [1]


 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

First Published: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENSE OF MARXISM, New York 1942.
Checked against: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENCE OF MARXISM, London 1966,
pp.1-2.
All footnotes stem from the latter edition.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

December 15, 1939.

Dear Comrade Cannon,

The leaders of the opposition have not accepted the struggle upon a
principled plane up to now and will undoubtedly attempt to avoid it even
in the future. It is not difficult consequently to guess what the
leaders of the opposition will say in regard to the enclosed article.
“There are many correct elementary truths in the article,” they will
say; “we don’t deny them at all, but the article fails to answer the
burning ‘concrete’ questions. Trotsky is too far from the party to be
able to judge correctly. Not all petty-bourgeois elements are with the
opposition, not all workers with the Majority.” Some of them will surely
add that the article “ascribes” ideas to them which they have never
entertained, etc.

For answers to “concrete” questions, the oppositionists want recipes
from a cookbook for the epoch of imperialist wars. I don’t intend to
write such a cookbook. But from our principled approach to the
fundamental questions we shall always be able to arrive at a correct
solution for any concrete problem, complicated though it might be.
Precisely in the Finnish problem the opposition demonstrated its
incapacity to answer concrete questions.

There are never factions which are chemically pure in their composition.
Petty-bourgeois elements find themselves necessarily in every workers’
party and faction. The question is only who sets the tone. With the
opposition the tone is set by the petty-bourgeois elements.

The inevitable accusation that the article ascribes to the opposition
ideas which they never entertained is explained by the formlessness and
contradictory character of the opposition’s ideas which cannot bear the
touch of critical analysis. The article “ascribes” nothing to the
leaders of the opposition, it only develops their ideas to the end.
Naturally I can see the development of the struggle only from the
side-lines. But the general traits of the struggle can often be better
observed from the side-lines.

I clasp your hand warmly,
L. TROTSKY

Coyoacan, D.F.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. This letter was written by Trotsky in English.



A PETTY-BOURGEOIS OPPOSITION IN THE SOCIALIST WORKERS PARTY


 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

First Published: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENSE OF MARXISM, New York 1942.
Checked against: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENCE OF MARXISM, London 1966,
pp.56-80.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

It is necessary to call things by their right names. Now that the
positions of both factions in the struggle have become determined with
complete clearness, it must be said that the minority of the National
Committee is leading a typical petty-bourgeois tendency. Like any
petty-bourgeois group inside the socialist movement, the present
opposition is characterized by the following features: a disdainful
attitude toward theory and an inclination toward eclecticism; disrespect
for the tradition of their own organization; anxiety for personal
“independence” at the expense of anxiety for objective truth;
nervousness instead of consistency; readiness to jump from one position
to another; lack of understanding of revolutionary centralism and
hostility toward it; and finally, inclination to substitute clique ties
and personal relationships for party discipline. Not all the members of
the opposition of course manifest these features with identical
strength. Nevertheless, as always in a variegated bloc the tinge is
given by those who are most distant from Marxism and proletarian policy.
A prolonged and serious struggle is obviously before us. I make no
attempt to exhaust the problem in this article, but I will endeavor to
outline its general features.

 

Theoretical Skepticism and Eclecticism

In the January 1939 issue of the NEW INTERNATIONAL a long article was
published by comrades Burnham and Shachtman, _Intellectuals in Retreat_.
The article, while containing many correct ideas and apt political
characterizations, was marred by a fundamental defect if not flaw. While
polemicising against opponents who consider themselves – without
sufficient reason – above all as proponents of “theory,” the article
deliberately did not elevate the problem to a theoretical height. It was
absolutely necessary to explain why the American “radical” intellectuals
accept Marxism without the dialectic (a clock without a spring). The
secret is simple. In no other country has there been such rejection of
the class struggle as in the land of “unlimited opportunity.” The denial
of social contradictions as the moving force of development led to the
denial of the dialectic as the logic of contradictions in the domain of
theoretical thought. Just as in the sphere of politics it was thought
possible everybody could be convinced of the correctness of a “just”
program by means of clever syllogisms and society could be reconstructed
through “rational” measures. ‘so in the sphere of theory it was accepted
as proved that Aristotelian logic, lowered to the level of ‘common
sense,” was sufficient for the solution of all questions.

Pragmatism, a mixture of rationalism and empiricism, became the national
philosophy of the United States. The theoretical methodology of Max
Eastman is not fundamentally different from the methodology of Henry
Ford – both regard living society from the point of view of an
“engineer” (Eastman – platonically). Historically the present disdainful
attitude toward the dialectic is explained simply by the fact that the
grandfathers and great-grandmothers of Max Eastman and others did not
need the dialectic in order to conquer territory and enrich themselves.
But times have changed and the philosophy of pragmatism has entered a
period of bankruptcy just as has American capitalism.

The authors of the article did not show, could not and did not care to
show, this internal connection between philosophy and the material
development of society, and they frankly explained why.

“The two authors of the present article,” they wrote of themselves,
“differ thoroughly on their estimate of the general theory of
dialectical materialism, one of them accepting it and the other
rejecting it ... There is nothing anomalous in such a situation. Though
theory is doubtless always in one way or another related to practice,
the relation is not invariably direct or immediate; and as we have
before had occasion to remark, human beings often act inconsistently.
From the point of view of each of the authors there is in the other a
certain such inconsistency between ‘philosophical theory’ and political
practice, which might on some occasion lead to decisive concrete
political disagreement. But it does not now, nor has anyone yet
demonstrated that agreement or disagreement on the more abstract
doctrines of dialectical materialism necessarily affects today’s and
tomorrow’s concrete political issues-and political parties, programs and
struggles are based on such concrete issues. We all may hope that as we
go along or when there is more leisure, agreement may also be reached on
the more abstract questions. Meanwhile there is fascism and war and
unemployment.”

What is the meaning of this thoroughly astonishing reasoning? Inasmuch
as _some_ people through a bad method _sometimes_ reach correct
conclusions, and inasmuch as some people through a correct method _not
infrequently_ reach incorrect conclusions, therefore ... the method is
not of great importance. We shall meditate upon methods sometime when we
have more leisure, but now we have other things to do. Imagine how a
worker would react upon complaining to his foreman that his tools were
bad and receiving the reply: With bad tools it is possible to turn out a
good job, and with good tools many people only waste material. I am
afraid that such a worker, particularly if he is on piece-work, would
respond to the foreman with an unacademic phrase. A worker is faced with
refractory materials which show resistance and which because of that
compel him to appreciate fine tool’s, whereas a petty-bourgeois
intellectual – alas! – utilizes as his “tools” fugitive observations and
superficial generalizations – until major events club him on the head.

To demand that every party member occupy himself with the philosophy of
dialectics naturally would be lifeless pedantry. But a worker who has
gone through the school of the class struggle gains from his own
experience an inclination toward dialectical thinking. Even if unaware
of this term, he readily accepts the method itself and its conclusions.
With a petty bourgeois it is worse. There are of course petty-bourgeois
elements organically linked with the workers, who go over to the
proletarian point of view without an internal revolution. But these
constitute an insignificant minority. The matter is quite different with
the academically trained petty bourgeoisie. Their theoretical prejudices
have already been given finished form at the school bench. Inasmuch as
they succeeded in gaining a great deal of knowledge both useful and
useless without the aid of the dialectic, they believe that they can
continue excellently through life without it. In reality they dispense
with the dialectic only to the extent they fail to check, to polish, and
to sharpen theoretically their tools of thought, and to the extent that
they fail to break practically from the narrow circle of their daily
relationships. When thrown against great events they are easily lost and
relapse again into petty-bourgeois ways of thinking.

Appealing to “inconsistency” as justification for an unprincipled
theoretical bloc, signifies giving oneself bad credentials as a Marxist.
Inconsistency is not accidental, and in politics it does not appear
solely as an individual symptom. Inconsistency usually serves a social
function. There are social groupings which cannot be consistent.
Petty-bourgeois elements who have not rid themselves of hoary
petty-bourgeois tendencies are systematically compelled within a
workers’ party to make theoretical compromises with their own
conscience.

Comrade Shachtman’s attitude toward the dialectic method, as manifested
in the above-quoted argumentation, cannot be called anything but
eclectical skepticism. It is clear that Shachtman became infected with
this attitude not in the school of Marx but among the petty-bourgeois
intellectuals to whom all forms of skepticism are proper.

 

Warning and Verification

The article astonished me to such an extent that I immediately wrote to
comrade Shachtman:

“I have just read the article you and Burnham wrote on the
intellectuals. Many parts are excellent. However, the section on the
dialectic is the greatest blow that you, personally, as the editor of
the NEW INTERNATIONAL, could have delivered to Marxist theory. Comrade
Burnham says: ‘I don’t recognize the dialectic.’ It is clear and
everybody has to acknowledge it. But you say: ‘I recognize the
dialectic, but no matter; it does not have the slightest importance.’
Re-read what you wrote. This section is terribly misleading for the
readers of the _New International_ and the best of gifts to the Eastmans
of all kinds. Good! We will speak about it publicly.”

My letter was written January 20, some months before the present
discussion. Shachtman did not reply until March 5, when he answered in
effect that he couldn’t understand why I was making such a stir about
the matter. On March 9, I answered Shachtman in the following words:

“I did not reject in the slightest degree the possibility of
collaboration with the anti-dialecticians, but only the advisability of
writing an article together where the question of the dialectic plays,
or should play, a very important role. The polemic develops on two
planes: political and theoretical. Your political criticism is OK. Your
theoretical criticism is insufficient; it stops at the point at which it
should just become aggressive. Namely, the task consists of showing that
their mistakes (insofar as they are theoretical mistakes) are products
of their incapacity and unwillingness to think the things through
dialectically. This task could be accomplished with a very serious
pedagogical success. Instead of this you declare that dialectics is a
private matter and that one can be a very good fellow without dialectic
thinking.”

By allying himself in _this_ question with the anti-dialectician
Burnham, Shachtman deprived himself of the possibility of showing why
Eastman, Hook and many others began with a philosophical struggle
against the dialectic but finished with a political struggle against the
socialist revolution. That is, however, the essence of the question.

The present political discussion in the party has confirmed my
apprehensions and warning in an incomparably sharper form than I could
have expected, or, more correctly, feared. Shachtman’s methodological
skepticism bore its deplorable fruits in the question of the nature of
the Soviet state. Burnham began some time ago by constructing purely
empirically, on the basis of his immediate impressions, a
non-proletarian and non-bourgeois state, liquidating in passing the
Marxist theory of the state as the organ of class rule. Shachtman
unexpectedly took an evasive position: “The question, you see, is
subject to further consideration”; moreover, the sociological definition
of the USSR does not possess any direct and immediate significance for
our “political tasks” in which Shachtman agrees completely with Burnham.
Let the reader again refer to what these comrades wrote concerning the
dialectic. Burnham rejects the dialectic. Shachtman seems to accept, but
... the divine gift of “inconsistency” permits them to meet on common
political conclusions. _The attitude of each of them toward the nature
of the Soviet state reproduces point for point their attitude toward the
dialectic_.

In both cases Burnham takes the leading role. This is not surprising: he
possesses a method – pragmatism. Shachtman has no method. He adapts
himself to Burnham. Without assuming complete responsibility for the
anti-Marxian conceptions of Burnham, he defends his bloc of aggression
against the Marxian conceptions with Burnham in the sphere of philosophy
as well as in the sphere of sociology. In both cases Burnham appears as
a pragmatist and Shachtman as an eclectic. This example has this
invaluable advantage that the complete parallelism between Burnham’s and
Shachtman’s positions upon two different planes of thought and upon two
questions of primary importance, will strike the eyes even of comrades
who have had no experience in purely theoretical thinking. The method of
thought can be dialectic or vulgar, conscious or unconscious, but it
exists and makes itself known.

Last January we heard from our authors: “But it does not now, nor has
anyone yet demonstrated that agreement or disagreement on the more
abstract doctrines of dialectical materialism necessarily affects
today’s and tomorrow’s concrete political issues ...” Nor has anyone yet
demonstrated! Not more than a few months passed before Burnham and
Shachtman themselves demonstrated that their attitude toward such an
“abstraction” as dialectical materialism found its precise manifestation
in their attitude toward the Soviet state.

To be sure it is necessary to mention that the difference between the
two instances is rather important, but it is of a political and not a
theoretical character. In both cases Burnham and Shachtman formed a bloc
on the basis of rejection and semi-rejection of the dialectic. But in
the first instance that bloc was directed against the opponents of the
proletarian party. In the second instance the bloc was concluded against
the Marxist wing of their own party. The front of military operations,
so to speak, has changed but the weapon remains the same.

True enough, people are often inconsistent. Human consciousness
nevertheless tends toward a certain homogeneity. Philosophy and logic
are compelled to rely upon this homogeneity of human consciousness and
not upon what this homogeneity lacks, that is, inconsistency. Burnham
does not recognize the dialectic, but the dialectic recognizes Burnham,
that is, extends its sway over him. Shachtman thinks that the dialectic
has no importance in political conclusions, but in the political
conclusions of Shachtman himself we see the deplorable fruits of his
disdainful attitude toward the dialectic. We should include this example
in the textbooks on dialectical materialism.

Last year I was visited by a young British professor of political
economy, a sympathizer of the Fourth International. During our
conversation on the ways and means of realizing socialism, he suddenly
expressed the tendencies of British utilitarianism in the spirit of
Keynes and others: “It is necessary to determine a clear economic end,
to choose the most reasonable means for its realization," etc. I
remarked: “I see that you are an adversary of dialectics.” He replied,
somewhat astonished: “Yes, I don’t see any use in it.” “However,” I
replied to him, “the dialectic enabled me on the basis of a few of your
observations upon economic problems to determine what category of
philosophical thought you belong to – this alone shows that there is an
appreciable value in the dialectic.” Although I have received no word
about my visitor since then, I have no doubt that this anti-dialectic
professor maintains the opinion that the USSR is not a workers’ state,
that unconditional defense of the USSR is an “out-moded” opinion, that
our organizational methods are bad, etc. If it is possible to place a
given person’s general type of thought on the basis of his relation to
concrete practical problems, it is also possible to predict
approximately, knowing his general type of thought, how a given
individual will approach one or another practical question. That is the
incomparable educational value of the dialectical method of thought.

 

The ABC of Materialist Dialectics

Gangrenous skeptics like Souvarine believe that “nobody knows” what the
dialectic is. And there are “Marxists” who kowtow reverently before
Souvarine and hope to learn something from him. And these Marxists hide
not only in the MODERN MONTHLY. Unfortunately a current of Souvarinism
exists in the present opposition of the SWP. And here it is necessary to
warn young comrades: Beware of this malignant infection!

The dialectic is neither fiction nor mysticism, but a science of the
forms of our thinking insofar as it is not limited to the daily problems
of life but attempts to arrive at an understanding of more complicated
and drawn-out processes. The dialectic and formal logic bear a
relationship similar to that between higher and lower mathematics.

I will here attempt to sketch the substance of the problem in a very
concise form. The Aristotelian logic of the simple syllogism starts from
the proposition that “A” is equal to “A.” This postulate is accepted as
an axiom for a multitude of practical human actions and elementary
generalizations. But in reality “A” is not equal to “A.” This is easy to
prove if we observe these two letters under a lens – they are quite
different from each other. But, one can object, the question is not of
the size or the form of the letters, since they are only symbols for
equal quantities, for instance, a pound of sugar. The objection is
beside the point; in reality a pound of sugar is never equal to a pound
of sugar – a more delicate scale always discloses a difference. Again
one can object: but a pound of sugar is equal to itself. Neither is this
true – all bodies change uninterruptedly in size, weight, color, etc.
They are never equal to themselves. A sophist will respond that a pound
of sugar is equal to itself “at any given moment.” Aside from the
extremely dubious practical value of this “axiom,” it does not withstand
theoretical criticism either. How should we really conceive the word
“moment”? If it is an infinitesimal interval of time, then a pound of
sugar is subjected during the course of that “moment” to inevitable
changes. Or is the “moment” a purely mathematical abstraction, that is,
a zero of time? But everything exists in time; and existence itself is
an uninterrupted process of transformation; time is consequently a
fundamental element of existence. Thus the axiom “A” is equal to “A”
signifies that a thing is equal to itself if it does not change, that
is, if it does not exist.

At first glance it could seem that these “subtleties” are useless. In
reality they are of decisive significance. The axiom “A” is equal to “A”
appears on one hand to be the point of departure for all our knowledge,
on the other hand the point of departure for all the errors in our
knowledge. To make use of the axiom “A” is equal to “A” with impunity is
possible only within certain _limits_. When quantitative changes in “A”
are negligible for the task at hand then we can presume that “A” is
equal to “A.” This is, for example, the manner in which a buyer and a
seller consider a pound of sugar. We consider the temperature of the sun
likewise. Until recently we considered the buying power of the dollar in
the same way. But quantitative changes beyond certain limits become
converted into qualitative. A pound of sugar subjected to the action of
water or kerosene ceases to be a pound of sugar. A dollar in the embrace
of a president ceases to be a dollar. To determine at the right moment
the critical point where quantity changes into quality is one of the
most important and difficult tasks in all the spheres of knowledge
including sociology.

Every worker knows that it is impossible to make two completely equal
objects. In the elaboration of bearing-brass into cone bearings, a
certain deviation is allowed for the cones which should not, however, go
beyond certain limits (this is called tolerance). By observing the norms
of tolerance, the cones are considered as being equal. (“A” is equal to
“A.”) When the tolerance is exceeded the quantity goes over into
quality; in other words, the cone bearings become inferior or completely
worthless.

Our scientific thinking is only a part of our general practice including
techniques. For concepts there also exists “tolerance” which is
established not by formal logic issuing from the axiom “A” is equal to
“A,” but by dialectical logic issuing from the axiom that everything is
always changing. “Common sense” is characterized by the fact that it
systematically exceeds dialectical “tolerance.”

Vulgar thought operates with such concepts as capitalism, morals,
freedom, workers’ state, etc. as fixed abstractions, presuming that
capitalism is equal to capitalism, morals are equal to morals, etc.
Dialectical thinking analyzes all things and phenomena in their
continuous change, while determining in the material conditions of those
changes that critical limit beyond which “A” ceases to be “A”, a
workers’ state ceases to be a workers’ state.

The fundamental flaw of vulgar thought lies in the fact that it wishes
to content itself with motionless imprints of a reality which consists
of eternal motion. Dialectical thinking gives to concepts, by means of
closer approximations, corrections, concretizations, a richness of
content and flexibility; I would even say a succulence which to a
certain extent brings them close to living phenomena. Not capitalism in
general, but a given capitalism at a given stage of development. Not a
workers’ state in general, but a given workers’ state in a backward
country in an imperialist encirclement, etc.

Dialectical thinking is related to vulgar thinking in the same way that
a motion picture is related to a still photograph. The motion picture
does not outlaw the still photograph but combines a series of them
according to the laws of motion. Dialectics does not deny the syllogism,
but teaches us to combine syllogisms in such a way as to bring our
understanding closer to the eternally changing reality. Hegel in his
LOGIC established a series of laws: change of quantity into quality,
development through contradictions, conflict of content and form,
interruption of continuity, change of possibility into inevitability,
etc., which are just as important for theoretical thought as is the
simple syllogism for more elementary tasks.

Hegel wrote before Darwin and before Marx. Thanks to the powerful
impulse given to thought by the French Revolution, Hegel anticipated the
general movement of science. But because it was only an _anticipation_,
although by a genius, it received from Hegel an idealistic character.
Hegel operated with ideological shadows as the ultimate reality. Marx
demonstrated that the movement of these ideological shadows reflected
nothing but the movement of material bodies.

We call our dialectic, materialist, since its roots are neither in
heaven nor in the depths of our “free will,” but in objective reality,
in nature. Consciousness grew out of the unconscious, psychology out of
physiology, the organic world out of the inorganic, the solar system out
of nebulae. On all the rungs of this ladder of development, the
quantitative changes were transformed into qualitative. Our thought,
including dialectical thought, is only one of the forms of the
expression of changing matter. There is place within this system for
neither God, nor Devil, nor immortal soul, nor eternal norms of laws and
morals. The dialectic of thinking, having grown out of the dialectic of
nature, possesses consequently a thoroughly materialist character.

Darwinism, which explained the evolution of species through quantitative
transformations passing into qualitative, was the highest triumph of the
dialectic in the whole field of organic matter. Another great triumph
was the discovery of the table of atomic weights of chemical elements
and further the transformation of one element into another.

With these transformations (species, elements, etc.) is closely linked
the question of classification, equally important in the natural as in
the social sciences. Linmeus’ system (18th century), utilizing as its
starting point the immutability of species, was limited to the
description and classification of plants according to their external
characteristics. The infantile period of botany is analogous to the
infantile period of logic, since the forms of our thought develop like
everything that lives. Only decisive repudiation of the idea of fixed
species, only the study of the history of the evolution of plants and
their anatomy prepared the basis for a really scientific classification.

Marx, who in distinction from Darwin was a conscious dialectician,
discovered a basis for the scientific classification of human societies
in the development of their productive forces and the structure of the
relations of ownership which constitute the anatomy of society. Marxism
substituted for the vulgar descriptive classification of societies and
states, which even up to now still flourishes in the universities, a
materialistic dialectical classification. Only through using the method
of Marx is it possible correctly to determine both the concept of a
workers’ state and the moment of its downfall.

All this, as we see, contains nothing “metaphysical” or “scholastic,” as
conceited ignorance affirms. Dialectic logic expresses the laws of
motion in contemporary scientific thought. The struggle against
materialist dialectics on the contrary expresses a distant past,
conservatism of the petty bourgeoisie, the self-conceit of university
routinists and ... a spark of hope for an after-life.

 

The Nature of the USSR

The definition of the USSR given by comrade Burnham, “not a workers’ and
not a bourgeois state,” is purely negative, wrenched from the chain of
historical development, left dangling in mid-air, void of a single
particle of sociology and represents simply a theoretical capitulation
of pragmatism before a _contradictory_ historical phenomenon.

If Burnham were a dialectical materialist, he would have probed the
following three questions: (1) What is the historical origin of the
USSR? (2) What changes has this state suffered during its existence? (3)
Did these changes pass from the quantitative stage to the qualitative?
That is, did they create a historically necessary domination by a new
exploiting class? Answering these questions would have forced Burnham to
draw the only possible conclusion – the USSR is still a degenerated
workers’ state.

The dialectic is not a magic master key for all questions. It does not
replace concrete scientific analysis. But it directs this analysis along
the correct road, securing it against sterile wanderings in the desert
of subjectivism and scholasticism.

Bruno R. places both the Soviet and fascist regimes under the category
of “bureaucratic collectivism,” because the USSR, Italy and Germany are
all ruled by bureaucracies; here and there are the principles of
planning; in one case private property is liquidated, in another
limited, etc. Thus on the basis of the _relative_ similarity of
_certain_ external characteristics of _different_ origin, of _different_
specific weight, of _different_ class significance, a fundamental
_identity_ of social regimes is constructed, completely in the spirit of
bourgeois professors who construct categories of “controlled economy,”
“centralized state,” without taking into consideration whatsoever the
class nature of one or the other. Bruno R. and his followers, or
semi-followers like Burnham, at best remain in the sphere of social
classification on the level of Linneus in whose justification it should
be remarked however that he lived before Hegel, Darwin and Marx.

Even worse and more dangerous, perhaps, are those eclectics who express
the idea that the class character of the Soviet state “does not matter,”
and that the direction of our policy is determined by “the character of
the war.” As if the war were an independent super-social substance; as
if the character of the war were not determined by the character of the
ruling class, that is, by the same social factor that also determines
the character of the state. Astonishing how easily some comrades forget
the ABC’s of Marxism under the blows of events.

It is not surprising that the theoreticians of the opposition who reject
dialectic thought capitulate lamentably before the contradictory nature
of the USSR. However the contradiction between the social basis laid
down by the revolution, and the character of the caste which arose out
of the degeneration of the revolution is not only an irrefutable
historical fact but also a motor force. In our struggle for the
overthrow of the bureaucracy we base ourselves on this contradiction.
Meanwhile some ultra-lefts have already reached the ultimate absurdity
by affirming that it is necessary to sacrifice the social structure of
the USSR in order to overthrow the Bonapartist oligarchy! They have no
suspicion that the USSR minus the social structure founded by the
October Revolution would be a fascist regime.

 

Evolution and Dialectics

Comrade Burnham will probably protest that as an evolutionist he is
interested in the development of society and state forms not less than
we dialecticians. We will not dispute this. Every educated person since
Darwin has labeled himself an “evolutionist.” But a real evolutionist
must apply the idea of evolution to his own forms of thinking.
Elementary logic, founded in the period when the idea of evolution
itself did not yet exist, is evidently insufficient for the analysis of
evolutionary processes. Hegel’s logic is the logic of evolution. Only
one must not forget that the concept of “evolution” itself has been
completely corrupted and emasculated by university professors and
liberal writers to mean peaceful “progress.” Whoever has come to
understand that evolution proceeds through the struggle of antagonistic
forces; that a slow accumulation of changes at a certain moment explodes
the old shell and brings about a catastrophe, revolution; whoever has
learned finally to apply the general laws of evolution to thinking
itself, he is a dialectician, as distinguished from vulgar
evolutionists. Dialectic training of the mind, as necessary to a
revolutionary fighter as finger exercises to a pianist, demands
approaching all problems as _processes_ and not as _motionless
categories_. Whereas vulgar evolutionists, who limit themselves
generally to recognizing evolution in only certain spheres, content
themselves in all other questions with the banalities of “common sense.”

The American liberal, who has reconciled himself to the existence of the
USSR, more precisely to the Moscow bureaucracy, believes, or at least
believed until the Soviet-German pact, that the Soviet regime on the
whole is a “progressive thing,” that the repugnant features of the
bureaucracy (“well naturally they exist!”) will progressively slough
away and that peaceful and painless “progress” is thus assured.

A vulgar petty-bourgeois radical is similar to a liberal “progressive”
in that he takes the USSR as a whole, failing to understand its internal
contradictions and dynamics. When Stalin concluded an alliance with
Hitler, invaded Poland, and now Finland, the vulgar radicals triumphed;
the identity of the methods of Stalinism and fascism was proved They
found themselves in difficulties however when the new authorities
invited the population to expropriate the landowners and
capitalists-they had not foreseen this possibility at all! Meanwhile the
social revolutionary measures, carried out via bureaucratic military
means, not only did not disturb _our_, dialectic, definition of the USSR
as a degenerated workers’ state, but gave it the most incontrovertible
corroboration. Instead of utilizing this triumph of Marxian analysis for
persevering agitation, the petty-bourgeois oppositionists began to shout
with criminal light-mindedness that the events have refuted our
prognosis, that our old formulas are no longer applicable, that new
words are necessary. What words? They haven’t decided yet themselves.

 

Defense of the USSR

We began with philosophy and then went to sociology. It became clear
that in both spheres, of the two leading personalities of the
opposition, one had taken an anti-Marxian, the other an eclectic
position. If we now consider politics, particularly the question of the
defense of the USSR, we will find that just as great surprises await us.

The opposition discovered that our formula of “unconditional defense of
the USSR,” the formula of our program, is “vague, abstract and out-moded
(!?).” Unfortunately they do not explain under what future “conditions”
they are ready to defend the conquests of the revolution. In order to
give at least an ounce of sense to their new formula, the opposition
attempts to represent the matter as if up to now we had
“unconditionally” defended the international policy of the Kremlin
government with its Red Army and GPU. Everything is turned upside down!
In reality for a long time we have not defended the Kremlin’s
international policy, not even conditionally, particularly since the
time that we openly proclaimed the necessity of crushing the Kremlin
oligarchy through insurrection! A wrong policy not only mutilates the
current tasks but also compels one to represent his own past in a false
light.

In the above-quoted article in the NEW INTERNATIONAL, Burnham and
Shachtman cleverly labeled the group of disillusioned intellectuals “The
League of Abandoned Hopes,” and persistently asked what would be the
position of this deplorable League in case of military conflict between
a capitalistic country and the Soviet Union. “We take this occasion,
therefore,” they wrote. “to demand from Hook, Eastman and Lyons
_unambiguous_ declarations on the question of defense of the Soviet
Union from attack by Hitler or Japan – or for that matter by England
...” Burnham and Shachtman did not lay down any “conditions,” they did
not specify any “concrete” circumstances, and at the same time they
demanded an “unambiguous” reply. “... Would the League (of Abandoned
Hopes) also refrain from taking a position or would it declare itself
neutral?” they continued; “In a word, is it for the defense of the
Soviet Union from imperialist attack, _regardless and in spite of the
Stalinist regime_?” (My emphasis.) A quotation to marvel at! And this is
exactly what our program declares. Burnham and Shachtman in January 1939
stood in favor of unconditional defense of the Soviet Union and defined
the significance of unconditional defense entirely correctly as
“regardless and in spite of the Stalinist regime.” And yet this article
was written when the experience of the Spanish Revolution had already
been drained to completion. Comrade Cannon is absolutely right when he
says that the role of Stalinism in Spain was incomparably more criminal
than in Poland or Finland. In the first case the bureaucracy through
hangman s methods strangled a socialist revolution. In the second case
it gives an impulse to the socialist revolution through bureaucratic
methods. Why did Burnham and Shachtman themselves so unexpectedly shift
to the position of the “League of Abandoned Hopes”? Why? We cannot
consider Shachtman’s super-abstract references to the “concreteness of
events” as an explanation. Nevertheless, it is not difficult to find an
explanation. The Kremlin’s participation in the Republican camp in Spain
was supported by the bourgeois democrats all over the world. Stalin’s
work in Poland and Finland is met with frantic condemnation from the
same democrats. In spite of all its noisy formulas the opposition
happens to be a reflection inside the Socialist Workers Party of the
moods of the “left” petty bourgeoisie. This fact unfortunately is
incontrovertible.

“Our subjects,” wrote Burnham and Shachtman about the League of
Abandoned Hopes, “take great pride in believing that they are
contributing something ‘fresh,’ that they are ‘re-evaluating in the
light of new experiences,’ that they are ‘not dogmatists’
(’conservatives’? – _L.T._) who refuse to re-examine their ‘basic
assumption’, etc. What a pathetic self-deception! None of them has
brought to light any new facts, given any new understanding of the
present or future.” Astonishing quotation! Should we not add a new
chapter to their article, _Intellectuals in Retreat_? I offer comrade
Shachtman my collaboration ...

How is it possible that outstanding individuals like Burnham and
Shachtman, unconditionally devoted to the cause of the proletariat,
could become so frightened of the not so frightening gentlemen of the
League of Abandoned Hopes! On the purely theoretical plane the
explanation in respect to Burnham rests in his incorrect method, in
respect to Shachtman in his disregard for method. Correct method not
only facilitates the attainment of a correct conclusion, but, connecting
every new conclusion with the preceding conclusions in a consecutive
chain, fixes the conclusions in one’s memory. If political conclusions
are made empirically, if inconsistency is proclaimed as a kind of
advantage, then the Marxian system of politics is invariably replaced by
impressionism – in so many ways characteristic of petty-bourgeois
intellectuals. Every new turn of events catches the
empiricist-impressionist unawares, compels him to forget what he himself
wrote yesterday, and produces a consuming desire for new formulas before
new ideas have appeared in his head.

 

The Soviet-Finnish War

The resolution of the opposition upon the question of the Soviet-Finnish
war is a document which could be signed, perhaps with slight changes, by
the Bordigists, Vereecken, Sneevliet, Fenner Brockway, Marceau Pivert
and the like, but in no case by Bolshevik-Leninists. Based exclusively
on features of the Soviet bureaucracy and on the mere fact of the
“invasion” the resolution is void of the slightest social content. It
places Finland and the USSR on the same level and unequivocally
“condemns, rejects and opposes _both_ governments and their armies.”
Having noticed, however, that something was not in order, the resolution
unexpectedly and without any connection with the text adds: “In the
application (!) of this perspective, the Fourth International will, of
course (how marvelous is this “of course”), take into account (!) the
differing economic relations in Finland and Russia.” Every word is a
pearl. By “concrete” circumstances our lovers of the “concrete” mean the
military situation, the moods of the masses and in the third place the
opposed economic regimes. As to just how these three “concrete”
circumstances will be “taken into account,” the resolution doesn’t give
the slightest inkling. If the opposition opposes equally “both
governments and their armies” in relation to this war, how will it “take
how will it “take into account” the differences in the military
situation and the social regimes? Definitely nothing of this is
comprehensible.

In order to punish the Stalinists for their unquestionable crimes, the
resolution, following the petty-bourgeois democrats of all shadings,
does not mention by so much as a word that the Red Army in Finland
expropriates large land-owners and introduces workers’ control while
preparing for the expropriation of the capitalists.

Tomorrow the Stalinists will strangle the Finnish workers. But now they
are giving – they are compelled to give – a tremendous impulse to the
class struggle in its sharpest form. The leaders of the opposition
construct their policy not upon the “concrete” process that is taking
place in Finland, but upon democratic abstractions and noble sentiments.

The Soviet-Finnish war is apparently beginning to be supplemented by a
civil war in which the Red Army finds itself at the given stage in the
same camp as the Finnish petty peasants and the workers, while the
Finnish army enjoys the support of the owning classes, the conservative
labor bureaucracy and the Anglo-Saxon imperialists. The hopes which the
Red Army awakens among the Finnish poor will, unless international
revolution intervenes, prove to be an illusion; the collaboration of the
Red Army with the poor will be only temporary; the Kremlin will soon
turn its weapons against the Finnish workers and peasants. We know all
this now and we say it openly as a warning. But in this “concrete” civil
war that is taking place on Finnish territory, what “concrete” position
must the “concrete” partisans of the Fourth International take? If they
fought in Spain in the Republican camp in spite of the fact that the
Stalinists were strangling the socialist revolution, all the more must
they participate in Finland in that camp where the Stalinists are
compelled to support the expropriation of the capitalists.

Our innovators cover the holes in their position with violent phrases.
They label the policy of the USS~R “imperialist.” Vast enrichment of the
sciences! Beginning from now on both the foreign policy of
finance-capital and the policy of exterminating finance-capital will be
called imperialism. This will help significantly in the clarification
and class education of the workers But simultaneously – will shout the,
let us say, very hasty Stanley – the Kremlin supports the policy of
finance-capital in Germany! This objection is based on the substitution
of one problem for another, in the dissolving of the concrete into the
abstract (the usual mistake of vulgar thought).

If Hitler tomorrow were forced to send arms to the insurrectionary
Indians, must the revolutionary German workers oppose this concrete
action by strikes or sabotage? On the contrary they must make sure that
the insurrectionists receive the arms as soon as possible. We hope that
_this_ is clear to Stanley. But this example is purely hypothetical. We
used it in order to show that even a fascist government of
finance-capital can under certain conditions be forced to support a
_national_ revolutionary movement (in order to attempt to strangle it
the next day). Hitler would never under any circumstances support a
proletarian revolution for instance in France. As for the Kremlin it is
at the present time forced – and this is not a hypothetical but a real
situation – to provoke a social revolutionary movement in Finland (in
order to attempt to strangle it politically tomorrow). To cover a given
social revolutionary movement with the all-embracing term of imperialism
only because it is provoked, mutilated and at the same time strangled by
the Kremlin merely testifies to one’s theoretical and political poverty.

It is necessary to add that the stretching of the concept of
“imperialism” lacks even the attraction of novelty. At present not only
the “democrats” but also the bourgeoisie of the democratic countries
describe Soviet policy as imperialist. The aim of the bourgeoisie is
transparent – to erase the social contradictions between capitalistic
and Soviet expansion, to hide the problem of property, and in this way
to help genuine imperialism. What is the aim of Shachtman and the
others? They don’t know themselves. Their terminological novelty
objectively leads them away from the Marxian terminology of the Fourth
International and brings them close to the terminology of the
“democrats.” This circumstance, alas, again testifies to the
opposition’s extreme sensitivity to the pressure of petty-bourgeois
public opinion.

 

“The Organizational Question”

From the ranks of the opposition one begins to hear more frequently:
“The Russian question isn’t of any decisive importance in and of itself;
the most important task is to change the party regime.” Change in
regime, it is necessary to understand, means a change in leadership, or
more precisely, the elimination of Cannon and his close collaborators
from directing posts. These clamorous voices demonstrate that the
tendency towards a struggle against “Cannon’s faction” preceded that
“concreteness of events” to which Shachtman and others refer in
explaining their change of position. At the same time these voices
remind us of a whole series of past oppositional groups who took up a
struggle on different occasions; and who, when the principled basis
began to crumble under their feet, shifted to the so – called
“organizational question” – the case was identical with Molinier,
Sneevliet, Vereecken and many others. As disagreeable as these
precedents may appear, it is impossible to pass over them.

It would be incorrect, however, to believe that the shifting of the
struggle to the “organizational question” represents a simple “maneuver”
in the factional struggle. No, the inner feelings of the opposition tell
them, in truth, however confusedly, that the issue concerns not only the
“Russian problem” but rather the entire approach to political problems
in general, including also the methods of building the party. And this
is in a certain sense correct.

We too have attempted above to prove that the issue concerns not only
the Russian problem but even more the opposition’s method of thought,
which has its social roots. The opposition is under the sway of
petty-bourgeois moods and tendencies. This is the essence of the whole
matter.

We saw quite clearly the ideological influence of another class in the
instances of Burnham (pragmatism) and Shachtman (eclecticism). We did
not take into consideration other leaders such as comrade Abern because
he generally does not participate in principled discussions, limiting
himself to the plane of the “organizational question.” This does not
mean, however, that Abern has no importance. On the contrary, it is
possible to say that Burnham and Shachtman are the amateurs of the
opposition, while Abern is the unquestionable professional. Abern and
only he, has his own traditional group which grew out of the old
Communist Party and became bound together during the first period of the
independent existence of the “Left Opposition.” All the others who hold
various reasons for criticism and discontent cling to this group.

Any serious factional fight in a party is always in the final analysis a
reflection of the class struggle. The Majority faction established from
the beginning the ideological dependence of the opposition upon
petty-bourgeois democracy. The opposition, on the contrary, precisely
because of its petty-bourgeois character, does not even attempt to look
for the social roots of the hostile camp.

The opposition opened up a severe factional fight which is now
paralyzing the party at a very critical moment. That such a fight could
be justified and not pitilessly condemned, very serious and deep
foundations would be necessary. For a Marxist such foundations can have
only a class character. Before they began their bitter struggle, thc
leaders of the opposition were obligated to ask themselves this
question: What non-proletarian class influence is reflected in the
majority of the National Committee? Nevertheless, the opposition has not
made the slightest attempt at such a class evaluation of the
divergences. It sees only “conservatism,” “errors,” “bad methods” and
similar psychological, intellectual and technical deficiencies. The
opposition is not interested in the class nature of the opposition
faction, just as it is not interested in the class nature of the USSR.
This fact alone is sufficient to demonstrate the petty-bourgeois
character of the opposition, with its tinge of academic pedantry and
journalistic impressionism.

In order to understand what classes or strata are reflected in the
factional fight, it is necessary to study the fight of both factions
historically. Those members of the opposition who affirm that the
present fight has “nothing in common” with the old factional struggles,
demonstrate once again their superficial attitude toward the life of
their own party. The fundamental core of the opposition is the same
which three years ago grouped itself around Muste and Spector. The
fundamental core of the Majority is the same which grouped itself around
Cannon. Of the leading figures only Shachtman and Burnham have shifted
from one camp to the other. But these personal shifts, important though
they might be, do not change the general character of the two groups. I
will not go into the historical sequence of the faction fight, referring
the reader to the in every respect excellent article by Joseph Hansen,
_Organizational Methods and Political Principles_.

If we subtract everything accidental, personal and episodical, if we
reduce the present groupings in struggle to their fundamental political
types, then indubitably the struggle of comrade Abern against comrade
Cannon has been the most consistent. In this struggle Abern represents a
propagandistic group, petty-bourgeois in its social composition, united
by old personal ties and having almost the character of a family. Cannon
represents the proletarian party in process of formation. The historical
right in this struggle – independent of what errors and mistakes might
have been made – rests wholly on the side of Cannon.

When the representatives of the opposition raised the hue and cry that
the “leadership is bankrupt,” “the prognoses did not turn out to be
correct,” “the events caught us unawares,” “it is necessary to change
our slogans,” all this without the slightest effort to think the
questions through seriously, they appeared fundamentally as party
defeatists. This deplorable attitude is explained by the irritation and
fright of the old propagandistic circle before the new tasks and the new
party relations. The sentimentality of personal ties does not want to
yield to the sense of duty and discipline. The task that stands before
the party is to break up the old clique ties and to dissolve the best
elements of the propagandistic past in the proletarian party. It is
necessary to develop such a spirit of party patriotism that nobody dare
say: “The reality of the matter is not the Russian question but that we
feel more easy and comfortable under Abern’s leadership than under
Cannon’s.”

I personally did not arrive at this conclusion yesterday. I happened to
have expressed it tens and hundreds of times in conversations with
members of Abern’s group. I invariably emphasized the petty-bourgeois
composition of this group. I insistently and repeatedly proposed to
transfer from membership to candidacy such petty-bourgeois
fellow-travelers as proved incapable of recruiting workers for the
party. Private letters, conversations and admonitions as has been shown
by subsequent events have not led to anything – people rarely learn from
someone else’s experience. The antagonism between the two party layers
and the two periods of its development rose to the surface and took on
the character of bitter factional struggle. Nothing remains but to give
an opinion, clearly and definitely, to the American section and the
whole International. “Friendship is friendship but duty is duty” – says
a Russian proverb.

The following question can be posed: If the opposition is a
petty-bourgeois tendency does that signify further unity is impossible?
Then how reconcile the petty-bourgeois tendency with the proletarian? To
pose the question like this means to judge one-sidedly, undialectically
and thus falsely. In the present discussion the opposition has clearly
manifested its petty-bourgeois features. But this does not mean that the
opposition has no other features. The majority of the members of the
opposition are deeply devoted to the cause of the proletariat and are
capable of learning. Tied today to a petty-bourgeois milieu they can
tomorrow tie themselves to the proletariat. The inconsistent ones, under
the influence of experience, can become more consistent. When the party
embraces thousands of workers even the professional factionalists can
re-educate themselves in the spirit of proletarian discipline. It is
necessary to give them time for this. That is why comrade Cannon’s
proposal to keep the discussion free from any threats of split,
expulsions, etc., was absolutely correct and in place.

Nevertheless, it remains not less indubitable that if the party as a
whole should take the road of the opposition it could suffer complete
destruction. The present opposition is incapable of giving the party
Marxian leadership. The majority of the present National Committee
expresses more consistently, seriously and profoundly the proletarian
tasks of the party than the Minority. Precisely because of this the
Majority can have no interest in directing the struggle toward
split-correct ideas will win. Nor can the healthy elements of the
opposition wish a split – the experience of the past demonstrates very
clearly that all the different kinds of improvised groups who split from
the Fourth International condemned themselves to sterility and
decomposition. That is why it is possible to envisage the next party
convention without any fear. It will reject the anti-Marxian novelties
of the opposition and guarantee party unity.

December 15, 1939



A LETTER TO JOHN G. WRIGHT


 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

First Published: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENSE OF MARXISM, New York 1942.
Checked against: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENCE OF MARXISM, London 1966, p.81.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

December 19, 1939

Dear Friend,

I read your letter to Joe. I endorse completely your opinion about the
necessity for a firm even implacable theoretical and political fight
against the petty-bourgeois tendencies of the opposition. You will see
from my last article, which will be air-mailed to you to-morrow, that I
characterize the divergence’s of the opposition even more sharply than
has the majority. But at the same time, I believe that the implacable
ideological fight should go parallel with very cautious and wise
organizational tactics. You have not the slightest interest in a split,
even if the opposition should become, accidentally, a majority at the
next convention. You have not the slightest reason to give the
heterogeneous and unbalanced army of the opposition a pretext for a
split. Even as an eventual minority, you should in my opinion remain
disciplined and loyal towards the party as a whole. It is extremely
important for the education in genuine party patriotism, about the
necessity of which Cannon wrote me one time very correctly.

A majority composed of this opposition would not last more than a few
months. Then the proletarian tendency of the party will again become the
majority with tremendously increased authority. Be extremely firm but
don’t lose your nerve – this applies now more than ever to the strategy
of the proletarian wing of the party.

With best comradely greetings and wishes,

Yours,
LEON TROTSKY
_Coycacan, D.F._

P.S. The evils came from: (1) Bad composition especially of the most
important New York branch; (2) Lack of experience especially by the
members who came over from the Socialist Party (Youth). To overcome
these difficulties inherited from the past is not possible by
exceptional measures. Firmness and patience are necessary.

L.T.



A LETTER TO MAX SHACHTMAN [1]


 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

First Published: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENSE OF MARXISM, New York 1942.
Checked against: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENCE OF MARXISM, London 1966, p.82.
All footnotes stem from the latter edition.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

December 20, 1939

Dear Comrade Shachtman

I am sending you a copy of my last article. [2]You will see from my
polemics that I consider the divergences as of decisive character. I
believe that you are on the wrong side of the barricades, my dear
friend. By your position you give courage to all the petty-bourgeois and
anti-Marxist elements to fight our doctrine, our program, and our
tradition. I don’t hope to convince you with these lines, but I do
express the prognosis that if you refuse now to find a way towards
collaboration with the Marxist wing against the petty-bourgeois
revisionists, you will inevitably deplore for years and years the
greatest error of your life.

If I had the possibility I would immediately take an airplane to New
York City in order to discuss with you for 48 or 72 hours
uninterruptedly. I regret very much that you don’t feel in this
situation the need to come here to discuss the questions with me. Or do
you? I should be happy.

L. TROTSKY, _Coyoacan, D.F._

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. This letter was written by Trotsky in English.

2. The article referred to is _A Petty-Bourgeois Opposition in the
Socialist Workers Party_. – _Ed._



FOUR LETTERS TO THE NATIONAL COMMITTEE MAJORITY [1]


 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

First Published: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENSE OF MARXISM, New York 1942.
Checked against: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENCE OF MARXISM, London 1966,
pp.83-88.
All footnotes stem from the latter edition.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Coyoacan, D.F.
December 26, 1939

Dear Friends,

I was previously disposed in favor of transmitting the discussion in the
SOCIALIST APPEAL and the NEW INTERNATIONAL, but I must recognize that
your arguments are very serious especially in connection with the
arguments of Comrade Burnham. [2]

The NEW INTERNATIONAL and SOCIALIST APPEAL are not instruments of the
discussion under the control of a special discussion committee, but
rather instruments of the Party and its National Committee. In the
discussion bulletin the opposition can ask for equal rights with the
majority, but the official party publications have the duty to defend
the point of view of the Party and the Fourth International until they
are changed. A discussion on the pages of the official party
publications can be conducted only within the limits established by the
majority of the National Committee. It is so self-evident that arguments
are not necessary.

The permanent juridical guarantees for the minority surely are not
borrowed from the Bolshevik experience. But they are also not an
invention of Comrade Burnham; the French Socialist Party has had for a
long time such constitutional guarantees which correspond completely to
the spirit of envious literary and parliamentary cliques, but never
prevent the subjugation of the workers by the coalition of these
cliques.

The organizational structure of the proletarian vanguard must be
subordinated to the positive demands of the revolutionary fight and not
to the negative guarantees against their degeneration. If the Party is
not fit for the needs of the socialist revolution, it would degenerate
in spite of the wisest juridical stipulations. On the organizational
field, Burnham shows a complete lack of revolutionary conception of the
party, as he showed it on the political field in the small but very
significant question of the Dies Committee. In both cases he proposes a
purely negative attitude, as, in the question of the Soviet State, he
gave a purely negative definition. It is not sufficient to dislike the
capitalist society (a negative attitude), it is necessary to accept all
the practical conclusions of a social revolutionary conception. Alas,
this is not the case of Comrade Burnham.

My practical conclusions?

First, it is necessary to officially condemn before the Party the
attempt to annihilate the party line by putting the party program on the
same level with every innovation not accepted by the Party.

Second, if the National Committee finds it necessary to devote one issue
of the NEW INTERNATIONAL to the discussion (I don’t propose it now), it
should be done in such a way that the reader sees where the party
position is and where the attempt at revision, and that the last word
remain with the majority and not with the opposition.

Third, if the internal bulletins are not sufficient, it would be
possible to publish a special symposium of articles devoted to the
agenda of the convention.

The fullest loyalty in the discussion, but not the slightest concession
to the petty bourgeois, anarchistic spirit!

W. RORK [_Leon Trotsky_]

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Coyoacan, D.F.
December 27, 1939

Dear Friends,

I must confess that your communication about the insistences of Comrades
Burnham and Shachtman concerning the publication of the controversial
articles in the New International and the Socialist Appeal in the first
moment surprised me. What can be the reason, I asked myself. That they
feel so sure of their position is completely excluded. Their arguments
are of a very primitive nature, the contradictions between themselves
are sharp and they cannot help but feel that the majority represents the
tradition and the Marxist doctrine. They can’t hope to issue victorious
from a theoretical fight; not only Shachtman and Abern but also Burnham
must understand it. What is then the source of their thirst for
publicity? The explanation is very simple: they are impatient to justify
themselves before the democratic public opinion, to shout to all the
Eastmans, Hooks and the others that they, the opposition, are not so bad
as we. This inner necessity must be especially imperative with Burnham.
It is the same kind of inner capitulation which we observed in Zinoviev
and Kamenev on the eve of the October Revolution and by many
“internationalists” under the pressure of the patriotic war wave. If we
make abstractions from all the individual peculiarities, accidents or
misunderstandings and errors, we have before us the first social
patriotic sin-fall in our own party. You established this fact correctly
from the beginning, but it appears to me in full clarity only now after
they proclaimed their wish to announce – as the Poumists, Pivertists and
many others – that they are not so bad as the “Trotskyites.”

This consideration is a supplementary argument against any concession to
them in this field. Under the given conditions, we have the full right
to say to them: you must wait for the verdict of the party and not
appeal before the verdict is pronounced to the democratic patriotic
judges.

I considered the question previously too abstractly, namely, only from
the point of view of the theoretical fight, and from this point of view
I agree completely with Comrade Goldman that we could only win. But the
larger political criterion indicates that we should eliminate the
premature intervention of the democratic patriotic factor in our inner
party fight and that the opposition should reckon in the discussion only
on their own strength as the majority does. Under these conditions the
test and the selection of different elements of the opposition would
have a more efficient character and the results would be more favorable
for the party.

Engels spoke one time about the mood of the enraged petty-bourgeois. It
seems to me that a trace of this mood can be found in the ranks of the
opposition. Yesterday many of them were hypnotized by the Bolshevik
tradition. They never absorbed it innerly but didn’t dare to challenge
it openly. But Shachtman and Abern gave them this kind of courage and
now they openly enjoy the mood of the enraged petty-bourgeois. This is
the impression, for example, which I received from the last articles and
letters of Stanley. He has lost totally his self-criticism and believes
sincerely that every inspiration which visits his brain is worthy of
being proclaimed and printed if only it is directed against the program
and tradition of the party. The crime of Shachtman and Abern consists
especially in having provoked such an explosion of petty-bourgeois
self-satisfaction.

W. RORK [_Leon Trotsky_]

P.S. It is absolutely sure that the Stalinist agents are working in our
midst with the purpose to sharpen the discussion and provoke a split. It
would be necessary to check many factional “fighters” from this special
point of view.

W.R.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Jan. 3, 1940

Dear Friends,

I received the two documents of the opposition [3], studied that on
bureaucratic conservatism and am now studying the second on the Russian
question. What lamentable writings! It is difficult to find a sentence
expressing a correct idea or placing a correct idea in the correct
place. Intelligent and even talented people occupied an evidently false
position and push themselves more and more into a blind alley.

The phrase of Abern about the “split” can have two senses: either he
wishes to frighten you with a split as he did during the entry
discussion [4] or he wishes really to commit political suicide. In the
first case, he will of course not prevent our giving a Marxist
appreciation of the opposition politics. In the second case, nothing can
be done; if an adult person wishes to commit suicide it is difficult to
hinder him.

The reaction of Burnham is a brutal challenge to all Marxists. If
dialectics is a religion and if it is true that religion is the opium of
the people, how can he refuse to fight for liberating his own party from
this venom? I am now writing an open letter to Burnham on this question.
I don’t believe that the public opinion of the Fourth International
would permit the editor of the theoretical Marxist magazine to limit
himself to rather cynical aphorisms about the foundation of scientific
socialism. In any case, I will not rest until the anti-Marxist
conceptions of Burnham are unmasked to the end before the Party and the
International. I hope to send the open letter, at least the Russian
text, the day after tomorrow.

Simultaneously, I am writing an analysis of the two documents. Excellent
is the explanation why they agree to disagree about the Russian
question.

I grit my teeth upon losing my time in the reading of these absolutely
stale documents. The errors are so elementary that it is necessary to
make an effort to remember the necessary argument from the ABC of
Marxism.

W. RORK [_Leon Trotsky_]

Coyoacan, D.F.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Jan. 4, 1940.

Dear Friends,

I enclose a copy of my letter to Shachtman which I sent more than two
weeks ago. Shachtman didn’t even answer me. It shows the mood into which
he has pushed himself by his unprincipled fight. He makes a bloc with
the anti-Marxist Burnham and he refuses to answer my letters concerning
this bloc. The fact in itself is of course of doubtful importance but it
has an indisputable symptomatic vein. This is my reason for sending you
a copy of my letter to Shachtman.

With best wishes,
L. TROTSKY

Coyoacan, D.F.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. These letters were written by Trotsky in English.

2. The minority of the National Committee demanded that the discussion
be carried in the SOCIALIST APPEAL and the NEW INTERNATIONAL. This was
rejected by the majority. – _Ed._

3. These documents were _The War and Bureaucratic Conservatism_ and
_What Is at issue in the Dispute on the Russian Question_. – _Ed._

4. When the American Trotskyists were discussing entrance into the
Socialist Party in the first months of 1936 Abern ws bitterly opposed to
the move. – _Ed._



A LETTER TO JOSEPH HANSEN [1]


 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

First Published: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENSE OF MARXISM, New York 1942.
Checked against: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENCE OF MARXISM, London 1966,
pp.83-88.
All footnotes stem from the latter edition.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Jan. 5, 1940

Dear Joe,

Thank you for your interesting information. In the case of necessity or
of advisability, Jim could publish our correspondence and that with
Wright concerning the split matter. This correspondence shows our firm
desire to preserve the unity of the party in spite of the sharp
factional struggle. I mentioned in my letter to Wright that even as a
minority the Bolshevik wing of the party should in my opinion remain
disciplined and Jim answered that he wholeheartedly agreed with that
view. These two quotations are decisive for the matter.

Concerning my remarks about Finland in the article on the
petty-bourgeois opposition, I will say here only a few words. Is there a
principled difference between Finland and Poland – yes or no? Was the
intervention of the Red Army in Poland accompanied by civil war – yes or
no? The press of the Mensheviks who are very well informed thanks to
their friendship with Bund and with PPS èmigrès says openly that a
revolutionary wave surrounded the advance of the Red Army. And not only
in Poland but also in Rumania.

The Kremlin created the Kuusinen government with the evident purpose of
supplementing the war by civil war. There was information about the
beginning of the creation of a Finnish Red Army, about “enthusiasm” of
poor Finnish farmers in the occupied regions where the large land
properties were confiscated, and so on. What is this if not the
beginning of civil war?

The further development of the civil war depended completely upon the
advance of the Red Army. The “enthusiasm” of the people was evidently
not hot enough to produce independent insurrections of peasants and
workers under the sword of the hangman Mannerheim. The retreat of the
Red Army necessarily halted the elements of the civil war at the very
beginning.

If the imperialists help the Finnish bourgeoisie efficiently in
defending the capitalist regime, the civil war in Finland would become
for the next period impossible. But if, as is more probable, the
reinforced detachments of the Red Army more successfully penetrate into
the country, we will inevitably observe the process of civil war
paralleling the invasion.

We cannot foresee all the military episodes, the ups and downs of purely
tactical interest, but they don’t change the general “strategical” line
of events. In this case as in all others, the opposition makes a purely
conjunctural and impressionistic policy instead of a principled one.

(It is not necessary to repeat that the civil war in Finland as was the
case in Poland would have a limited, semi-stifled nature and that it
can, in the next stage, go over into a civil war between the Finnish
masses and the Moscow bureaucracy. We know this at least as clearly as
the opposition and we openly warn the masses. But we analyze the process
as it is and we don’t identify the first stage with the second One.)

With warm wishes and greetings for all friends,

L. TROTSKY

Coyoacan, D.F.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. This letter was written by Trotsky in English.



AN OPEN LETTER TO COMRADE BURNHAM


 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

First Published: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENSE OF MARXISM, New York 1942.
Checked against: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENCE OF MARXISM, London 1966,
p.91-119.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Dear Comrade:

You have expressed as your reaction to my article on the petty-bourgeois
opposition, I have been informed, that you do not intend to argue over
the dialectic with me and that you will discuss only the “concrete
questions.” “I stopped arguing about religion long ago,” you added
ironically. I once heard Max Eastman voice this same sentiment.

 

Is There Logic in Identifying Logic with Religion?

As I understand this, your words imply that the dialectic of Marx,
Engels and Lenin belongs to the sphere of religion. What does this
assertion signify? The dialectic, permit me to recall once again, is the
_logic of evolution_. Just as a machine shop in a plant supplies
instruments for all departments, so logic is indispensable for all
spheres of human knowledge. If you do not consider logic in general to
be a religious prejudice (sad to say, the self-contradictory writings of
the opposition incline one more and more toward this lamentable idea),
then just which logic do you accept? I know of two systems of logic
worthy of attention: the logic of Aristotle (formal logic) and the logic
of Hegel (the dialectic). Aristotelian logic takes as its starting point
immutable objects and phenomena. The scientific thought of our epoch
studies all phenomena in their origin, change and disintegration. Do you
hold that the progress of the sciences, including Darwinism, Marxism,
modern physics, chemistry, etc., has not influenced in any way the forms
of our thought? In other words, do you hold that in a world where
everything changes, the syllogism alone remains unchanging and eternal?
The Gospel according to St. John begins with the words: “In the
beginning was the Word,” i.e., in the beginning was Reason or the Word
(reason expressed in the word, namely, the syllogism). To St. John the
syllogism is one of the literary pseudonyms for God. If you consider
that the syllogism as immutable, i.e., has neither origin nor
development, then it signifies that to you it is the product of divine
revelation. But if you ac knowledge that the logical forms of our
thought develop in the process of our adaptation to nature, then please
take the trouble to in form us just who following Aristotle analyzed and
systematized the subsequent progress of logic. So long as you do not
clarify this point, I shall take the liberty of asserting that to
identify logic (the dialectic) with religion reveals utter ignorance and
superficiality in the basic questions of human thought.

 

Is the Revolutionist Not Obliged to Fight Against Religion?

Let us grant however that your more than presumptuous innuendo is
correct. But this does not improve affairs to your advantage. Religion,
as I hope you will agree, diverts attention away from real to fictitious
knowledge, away from the struggle for a better life to false hopes for
reward in the Hereafter. Religion is the opium of the people. Whoever
fails to struggle against religion is unworthy of bearing the name of
revolutionist. On what grounds then do you justify your refusal to fight
against the dialectic if you deem it one of the varieties of religion?

You stopped bothering yourself long ago, as you say, about the question
of religion. But you stopped only _for yourself_. In addition to you,
there exist all the others. Quite a few of them. We revolutionists never
“stop” bothering ourselves about religious questions, inasmuch as our
task consists in emancipating from the influence of religion, not only
ourselves but also the masses. If the dialectic is a religion, how is it
possible to renounce the struggle against this opium within one’s own
party?

Or perhaps you intended to imply that religion is of no political
importance? That it is possible to be religious and at the same time a
consistent communist and revolutionary fighter? You will hardly venture
so rash an assertion. Naturally, we maintain the most considerate
attitude toward the religious prejudices of a backward worker. Should he
desire to fight for our program, we would accept him as a party member;
but at the same time, our party would persistently educate him in the
spirit of materialism and atheism. If you agree with this, how can you
refuse to struggle against a “religion,” held, to my knowledge, by the
overwhelming majority of those members of your own party who are
interested in theoretical questions? You have obviously overlooked this
most important aspect of the question.

Among the educated bourgeoisie there are not a few who have broken
personally with religion, but whose atheism is solely for their own
private consumption; they keep thoughts like these to themselves but in
public often maintain that it is well the people have a religion. Is it
possible that you hold such a point of view toward your own party? Is it
possible that this explains your refusal to discuss with us the
philosophic foundations of Marxism? If that is the case, under your
scorn for the dialectic rings a note of contempt for the party.

Please do not make the objection that I have based myself on a phrase
expressed by you in private conversation, and that you are not concerned
with publicly refuting dialectic materialism. This is not true. Your
winged phrase serves only as an illustration. Whenever there has been an
occasion, for various reasons you have proclaimed your negative attitude
toward the doctrine which constitutes the theoretical foundation of our
program. This is well known to everyone in the party. In the article
“Intellectuals in Retreat,” written by you in collaboration with
Shachtman and published in the party’s theoretical organ, it is
categorically affirmed that you reject dialectic materialism. Doesn’t
the party have the right after all to know just why? Do you really
assume that in the Fourth International an editor of a theoretical organ
can confine himself to the bare declaration: “I decisively reject
dialectical materialism” – as if it were a question of a proffered
cigarette: “Thank you, I don’t smoke.” The question of a correct
philosophical doctrine, that is, a correct method of thought, is of
decisive significance to a revolutionary party just as a good machine
shop is of decisive significance to production. It is still possible to
defend the old society with the material and intellectual methods
inherited from the past. It is absolutely unthinkable that this old
society can be overthrown and a new one constructed without first
critically analyzing the current methods. If the party errs in the very
foundations of its thinking it is your elementary duty to point out the
correct road. Otherwise your conduct will be interpreted inevitably as
the cavalier attitude of an academician toward a proletarian
organization which, after all, is incapable of grasping a real
“scientific” doctrine. What could be worse than that?

 

Instructive Examples

Anyone acquainted with the history of the struggles of tendencies within
workers’ parties knows that desertions to the camp of opportunism and
even to the camp of bourgeois reaction began not infrequently with
rejection of the dialectic. Petty-bourgeois intellectuals consider the
dialectic the most vulnerable point in Marxism and at the same time they
take advantage of the fact that it is much more difficult for workers to
verify differences on the philosophical than on the political plane.
This long known fact is backed by all the evidence of experience. Again,
it is impermissible to discount an even more important fact, namely,
that all the great and outstanding revolutionists – first and foremost,
Marx, Engels, Lenin, Luxemburg, Franz Mehring – stood on the ground of
dialectic materialism. Can it be assumed that all of them were incapable
of distinguishing between science and religion? Isn’t there too much
presumptuousness on your part, comrade Burnham? The examples of
Bernstein, Kautsky and Franz Mehring are extremely instructive.
Bernstein categorically rejected the dialectic as “scholasticism” and
“mysticism.” Kautsky maintained indifference toward the question of the
dialectic, some what like comrade Shachtman. Mehring was a tireless
propagandist and defender of dialectic materialism. For decades he
followed all the Innovations of philosophy and literature, indefatigably
exposing the reactionary essence of idealism, neo-Kantianism,
utilitarianism, all forms of mysticism, etc. The political fate of these
three individuals is very well known. Bernstein ended his life as a smug
petty-bourgeois democrat Kautsky, from a centrist, became a vulgar
opportunist. As for Mehring, he died a revolutionary communist.

In Russia three very prominent academic Marxists, Struve, Bulgakov and
Berdyaev began by rejecting the philosophic doctrine of Marxism and
ended in the camp of reaction and the orthodox church. In the United
States, Eastman, Sidney Hook and their friends utilized opposition to
the dialectic as cover for their transformation from fellow travellers
of the proletariat to fellow travellers of the bourgeoisie. Similar
examples by the score could be cited from other countries. The example
of Plekhanov, which appears to be an exception, in reality only proves
the rule. Plekhanov was a remarkable propagandist of dialectic
materialism, but during his whole life he never had the opportunity of
participating in the actual class struggle. His thinking was divorced
from practice. The revolution of 1905 and subsequently the World War
flung him into the camp of petty-bourgeois democracy and forced him in
actuality to renounce dialectic materialism. During the World War
Plekhanov came forward openly as the protagonist of the Kantian
categorical imperative in the sphere of international relations: “Do not
do unto others as you would not have them do unto you.” The example of
Plekhanov only proves that dialectic materialism _in and of itself_
still does not make a man a revolutionist.

Shachtman on the other hand argues that Liebknecht left a posthumous
work against dialectic materialism which he had written in prison, Many
ideas enter a person’s mind while in prison which cannot be checked by
association with other people. Liebknecht, whom nobody, least of all
himself, considered a theoretician, became a symbol of heroism in the
world labor movement. Should any of the American opponents of the
dialectic display similar self-sacrifice and independence from
patriotism during war, we shall render what is due him as a
revolutionist. But that will not thereby resolve the question of the
dialectic method.

It is impossible to say what Liebknecht’s own final conclusions would
have been had he remained at liberty. In any case before publishing his
work, undoubtedly he would have shown it to his more competent friends,
namely, Franz Mehring and Rosa Luxemburg. It is quite probable that on
their advice he would have simply tossed the manuscript into the fire.
Let us grant however that against the advice of people far excelling him
in the sphere of theory he never the less had decided to publish his
work. Mehring, Luxemburg, Lenin and others would not of course have
proposed that lie be expelled for this from the party; on the contrary,
they would have intervened decisively in his behalf had anyone made such
a foolish proposal. But at the same time they would not have formed a
philosophical bloc with him, but rather would have differentiated
themselves decisively from his theoretical mistakes.

Comrade Shachtman’s behavior, we note, is quite otherwise. “You will
observe,” he says – and this to teach the youth(!) – “that Plekhanov was
an outstanding theoretician of dialectic materialism but ended up an
opportunist; Liebknecht was a remarkable revolutionist but he had his
doubts about dialectic materialism.” This argument if it means anything
at all signifies that dialectic materialism is of no use whatsoever to a
revolutionist. With these examples of Liebknecht and Plekhanov,
artificially torn out of history, Shachtman reinforces and “deepens” the
idea of his last year’s article, namely, that politics does not depend
on method, inasmuch as method is divorced from politics through the
divine gift of inconsistency. By falsely interpreting two “exceptions,”
Shachtman seeks to overthrow the rule. If this is the argument of a
“supporter” of Marxism, what can we expect from an opponent? The
revision of Marxism passes here into its downright liquidation; more
than that, into the liquidation of every doctrine and every method.

 

What Do You Propose Instead?

Dialectic materialism is not of course an eternal and immutable
philosophy. To think otherwise is to contradict the spirit of the
dialectic. Further development of scientific thought will undoubtedly
create a more profound doctrine into which dialectic materialism will
enter merely as structural material. However, there is no basis for
expecting that this philosophic revolution will be accomplished under
the decaying bourgeois regime, without mentioning the fact that a Marx
is not born every year or every decade. The life-and-death task of the
proletariat now consists not in _interpreting_ the world anew but in
_remaking_ it from top to bottom. In the next epoch we can expect great
revolutionists of action but hardly a new Marx. Only on the basis of
socialist culture will mankind feel the need to review the ideological
heritage of the past and undoubtedly will far surpass us not only in the
sphere of economy but also in the sphere of intellectual creation. The
regime of the Bonapartist bureaucracy in the USSR is criminal not only
because it creates an ever-growing inequality in all spheres of life but
also because it degrades the intellectual activity of the country to the
depths of the unbridled blockheads of the GPU.

Let us grant however that contrary to our supposition the proletariat is
so fortunate during the present epoch of wars and revolutions as to
produce a new theoretician or a new constellation of theoreticians who
will surpass Marxism and in particular advance logic beyond the
materialist dialectics. It goes without saying that all advanced workers
will learn from the new teachers and the old men will have to reeducate
themselves again. But in the meantime this re mains the music of the
future. Or am I mistaken? Perhaps you will call my attention to those
works which should supplant the system of dialectic materialism for the
proletariat? Were these at hand surely you would not have refused to
conduct a struggle against the opium of the dialectic. But none exist.
While attempting to discredit the philosophy of Marxism you do not
propose anything with which to replace it.

Picture to yourself a young amateur physician who proceeds to argue with
a surgeon using a scalpel that modern anatomy, neurology, etc. are
worthless, that much in them remains unclear and incomplete and that
only “conservative bureaucrats” could set to work with a scalpel on the
basis of these pseudo-sciences, etc. I believe that the surgeon would
ask his irresponsible colleague to leave the operating room. We too,
comrade Burnham, cannot yield to cheap innuendoes about the philosophy
of scientific socialism. On the contrary, since in the course of the
factional struggle the question has been posed point-blank, we shall
say, turning to all members of the party, especially the youth: Beware
of the infiltration of bourgeois skepticism into your ranks. Remember
that socialism to this day has not found higher scientific expression
than Marxism. Bear in mind that the method of scientific socialism is
dialectic materialism. Occupy yourselves with serious study! Study Marx,
Engels, Flekhanov, Lenin and Franz Mehring. This is a hundred times more
important for you than the study of tendentious, sterile and slightly
ludicrous treatises on the conservatism of Cannon. Let the present
discussion produce at least this positive result, that the youth attempt
to imbed in their minds a serious theoretical foundation for
revolutionary struggle!

 

False Political “Realism”

In your case, however, the question is not confined to the dialectic.
The remarks in your resolution to the effect that you do not now pose
for the decision of the party the question of the nature of the Soviet
state signify in reality that you _do pose_ this question, if not
juridically then theoretically and politically. Only infants can fail to
understand this. This very statement likewise has another meaning, far
more outrageous and pernicious. It means that you divorce politics from
Marxist sociology. Yet for us the crux of the matter lies precisely in
this. If it is possible to give a correct definition of the state
without utilizing the method of dialectic materialism; if it is possible
correctly to determine politics without giving a class analysis of the
state, then the question arises: Is there any need whatsoever for
Marxism?

Disagreeing among themselves on the class nature of the Soviet state,
the leaders of the opposition agree on this, that the foreign policy of
the Kremlin must be labelled “imperialist” and that the USSR cannot be
supported “unconditionally.” (Vastly substantial platform!) When the
opposing “clique” raises the question of the nature of the Soviet state
point-blank at the convention (what a crime!) you have in advance agreed
... to disagree, i.e., to vote differently. In the British “national”
government this precedent occurs of ministers who “agree to disagree,”
i.e., to vote differently. But His Majesty’s ministers enjoy this
advantage, that they are well aware of the nature of _their_ state and
can afford the luxury of disagreement on _secondary_ questions. The
leaders of the opposition are far less favorably situated. They permit
themselves the luxury of differing on the fundamental question in order
to solidarize on secondary questions. If this is Marxism and principled
politics then I don’t know what unprincipled combinationism means.

You seem to consider apparently that by refusing to discuss dialectic
materialism and the class nature of the Soviet state and by sticking to
“concrete” questions you are acting the part of a realistic politician.
This self-deception is a result of your inadequate acquaintance with the
history of the past 50 years of factional struggles in the labor
movement. In every principled conflict, without a single exception, the
Marxists invariably sought to face the party squarely with the
fundamental problems of doctrine and program, considering that only
tinder this condition could the “concrete” questions find their proper
place and proportion. On the other hand the opportunists of every shade,
especially those who had already suffered a few defeats in the sphere of
principled discussion, invariably counterpoised to the Marxist class
analysis “concrete” conjunctural appraisals which they, as is the
custom, formulated under the pressure of bourgeois democracy. Through
decades of factional struggle this division of roles has persisted. The
opposition, permit me to assure you, has invented nothing new. It is
continuing the tradition of revisionism in theory and opportunism in
politics.

Toward the close of the last century the revisionist attempts of
Bernstein, who in England came under the influence of Anglo-Saxon
empiricism and utilitarianism – the most wretched of philosophies – were
mercilessly repulsed. Whereupon the German opportunists suddenly
recoiled from philosophy and sociology. At conventions and in the press
they did not cease to berate the Marxist “pedants,” who replaced the
“concrete political questions” with general principled considerations.
Read over the records of the German social-democracy toward the close of
the last and the beginning of the present century – and you will be
astonished yourself at the degree to which, as the French say, _le mort
saisit le vif_ (the dead grip the living)!

You are not unacquainted with the great role played by ISKRA in the
development of Russian Marxism. ISKRA began with the struggle against
so-called “Economism” in the labor movement and against the Narodniki
(Party of the Social Revolutionists). The chief argument of the
“Economists” was that ISKRA floats in the sphere of theory while they,
the “Economists,” propose leading the concrete labor movement. The main
argument of the Social Revolutionists was as follows: ISKRA wants to
found a school of dialectic materialism while we want to overthrow
Czarist autocracy. It must be said that the Narodnik terrorists took
their own words very seriously: bomb in hand they sacrificed their
lives. We argued with them: “Under certain circumstances a bomb is an
excellent thing but we should first clarify our own minds.” It is
historical experience that the greatest revolution in all history was
not led by the party which started out with bombs but by the party which
started out with dialectic materialism.

When the Bolsheviks and the Mensheviks were still members of the same
party, the pre-convention periods and the convention itself invariably
witnessed an embittered struggle over the agenda. Lenin used to propose
as first on the agenda such questions as clarification of the nature of
the Czarist monarchy, the analysis of the class character of the
revolution, the appraisal of the stages of the revolution we were
passing through, etc., Martov and Dan, the leaders of the Mensheviks,
invariably objected: We are not a sociological club but a political
party; we must come to an agreement not on the class nature of Czarist
economy but on the “concrete political tasks.” I cite this from memory
but I do not run any risk of error since these disputes were repeated
from year to year and became stereotyped in character. I might add that
I personally committed not a few sins on this score myself. But I have
learned something since then.

To those enamoured with “concrete political questions” Lenin invariably
explained that our politics is not of conjunctural but of principled
character; that tactics are subordinate to strategy ; that for us the
primary concern of every political campaign is that it guide the workers
from the particular questions to the general, that it teach them the
nature of modern society and the character of its fundamental forces.
The Mensheviks always felt the need urgently to slur over principled
differences in their unstable conglomeration by means of evasions
whereas Lenin on the contrary posed principled questions point-blank.
The current arguments of the opposition against philosophy and sociology
in favor of “concrete political questions” is a belated repetition of
Dan’s arguments. Not a single new word! How sad it is that Shachtman
respects the principled politics of Marxism only when it has aged long
enough for the archives.

Especially awkward and inappropriate does the appeal to shift from
Marxist theory to “concrete political questions” sound on your lips,
comrade Burnham, for it was not I but you who raised the question of the
character of the USSR, thereby forcing me to pose the question of the
method through which the class character of the state is determined.
True enough, you withdrew your resolution. But this factional maneuver
has no objective meaning whatsoever. You draw your _political_
conclusions from your _sociological_ premise, even if you have
temporarily slipped it into your briefcase. Shachtman draws exactly the
same political conclusions without a sociological premise: he adapts
himself to you. Abern seeks to profit equally both from the hidden
premise and the absence of a premise for his “organizational”
combinations. This is the real and not the diplomatic situation in the
camp of the opposition. You proceed as an anti-Marxist; Shachtman and
Abern – as _Platonic_ Marxists. Who is worse, it is not easy to
determine.

 

The Dialectic of the Present Discussion

When confronted with the diplomatic front covering the hidden premises
and lack of premises of our opponents, we, the “conserva tives,”
naturally reply: A fruitful dispute over “concrete questions” is
possible only if you clearly specify what class premises you take as
your starting point. We are not compelled to confine ourselves to those
topics in this dispute which you have selected artificially. Should
someone propose that we discuss as “concrete” questions the invasion of
Switzerland by the Soviet fleet or the length of a tail of a Bronx
witch, then I am justified in posing in advance such questions as, does
Switzerland have a sea coast? are there witches at all?

Every serious discussion develops from the particular and even the
accidental to the general and fundamental. The inunediate causes and
motives of a discussion are of interest, in most cases, only
symptomatically. Of actual political significance are only those
problems which the discussion raises in its development. To certain
intellectuals, anxious to indict bureaucratic conservatism” and to
display their “dynamic spirit,” it might seem that questions concerning
the dialectic, Marxism, the nature of the state, centralism are raised
“artificially” and that the discussion has taken a “false” direction.
The nub of the matter however consists in this, that discussion has its
own objective logic which does not coincide at all with the sub jective
logic of individuals and groupings. The _dialectic_ character of the
discussion proceeds from the fact that its objective course is
determined by the living conflict of opposing tendencies and not by a
preconceived logical plan. The _materialist_ basis of the discussion
consists in its reflecting the pressure of different classes. Thus, the
present discussion in the SWP, like the historic process as a whole,
develops – with or without your permission, comrade Burnham – according
to the laws of dialectic materialism. There is no escape from these
laws.

 

“Science” Against Marxism and “Experiments” Against Program

Accusing your opponents of “bureaucratic conservatism” (a bare
psychological abstraction insofar as no specific social interests are
shown underlying this “conservatism"), you demand in your document that
conservative politics be replaced by “critical and experimental politics
– in a word, scientific politics.” (p.32) This statement, at first
glance so innocent and meaningless with all its pompousness, is in
itself a complete exposure. You don’t speak of Marxist politics. You
don’t speal of proletarian politics. You speak of “experimental,”
“critical,” “scientific” politics. Why this pretentious and deliberately
abstruse terminology so unusual in our ranks? I shall tell you. It is
the product of your adaptation, comrade Burnham, to bourgeois public
opinion, and the adaptation of Shachtman and Abern to your adaptation.
Marxism is no longer fashionable among the broad circles of bourgeois
intellectuals. Moreover if one should mention Marxism, God forbid, he
might be taken for a dialectic materialist. It is better to avoid this
discredited word. What to replace it with? Why, of course, with
“science,” even with Science capitalized. And science, as everybody
knows, is based on “criticism” and “experiments.” It has its own ring;
so solid, so tolerant, so unsectarian, so professorial! With this
formula one can enter any democratic salon.

Reread, please, your own statement once again: “In place of conservative
politics, we must put bold, flexible, critical and experi mental
politics – in a word, scientific politics.” You couldn’t have improved
it! But this is precisely the formula which all petty- bourgeois
empiricists, all revisionists and, last but not least, all polit ical
adventurers have counterpoised to “narrow,” “limited,” “dogmatic” and
“conservative” Marxism.

Buffon once said: The style is the man. Political terminology is not
only the man but the party. Terminology is one of the elements of the
class struggle. Only lifeless pedants can fail to understand this. In
your document you painstakingly expunge – yes, no one else but you,
comrade Burnham – not only such terms as the dialectic and materialism
but also Marxism. You are above all this. You are a man of “critical,”
“experimental” science. For exactly the same reason you culled the label
“imperialism” to describe the foreign policy of the Kremlin. This
innovation differentiates you from the too embarrassing terminology of
the Fourth International by creating less “sectarian,” less “religious,”
less rigorous formulas, common to you and – oh happy coincidence –
bourgeois democracy.

You want to experiment? But permit me to remind you that the workers’
movement possesses a long history with no lack of experience and, if you
prefer, experiments. This experience so dearly bought has been
crystallized in the shape of a definite doctrine, the very Marxism whose
name you so carefully avoid. Before giving you the right to experiment,
the party has the right to ask: What method will you use? Henry Ford
would scarcely permit a man to experiment in his plant who had not
assimilated the requisite conclusions of the past development of
industry and the innumerable experiments already carried out.
Furthermore experimental laboratories in factories are carefully
segregated from mass production. Far more impermissible even are witch
doctor experiments in the sphere of the labor movement – even though
conducted under the banner of anonymous “science.” For us the science of
the workers’ movement is Marxism. Nameless social science, Science with
a capital letter, we leave these completely at the disposal of Eastman
and his ilk.

I know that you have engaged in disputes with Eastman and in some
questions you have argued very well. But you debate with him as a
representative of your own circle and not as an agent of the class
enemy. You revealed this conspicuously in your joint article with
Shachtman when you ended up with the unexpected invitation to Eastman,
Hook, Lyons and the rest that they take advantage of the pages of the
NEW INTERNATIONAL to promulgate their views. It did not even concern you
that they might pose the question of the dialectic and thus drive you
out of your diplomatic silence.

On January 20 of last year, hence long prior to this discussion, in a
letter to comrade Shachtman I insisted on the urgent necessity of
attentively following the internal developments of the Stalinist party.
I wrote:

“It would be a thousand times more important than inviting Eastman,
Lyons and the others to present their personal sweatings. I was
wondering a bit why you gave space to Eastman’s last insignificant and
arrogant article, lie has at his disposal HARPER’S MAGAZINE, MODERN
MONTHLY, COMMON SENSE, etc. But I am absolutely perplexed that you
personally _invited_ these people to besmirch the not-so-numerous pages
of the NEW INTERNATIONAL. The perpetuation of this polemic can interest
some _petty – bourgeois intellectuals_ but not the revolutionary
elements. It is my firm conviction that a certain reorganization of the
NEW INTERNATIONAL and the SOCIALIST APPEAL is necessary: more distance
from Eastman, Lyons, etc.; and nearer to the workers and, in this sense,
to the Stalinist party.”

As always in such cases Shachtman replied inattentively and carelessly.
In actuality, the question was resolved by the fact that the enemies of
Marxism whom you invited refused to accept your invitation. This
episode, however, deserves closer attention. On the one hand, you,
comrade Burnham, bolstered by Shachtman, invite bourgeois democrats to
send in friendly explanations to be printed in the pages of our party
organ. On the other hand, you, bolstered by this same Shachtman, refuse
to engage in a debate with me over the dialectic and the class nature of
the Soviet state. Doesn’t this signify that you, together with your ally
Shachtman, have turned your faces somewhat toward the bourgeois
semi-opponents and your backs toward your own party? Abern long ago came
to the conclusion that Marxism is a doctrine to be honored but a good
oppositional combination is something far more substantial. Meanwhile,
Shachtman slips and slides downward, consoling himself with wise cracks.
I feel, however, that his heart is a trifle heavy. Upon reaching a
certain point, Shachtman will, I hope, pull himself together and begin
the upward climb again. Here is the hope that his “experimental”
factional politics will at least turn out to the profit of “Science.”

 

“An Unconscious Dialecticicm”

Using as his text my remark concerning Darwin, Shachtman has stated, I
have been informed, that you are an “unconscious dialectician.” This
ambiguous compliment contains an iota of truth Every individual is a
dialectician _to some extent or other_, in most cases, unconsciously. A
housewife knows that a certain amount of salt flavors soup agreeably,
but that added salt makes the soup unpalatable. Consequently, an
illiterate peasant woman guides her self in cooking soup by the Hegelian
law of the transformation of quantity into quality. Similar examples
from daily life could be cited without end. Even animals arrive at their
practical conclusions not only on the basis of the Aristotelian
syllogism but also on the basis of the Hegelian dialectic. Thus a fox is
aware that quadrupeds and birds are nutritious and tasty. On sighting a
hare, a rabbit, or a hen, a fox concludes: this particular creature
belongs to the tasty and nutritive type, and – chases after the prey. We
have here a complete syllogism, although the fox, we may suppose, never
read Aristotle. When the same fox, however, encounters the first animal
which exceeds it in size, for example, a wolf, it quickly concludes that
quantity passes into quality, and turns to flee. Clearly, the legs of a
fox are equipped with Hegelian tendencies, even if not fully conscious
ones. All this demonstrates, in passing, that our methods of thought,
both formal logic and the dialectic, are not arbitrary constructions of
our reason but rather expressions of the actual inter-relationships in
nature itself. In this sense, the universe throughout is permeated with
“unconscious” dialectics. But nature did not stop there. No little
development occurred before nature’s inner relationships were converted
into the language of the consciousness of foxes and men, and man was
then enabled to generalize these forms of consciousness and transform
them into logical (dialectical) categories, thus creating the
possibility for probing more deeply into the world about us.

The most finished expression to date of the laws of the dialectic which
prevail in nature and in society has been given by Hegel and Marx.
Despite the fact that Darwin was not interested in verifying his logical
methods, his empiricism – that of a genius – in the sphere of natural
science reached the highest dialectic generalizations. In this sense,
Darwin was, as I stated in my previous article, an “unconscious
dialectician.” We do not, however, value Darwin for his inability to
rise to the dialectic, but for having, despite his philosophical
backwardness, explained to us the origin of species. Engels was, it
might be pointed out, exasperated by the narrow empiricism of the
Darwinian method, although he, like Marx, immediately appreciated the
greatness of the theory of natural selection. Darwin, on the contrary,
remained, alas, ignorant of the meaning of Marx’s sociology to the end
of his life. Had Darwin come out in the press against the dialectic or
materialism, Marx and Engels would have attacked him with redoubled
force so as not to allow his authority to cloak ideological reaction.

In the attorney’s plea of Shachtman to the effect that you are an
“unconscious dialectician,” the stress must be laid on the word
_unconscious_. Shachtman’s aim (also partly unconscious) is to defend
his bloc with you by degrading dialectic materialism. For in reality,
Shachtman is saying: The difference between a “conscious” and an
“unconscious” dialectician is not so great that one must quarrel about
it. Shachtman thus attempts to discredit the Marxist method.

But the evil goes beyond even this. Very many unconscious or
semi-unconscious dialecticians exist in this world. Some of them apply
the materialist dialectic excellently to politics, even though they have
never concerned themselves with questions of method. It would obviously
be pedantic blockheadedness to attack such comrades. But it is otherwise
with you, comrade Burnham. You are an editor of the theoretical organ
whose task it is to educate the party in the spirit of the Marxist
method. Yet you are a _conscwus opponent of the dialectic_ and not at
all an _unconscious dialectician_. Even if you had, as Shachtman
insists, successfully followed the dialectic in political questions, i.
e., even if you were endowed with a dialectic “instinct,” we would still
be compelled to begin a struggle against you, because your dialectic
instinct, like other individual qualities, cannot be transmitted to
others, whereas the conscious dialectic method can, to one degree or
another, be made accessible to the entire party.

 

The Dialectic and Mr. Dies

Even if you have a dialectic instinct – and I do not undertake to judge
this – it is well-nigh stifled by academic routine and intellectual
hauteur. What we term the class instinct of the worker, accepts with
relative ease the dialectic approach to questions. There can be no talk
of such a class instinct in a bourgeois intellectual. Only by
_consciously_ surmounting his petty-bourgeois spirit can an intellectual
divorced from the proletariat rise to Marxist politics. Unfortunately,
Shachtman and Abern are doing everything in their power to bar this road
to you. By their support they render you a very bad service, comrade
Burnham.

Bolstered by your bloc, which might be designated as the “League of
Factional Abandon,” you commit one blunder after another: in philosophy,
in sociology, in politics, in the organizational sphere. Your errors are
not accidental. You approach each question by isolating it, by splitting
it away from its connection with other questions, away from its
connection with social factors, and – independently of international
experience. You lack the dialectic method. Despite all your education,
in politics you proceed like a witch-doctor.

In the question of the Dies Committee your mumbo-jumbo manifested itself
no less glaringly than in the question of Finland. To my arguments in
favor of utilizing this parliamentary body, you replied that the
question should be decided not by principled considerations but by some
special circumstances known to you alone but which you refrained from
specifying. Permit me to tell you what these circumstances were: your
ideological dependence on bourgeois public opinion. Although bourgeois
democracy, in all its sections, bears full responsibility for the
capitalist regime, including the Dies Committee, it is compelled, in the
interests of this very same capitalism, shamefacedly to distract
attention away from the too naked organs of the regime. A simple
division of labor! An old fraud which still continues, however, to
operate effectively! As for the workers, to whom you refer vaguely, a
section of them, and a very considerable section, is like yourself under
the influence of bourgeois democracy. But the average worker, not
infected with the prejudices of the labor aristocracy, would joyfully
welcome every bold revolutionary word thrown in the very face of the
class enemy. And the more reactionary the institution which serves as
the arena for the combat, all the more complete is the satisfaction of
the worker. This has been proved by historical experience. Dies himself,
becoming frightened and jumping back in time, demonstrated how false
your position was. It is always better to compel the enemy to retreat
than to hide oneself without a battle.

But at this point I see the irate figure of Shachtman rising to stop me
with a gesture of protest: “The opposition bears no responsibility for
Burnham’s views on the Dies Committee. This question did not assume a
factional character,” and so forth and so on. I know all this. As if the
only thing that lacked was for the entire opposition to express itself
in favor of the tactic of boycott, so utterly senseless in this
instance! It is sufficient that the leader of the opposition, who has
views and openly expressed them, came out in favor of boycott. If you
happened to have outgrown the age when one argues about “religion,”
then, let me confess, I had considered that the entire Fourth
International had outgrown the age when abstentionism is accounted the
most revolutionary of policies. Aside from your lack of method, you
revealed in this instance an obvious lack of political sagacity. In the
given situation, a revolutionist would not have needed to discuss long
before springing through a door flung open by the enemy and making the
most of the opportunity. For those members of the opposition who
together with you spoke against participation in the Dies Committee –
and their number is not so small – it is necessary in my opinion to
arrange special elementary courses in order to explain to them the
elementary truths of revolutionary tactics which have nothing in common
with the pseudo-radical abstentionism of the intellectual circles.

 

“Concrete Political Questions”

The opposition is weakest precisely in the sphere where it imagines
itself especially strong – the sphere of day-to-day revolutionary
politics. This applies above all to you, comrade Burnham. Impotence in
the face of great events manifested itself in you as well as in the
entire opposition most glaringly in the questions of Poland, the Baltic
states and Finland. Shachtman began by discovering a philosopher’s
stone: the achievement of a simultaneous insurrection against Hitler and
Stalin in occupied Poland. The idea was splendid; it is only too bad
that Shachtman was deprived of the opportunity of putting it into
practice. The advanced workers in eastern Poland could justifiably say:
’A simultaneous insurrection against Hitler and Stalin in a country
occupied by troops might perhaps be arranged very conveniently from the
Bronx; but here, locally, it is more difficult. We should like to hear
Burnham’s and Shachtman’s answer to a ‘concrete political question’:
What shall we do between now and the coming insurrection?” In the
meantime, the commanding staff of the Soviet army called upon the
peasants and workers to seize the land and the factories. This call,
supported by armed force, played an enormous role in the life of the
occupied country. Moscow papers were filled to overflowing with reports
of the boundless “enthusiasm” of workers and poor peasants. We should
and must approach these reports with justifiable distrust: there is no
lack of lies. But it is nevertheless impermissible to close one’s eyes
to facts. The call to settle accounts with the landlords and to drive
out the capitalists could not have failed to rouse the spirit of the
hounded and crushed Ukrainian and Byelo-Russian peasants and workers who
saw in the Polish landlord a double enemy.

In the Parisian organ of the Mensheviks, who are in solidarity with the
bourgeois democracy of France and not the Fourth International, it was
stated categorically that the advance of the Red Army was accompanied by
a wave of revolutionary upsurge, echoes of which penetrated even the
peasant masses of Rumania. What adds special weight to the dispatches of
this organ is the close connection with the Mensheviks and the leaders
of the Jewish Bund, the Polish Socialist Party and other organizations
who are hostile to the Kremlin and who fled from Poland. We were
therefore completely correct when we said to the Bolsheviks in eastern
Poland:

“Together with the workers and peasants, and in the forefront, you must
conduct a struggle against the landlords and the capitalists; do not
tear yourself away from the masses, despite all their illusions, just as
the Russian revolutionists did not tear themselves away from the masses
who had not yet freed themselves from their hopes in the Czar (Bloody
Sunday, January 22, 1905) ; educate the masses in the course of the
struggle, warn them against naive hopes in Moscow, but do not tear
yourself away from them, fight in their camp, try to extend and deepen
their struggle, and to give it the greatest possible independence. Only
in this way will you prepare the coming insurrection against Stalin.”

The course of events in Poland has completely confirmed this directive
which was a continuation and a development of all our previous policies,
particularly in Spain.

Since there is no principled difference between the Polish and Finnish
situations, we can have no grounds for changing our directive. But the
opposition, who failed to understand the meaning of the Polish events,
now tries to clutch at Finland as a new anchor of salvation. “Where is
the civil war in Finland? Trotsky talks of a civil war. We have seen
nothing about it in the press,” and so on. The question of Finland
appears to the opposition as in principle different from the question of
western Ukraine and Byelo-Russia. Each question is isolated and viewed
aside and apart from the general course of development. Confounded by
the course of events, the opposition seeks each time to support itself
on some accidental, secondary, temporary and conjunctural circumstances.

Do these cries about the absence of civil war in Finland signify that
the opposition would adopt our policy if civil war were actually to
unfold in Finland? Yes or no? If yes, then the opposition thereby
condemns its own policy in relation to Poland, since there, despite the
civil war, they limited themselves to refusal to participate in the
events, while they waited for a simultaneous uprising against Stalin and
Hitler. It is obvious, comrade Burnham, that you and your allies have
not thought this question through to the end.

What about my assertion concerning a civil war in Finland? At the very
inception of military hostilities, one might have conjectured that
Moscow was seeking through a “small” punitive expedition to bring about
a change of government in Helsingfors and to establish the same
relations with Finland as with the other Baltic states. But the
appointment of the Kuunsinen government in Terrijoki demonstrated that
Moscow had other plans and aims. Dispatches then reported the creation
of a Finnish “Red Army.” Natu rally, it was only a question of small
formations set up from above. The program of Kuusinen was issued. Next
the dispatches appeared of the division of large estates among poor
peasants. In their totality, these dispatches signified an attempt on
the part of Moscow to organize a civil war. Naturally, this is a civil
war of a special type. It does not arise spontaneously from the depths
of the popular masses. It is not conducted under the leadership of the
Finnish revolutionary party based on mass support. It is introduced on
bayonets from without. It is controlled by the Moscow bureaucracy. All
this we know, and we dealt with all this in discussing Poland.
Nevertheless, it is precisely a question of civil war, of an appeal to
the lowly, to the poor, a call to them to expropriate the rich, drive
them out, arrest them, etc. I know of no other name for these actions
except civil war.

“But, after all, the civil war in Finland did not unfold,” object the
leaders of the opposition. “This means that your predictions did not
materialize.” With the defeat and the retreat of the Red Army, I reply,
the civil war in Finland cannot, of course, unfold under the bayonets of
Mannerheim. This fact is an argument not against me but against
Shachtman; since it demonstrates that in the first stages of war, at a
time when discipline in armies is still strong, it is much easier to
organize insurrection, and on two fronts to boot, from the Bronx than
from Terrijoki.

We did not foresee the defeats of the first detachments of the Red Army.
We could not have foreseen the extent to which stupidity and
demoralization reign in the Kremlin and in the tops of the army beheaded
by the Kremlin. Nevertheless, what is involved is only a military
episode, which cannot determine our political line. Should Moscow, after
its first unsuccessful attempt, refrain entirely from any further
offensive against Finland, then the very question which today obscures
the entire world situation to the eyes of the opposition would be
removed from the order of the day. But there is little chance for this.
On the other hand, if England, France and the United States, basing
themselves on Scandinavia, were to aid Finland with military force, then
the Finnish question would be submerged in a war between the USSR and
the imperialist countries. In this case, we must assume that even a
majority of the oppositionists would remind themselves of the program of
the Fourth International.

At the present time, however, the opposition is not interested in these
two variants: either the suspension of the offensive on the part of the
USSR, or the outbreak of hostilities between the USSR and the
imperialist democracies. The opposition is interested only in the
isolated question of the USSR’s invasion of Finland. Very well, let us
take this as our starting point. If the second offensive, as may be
assumed, is better prepared and conducted, then the advance of the Red
Army into the country will again place the question of civil war on the
order of the day, and moreover on a much broader scale than during the
first and ignominiously unsuccessful attempt. Our directive,
consequently, remains completely valid so long as the question itself
remains on the agenda. But what does the opposition propose in the event
the Red Army successfully advances into Finland and civil war unfolds
there? The opposition apparently doesn’t think about this at all, for
they live from one day to the next, from one incident to another,
clutching at episodes, clinging to isolated phrases in an editorial,
feeding on sympathies and antipathies, and thus creating for themselves
the semblance of a platform. The weakness of empiricists and
impressionists is always revealed most glaringly in their approach to
“concrete political questions.”

 

Theoretical Bewilderment and Political Abstentionism

Throughout all the vacillations and convulsions of the opposition,
contradictory though they may be, two general features run like a
guiding thread from the pinnacles of theory down to the most trifling
political episodes. The first general feature is the absence of a
unified conception. The opposition leaders split sociology from
dialectic materialism. They split politics from sociology. In the sphere
of politics they split our tasks in Poland from our experience in Spain
– our tasks in Finland from our position on Poland. History becomes
transformed into a series of exceptional incidents; politics becomes
transformed into a series of improvisations. We have here, in the full
sense of the term, the disintegration of Marxism, the disintegration of
theoretical thought, the disintegration of politics into its constituent
elements. Empiricism and its foster-brother, impressionism, dominate
from top to bottom. That is why the ideological leadership, comrade
Burnham, rests with you as an opponent of the dialectic, as an
empiricist, unabashed by his empiricism.

Throughout the vacillations and convulsions of the opposition, there is
a second general feature intimately bound to the first, namely, a
tendency to refrain from active participation, a tendency to
self-elimination, to abstentionism, naturally under cover of
ultra-radical phrases. You are in favor of overthrowing Hitler and
Stalin in Poland; Stalin and Mannerheim in Finland. And until then, you
reject both sides _equally_, in other words, you withdraw from the
struggle, including the civil war. Your citing the absence of civil war
in Finland is only an accidental conjunctural argument. Should the civil
war unfold, the opposition will attempt not to notice it, as they tried
not to notice it in Poland, or they will declare that inasmuch as the
policy of the Moscow bureaucracy is “imperialist” in character “we” do
not take part in this filthy business. Hot on the trail of “concrete”
political tasks in words, the opposition actually places itself outside
the historical process. Your position, comrade Burnham, in relation to
the Dies Committee merits attention precisely because it is a graphic
expression of this same tendency of abstentionism and bewilderment. Your
guiding principle still remains the same: “Thank you, I don’t smoke.”

Naturally, any man, any party and even any class can become bewildered.
But with the petty bourgeoisie, bewilderment, especially in the face of
great events, is an inescapable and, so to speak, con genital condition.
The intellectuals attempt to express their state of bewilderment in the
language of “science.” The contradictory plat form of the opposition
reflects petty-bourgeois bewilderment expressed in the bombastic
language of the intellectuals. There is nothing proletarian about it.

 

The Petty-Bourgeoisie and Centralism

In the organizational sphere, your views are just as schematic, empiric,
non-revolutionary as in the sphere of theory and politics. A Stolberg,
lantern in hand, chases after an ideal revolution, unaccompanied by any
excesses, and guaranteed against Thermidor and counter-revolution; you,
likewise, seek an ideal party democracy which would secure forever and
for everybody the possibility of saying and doing whatever popped into
his head, and which would insure the party against bureaucratic
degeneration. You overlook a trifle, namely, that the party is not an
arena for the assertion of free individuality, but an instrument of the
proletarian revolution; that only a victorious revolution is capable of
preventing the degeneration not only of the party but of the proletariat
itself and of modern civilization as a whole. You do not see that our
American section is not sick from too much centralism – it is laughable
even to talk about it – but from a monstrous abuse and distortion of
democracy on the part of petty-bourgeois elements. This is at the root
of the present crisis.

A worker spends his day at the factory. He has comparatively few hours
left for the party. At the meetings he is interested in learning the
most important things: the correct evaluation of the situation and the
political conclusions. He values those leaders who do this in the
clearest and the most precise form and who keep in step with events.
Petty-bourgeois, and especially declassed elements, divorced from the
proletariat, vegetate in an artificial and shut-in environment. They
have ample time to dabble in politics or its substitute. They pick out
faults, exchange all sorts of tidbits and gossip concerning happenings
among the party “tops.” They always locate a leader who initiates them
into all the “secrets.” Discussion is their native element. No amount of
democracy is ever enough for them. For their war of words they seek the
fourth dimension. They become jittery, they revolve in a vicious circle,
and they quench their thirst with salt water. Do you want to know the
organizational program of the opposition? It consists of a mad hunt for
the fourth dimension of party democracy. In practice this means burying
politics beneath discussion; and burying centralism beneath the anarchy
of the intellectual circles. When a few thousand workers join the party,
they will call the petty-bourgeois anarchists severely to order. The
sooner, the better.

 

Conclusions

Why do I address you and not the other leaders of the opposition?
Because you are the ideological leader of the bloc. Comrade Abern’s
faction, destitute of a program and a banner, is ever in need of cover.
At one time Shachtman served as cover, then came Muste with Spector, and
now you, with Shachtman adapting himself to you. Your ideology I
consider the expression of bourgeois influence in the proletariat.

To some comrades, the tone of this letter may perhaps seem too sharp.
Yet, let me confess, I did everything in my power to restrain myself.
For, after all, it is a question of nothing more or less than an attempt
to reject, disqualify and overthrow the theoretical foundations, the
political principles and organizational methods of our movement.

In reaction to my previous article, comrade Abern, it has been reported,
remarked: “This means split.” Such a response merely demonstrates that
Abern lacks devotion to the party and the Fourth International; he is a
circle man. In any case, threats of split will not deter us from
presenting a Marxist analysis of the differences. For us Marxists, it is
a question not of split but of educating the party. It is my firm hope
that the coming convention will ruthlessly repulse the revisionists.

The convention, in my opinion, must declare categorically that in their
attempts to divorce sociology from dialectic materialism and politics
from sociology, the leaders of the opposition have broken from Marxism
and become the transmitting mechanism for petty-bourgeois empiricism.
While reaffirming, decisively and completely, its loyalty to the Marxist
doctrine and the political and organizational methods of Bolshevism,
while binding the editorial boards of its official publications to
promulgate and defend this doctrine and these methods, the party will,
of course, extend the pages of its publications in the future to those
of its members who consider themselves capable of adding something new
to the doctrine of Marxism. But it will not permit a game of
hide-and-seek with Marxism and light-minded gibes concerning it.

The politics of a party has a class character. Without a class analysis
of the state, the parties and ideological tendencies, it is impossible
to arrive at a correct political orientation. The party must condemn as
vulgar opportunism the attempt to determine policies in relation to the
USSR from incident to incident and independently of the class nature of
the Soviet state.

The disintegration of capitalism, which engenders sharp dissatisfaction
among the petty bourgeoisie and drives its bottom layers to the left,
opens up broad possibilities but it also contains grave dangers. The
Fourth International needs only those emigrants from the petty
bourgeoisie who have broken completely with their social past and who
have come over decisively to the standpoint of the proletariat.

This theoretical and political transit must be accompanied by an actual
break with the old environment and the establishment of intimate ties
with workers, in particular, by participation in the recruitment and
education of proletarians for their party. Emigrants from the
petty-bourgeois milieu who prove incapable of settling in the
proletarian milieu must after the lapse of a certain period of time be
transferred from membership in the party to the status of sympathizers.

Members of the party untested in the class struggle must not be placed
in responsible positions. No matter how talented and de voted to
socialism an emigrant from the bourgeois milieu may be, before becoming
a teacher, he must first go to school in the working class. Young
intellectuals must not be placed at the head of the intellectual youth
but sent out into the provinces for a few years, into the purely
proletarian centers, for hard practical work.

The class composition of the party must correspond to its class program.
The American section of the Fourth International will either become
proletarian or it will cease to exist.

* * *

Comrade Burnham! If we can arrive at an agreement with you on the basis
of these principles, then without difficulty we shall find a correct
policy in relation to Poland, Finland and even India. At the same time,
I pledge myself to help you conduct a struggle against any
manifestations whatsoever of bureaucratism and conservatism. These in my
opinion are the conditions necessary to end the present crisis.

With Bolshevik greetings,
L. TROTSKY

Coyoacan, D.F.
January 7, 1940



A LETTER TO JAMES P. CANNON [1]


 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

First Published: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENSE OF MARXISM, New York 1942.
Checked against: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENCE OF MARXISM, London 1966,
p.120.
All footnotes stem from the latter edition.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

January 9, 1940

Dear Friend,

Yesterday I sent the Russian text of my new article written in the form
of a letter to Burnham. Not all comrades possibly are content with the
fact that I give the predominant place in the discussion to the matter
of dialectics. But I am sure it is now the only way to begin the
theoretical education of the Party, especially of the youth and to
inject a reversion to empiricism and eclectics.

W. RORK [_Leon Trotsky_]

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. This letter was written by Trotsky in English.



A LETTER TO FARRELL DOBBS [1]


 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

First Published: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENSE OF MARXISM, New York 1942.
Checked against: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENCE OF MARXISM, London 1966,
pp.121-122.
All footnotes stem from the latter edition.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

January 10, 1940

Dear Friend,

In my article sent for translation to Wright I don’t mention at all two
questions:

Thirst, that of bureaucratic conservatism. I believe we discussed the
matter a bit with you here. As a political tendency, bureaucratic
conservatism represents the material interests of a certain social
stratum, namely of the privileged workers’ bureaucracy in the
capitalist, especially in the imperialist states and in an incomparably
higher degree in the USSR. It would be fantastic, not to say stupid to
search for such roots of the “bureaucratic conservatism” of the
majority. If bureaucratism and conservatism are not determined by social
conditions then they represent traits in the personal characters of some
leaders. Such things occur. But how explain in this case the formation
of a faction? Is it a selection of conservative individualities? We have
here a psychological and not a political explanation. If we admit (I
personally don’t do it) that Cannon for example, has bureaucratic
tendencies, then we must inevitably reach the conclusion that the
majority supports Cannon _in spite_ of this trait and not _because_ of
it. It signifies that the question of the social foundations of the
factional fight isn’t even touched by the minority leaders.

Second, in order to compromise my “defense” of Cannon they insist that I
falsely defended Molinier. [2] I am the last to deny that I can commit
mistakes of political nature as well as of personal appreciations. But
in spite of all the argument is not very profound. I never supported the
false theories of Molinier. It was namely a question of his personal
character: brutality, lack of discipline and his private financial
affairs. Some comrades, among them Vereecken, insisted upon immediate
separation from Molinier. I insisted upon the necessity for the
organization to try to discipline Molinier. But in 1934 when Molinier
tried to replace the party program by “four slogans” and created a paper
on this basis, I was among those who proposed his expulsion. This is the
whole story. One can be of different opinion about the wisdom of my
patient conduct in regard to Molinier, however I was guided of course
not by the personal interests of Molinier, but by the interests of the
education of the party: our own sections inherited some Comintern venom
in the sense that many comrades are inclined to the abuse of such
measures as expulsion, split or threats of expulsions and splits. In the
case of Molinier as in the case of some American comrades (Field,
Weisbord and some others), I was for a more patient attitude. In several
cases I succeeded, in several others it was a failure. But I don’t
regret at all my more patient attitude towards some doubtful figures in
our movement. In any case, my “defense” of them was never a bloc at the
expense of principles. If somebody should propose, for example, to expel
Comrade Burnham, I would oppose it energetically. But at the same time,
I find it necessary to conduct the most strenuous ideological fight
against his anti-Marxist conceptions.

Yours fraternally,
L. TROTSKY

Coyoacan, D.F.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. This letter was written by Trotsky in English.

2. Molinier was one of the leading figures in the french Trotskyist
movement. He was expelled from the movemen t for gross violation of
discipline. – _Ed._



A LETTER TO JOHN G. WRIGHT [1]


 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

First Published: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENSE OF MARXISM, New York 1942.
Checked against: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENCE OF MARXISM, London 1966,
p.123.
All footnotes stem from the latter edition.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

January 13, 1940

Dear Comrade Wright,

I agree completely with your appreciation of the pamphlet of Comrade
Shachtman. [2] It is the _weak_ Shachtman multiplied by factional
passion. He lacks a small thing which is called the proletarian point of
view. He lives in the realm of literary shadows: when he stands with his
face toward the proletariat and Marxism, his shadows are useful because
they correspond more or less with reality; now he turns his back to the
proletarian majority of the party and to Marxism and as a result every
word he writes is a fantastic misinterpretation of facts and ideas. I am
obliged now to lose again a couple of days to submit his absolutely
extravagant document to a more attentive analysis. I hope to show to the
party members including the majority of the minority that Shachtman’s
document is in every line a pathetic rupture with Marxism and with
Bolshevism.

Yours fraternally,
L. TROTSKY

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. This letter was written by Trotsky in English.

2. The pamphlet referred to is _the Crisis in the American Party – An
Open Letter to Comrade Leon Trotsky_, published in Vol.II No.7 of the
INTERNAL BULLETIN, dated January 1, 1940.



A LETTER TO JAMES P. CANNON [1]


 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

First Published: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENSE OF MARXISM, New York 1942.
Checked against: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENCE OF MARXISM, London 1966,
p.124.
All footnotes stem from the latter edition.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

January 16, 1940

Dear Friend,

What miserable writing is Shachtman’s open letter. Its only merit is
that it obliged me to tell him the full truth about his politics. My
answer is already dictated, I have only to polish it. Unfortunately it
will not be shorter than my letter to Burnham.

L.T.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. This letter was written by Trotsky in English.



A LETTER TO WILLIAM F. WARDE [1]


 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

First Published: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENSE OF MARXISM, New York 1942.
Checked against: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENCE OF MARXISM, London 1966,
p.125.
All footnotes stem from the latter edition.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

January 16, 1940

Dear Comrade Warde,

You are one of the comparatively few comrades who are seriously
interested in the methodological questions of our movement. Don’t you
believe that your intervention in the discussion from _this_ point of
view would be very useful?

Friends write me that the interest for dialectical materialism in our
party, especially in the youth, is becoming very acute. Don’t you
believe that comrades who could orientate this interest should now
create some purely theoretical association with the purpose of promoting
in the party the doctrines of dialectical materialism. Yourself, Comrade
Wright, Comrade Gerland (very well acquainted with the matter) could
possibly form the nucleus of such an association, of course, under the
control of the propaganda department of the National Committee. It is,
certainly, only a vague suggestion from afar which should be discussed
with the responsible party institutions.

Yours comradely,
LEON TROTSKY

Coyoacan, D.F.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. This letter was written by Trotsky in English.



A LETTER TO JOSEPH HANSEN [1]


------------------------------------------------------------------------

First Published: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENSE OF MARXISM, New York 1942.
Checked against: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENCE OF MARXISM, London 1966,
pp.126-127.
All footnotes stem from the latter edition.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

January 18, 1940

Dear Joe,

My article against Shachtman is already written. I need now to polish it
for two days, and I will try to use some of the your quotations. But I
wish to speak here about another more important question. Some of the
leaders of the opposition are preparing a split; whereby the represent
the opposition in the future as a persecuted minority. It is very
characteristic of their state of mind. I believe we must answer them
approximately as follows:

“You are already afraid of our future repressions? We propose to you
mutual guarantees for the future minority, independently of who might be
this minority, you or we. These guarantees could be formulated in four
points: (1) No prohibition of factions; (2) No other restrictions on
factional activity than those dictated by the necessity for common
action; (3) The official publications must represent, of course, the
line established by the new convention; (4) The future minority can
have, if it wishes, an internal bulletin destined for party members, or
a common discussion bulletin with the majority.”

The continuation of discussion bulletins immediately after a long
discussion and a convention is, of course, not a rule but an exception,
a rather deplorable one. But we are not bureaucrats at all. We don’t
have immutable rules. We are dialecticians also in the organizational
field. If we have in the party an important minority which is
dissatisfied with the decisions of the convention, it is incomparably
more preferable to legalize the discussion after the convention than to
have a split.

We can go, if necessary, even further and propose to them to publish,
under the supervision of the new National Committee, special discussion
symposiums, not only for party members, but for the public in general.
We should go as far as possible in this respect in order to disarm their
at least premature complaints and handicap them in provoking a split.

For my part I believe that the prolongation of the discussion, if it is
channelized by the good will of both sides, can only serve in the
present conditions the education of the party. I believe that the
majority should make these propositions officially in the National
Committee in a written form. Whatever might be their answer, the party
could only win.

With best greetings,
CORNELL [_Leon Trotsky_]

Coyoacan, D.F.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. This letter was written by Trotsky in English.



FROM A SCRATCH – TO THE DANGER OF GANGRENE


 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

First Published: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENSE OF MARXISM, New York 1942.
Checked against: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENCE OF MARXISM, London 1966,
pp.128-187.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The discussion is developing in accordance with its own internal logic.
Each camp, corresponding to its social character and political
physiognomy, seeks to strike at those points where its opponent is
weakest and most vulnerable. It is precisely this that determines the
course of the discussion and not _a priori_ plans of the leaders of the
opposition. It is belated and sterile to lament now over the flaring up
of the discussion. It is necessary only to keep a sharp eye on the role
played by Stalinist provocateurs who are unquestionably in the party and
who are under orders to poison the atmosphere of the discussion and to
head the ideological struggle toward split. It is not so very difficult
to recognize these gentlemen; their zeal is excessive and of course
artificial; they replace ideas and arguments with gossip and slander.
They must be exposed and thrown out through the joint efforts of both
factions. But the principled struggle must be carried through to the
end, that is, to serious clarification of the more important questions
that have been posed. It is necessary to so utilize the discussion that
it raises the theoretical level of the party.

A considerable proportion of the membership of the American section as
well as our entire young International, came to us either from the
Comintern in its period of decline or from the Second International.
These are bad schools. The discussion has revealed that wide circles of
the party lack a sound theoretical education. It is sufficient, for
instance, to refer to the circumstance that the New York local of the
party did not respond with a vigorous defensive reflex to the attempts
at light-minded revision of Marxist doctrine and pro gram but on the
contrary gave support in the majority to the revisionists. This is
unfortunate but remediable to the degree that our American section and
the entire International consist of honest individuals sincerely seeking
their way to the revolutionary road. They have the desire and the will
to learn. But there is no time to lose. It is precisely the party’s
penetration into the trade unions, and into the workers’ milieu in
general that demands heightening the theoretical qualification of our
cadres. I do not mean by cadres the “apparatus” but the party as a
whole. Every party member should and must consider himself an officer in
the proletarian army.

“Since when have you become specialists in the question of philosophy?”
the oppositionists now ironically ask the majority representatives.
Irony here is completely out of place. Scientific socialism is the
conscious expression of the unconscious historical process; namely, the
instinctive and elemental drive of the proletariat to reconstruct
society on communist beginnings. These organic tendencies in the
psychology of workers spring to life with utmost rapidity today in the
epoch of crises and wars. The discussion has revealed beyond all
question a clash in the party between a petty-bourgeois tendency and a
proletarian tendency. The petty-bourgeois tendency reveals its confusion
in its attempt to reduce the program of the party to the small coin of
“concrete” questions. The proletarian tendency on the contrary strives
to correlate all the partial questions into theoretical unity. At stake
at the present time is not the extent to which individual members of the
majority consciously apply the dialectic method. What is important is
the fact that the majority as a whole pushes toward the proletarian
posing of the questions and by very reason of this tends to assimilate
the dialectic which is the “algebra of the revolution.” The
oppositionists, I am informed, greet with bursts of laughter the very
mention of “dialectics.” In vain. This unworthy method will not help.
The dialectic of the historic process has more than once cruelly
punished those who tried to jeer at it.

Comrade Shachtman’s latest article, _An Open Letter to Leon Trotsky_,”
is an alarming symptom. It reveals that Shachtman refuses to learn from
the discussion and persists instead in deepening his mistakes,
exploiting thereby not only the inadequate theoretical level of the
party, but also the specific prejudices of its petty-bourgeois wing.
Everybody is aware of the facility with which Shachtman is able to weave
various historical episodes around one or another axis. This ability
makes Shachtman a talented journalist. Unfortunately, this by itself is
not enough. The main question is what axis to select. Shachtman is
absorbed always by the reflection of politics in literature and in the
press. He lacks interest in the actual processes of the class struggle,
the life of the masses, the inter-relationships between the different
layers within the working class itself, etc. I have read not a few
excellent and even brilliant articles by Shachtman but I have never seen
a single commentary of his which actually probed into the life of the
American working class or its vanguard.

A qualification must be made to this extent – that not only Shachtman’s
personal failing is embodied therein, but the fate of a whole
revolutionary generation which because of a special conjuncture of
historical conditions grew up outside the labor movement. More than once
in the past I have had occasion to speak and write about the danger of
these valuable elements degenerating _despite_ their devotion to the
revolution. What was an inescapable characteristic of adolescence in its
day has become a weakness. Weakness invites disease. If neglected, the
disease can become fatal. To escape this danger it is necessary to open
a new chapter consciously in the development of the party. The
propagandists and journalists of the Fourth International must begin a
new chapter in their own consciousness. It is necessary to re-arm. It is
necessary to make an about-face on one’s own axis: to turn one’s back to
the petty-bourgeois intellectuals, and to face toward the workers.

To view as the cause of the present party crisis – the conservatism of
its worker section; to seek a solution to the crisis through the victory
of the petty-bourgeois bloc – it would be difficult to conceive a
mistake more dangerous to the party. As a matter of fact, the gist of
teh present crisis consists in the conservatism of the petty-bourgeois
elements who have passed through a purely propagandistic school and who
have not yet found a pathway to the road of class struggle. The present
crisis is the final battle of these elements for self-preservation.
Every oppositionist as an individual can, if he firmly desikres, find a
worthy place for himself in the revolutionary movement. As a faction
they are doomed. In the struggle that is developing, Shachtman is not in
the camp where he ought to be. As always in such cases, his strong sides
have receded into the back ground while his weak traits on the other
hand have assumed an especially finished expression. His _Open Letter_
represents, so to speak, a crystallization of his weak traits.

Shachtman has left out a trifle: his class position. Hence his
extraordinary zigzags, his improvisations and leaps. He replaces class
analysis with disconnected historical anecdotes for the sole purpose of
covering up his own shift, for camouflaging the contradiction between
his yesterday and today. This is Shachtman’s procedure with the history
of Marxism, the history of his own party, and the history of the Russian
Opposition. In carrying this out, he heaps mistakes upon mistakes. All
the historical analogies to which he resorts, speak, as we shall see,
against him.

It is much more difficult to correct mistakes than to commit them. I
must ask patience from the reader in following with me step by step all
the zigzags of Shachtman’s mental operations. For my part I promise not
to confine myself merely to exposing mistakes and Contradictions, but to
counterpoise from beginning to end the proletarian position against the
petty-bourgeois, the Marxist position against the eclectic. In this way
all of us perhaps may learn some thing from the discussion.

 

“Precedents”

“How did we, irreconcilable revolutionists, so suddenly become a
petty-bourgeois tendency ?” Shachtman demands indignantly. Where are the
proofs? “Wherein (has) this tendency manifested itself in the last year
(!) or two among the representative spokesmen of the Minority?”
(INTERNAL BULLETIN, Vol.2 No.7, Jan. 1940, p.11) Why didn’t we yield in
the past to the influence of the petty-bourgeois democracy? Why during
the Spanish Civil War did we . .. and so forth and so on. This is
Shachtman’s trump argument in beginning his polemic against me and the
one on which he plays variations in all keys, apparently investing it
with exceptional importance. It does not so much as enter Shachtman’s
mind that I can turn this very argument against him.

The opposition document, “War and Bureaucratic Conservatism,” concedes
that Trotsky is right nine times out of ten, perhaps ninety-nine times
out of a hundred. I understand only too well the qualified and extremely
magnanimous character of this concession. The proportion of my mistakes
is in reality considerably greater. How explain then the fact that two
or three weeks after this document was written, Shachtman suddenly
decided that Trotsky:

a.  Is incapable of a critical attitude toward information sup plied him
    although one of his informants for ten years has been Shachtman
    himself.
b.  Is incapable of distinguishing a proletarian tendency from a
    petty-bourgeois tendency – a Bolshevik tendency from a Menshevik
    tendency.
c.  Is champion of the absurd conception of “bureaucratic revolution” in
    place of revolution by the masses.
d.  Is incapable of working out a correct answer to concrete questions
    in Poland, Finland, etc.
e.  Is manifesting a tendency to capitulate to Stalinism.
f.  Is unable to comprehend the meaning of democratic centralism – and
    so on _ad infinitum_

In a word, during the space of two or three weeks Shachtman has
discovered that I make mistakes ninety-nine times out of a hundred,
especially where Shachtman himself happens to become involved. It occurs
to me that the latest percentage also suffers from slight exaggeration –
but this time in the opposite direction. In any event Shachtman
discovered my tendency to replace revolution by the masses with
“bureaucratic revolution” far more abruptly than I discovered his
petty-bourgeois deviation.

Comrade Shachtman invites me to present proof of the existence of a
“petty-bourgeois tendency” in the party during the past year; or even
two-three years. Shachtman is completely justified in not wishing to
refer to the more distant past. But in accordance with Shachtman’s
invitation, I shall confine myself to the last three years. Please pay
attention. To the rhetorical questions of my unsparing critic I shall
reply with a few exact documents.

I.

On May 25, 1937, I wrote to New York concerning the policy of the
Bolshevik-Leninist faction in the Socialist Party:

... I must cite two recent documents: (a) the private letter of ’Max’
about the convention, and (b) Shachtman’s article, _Towards a
Revolutionary Socialist Party_. The title of this article alone
characterizes a false perspective. It seems to me established by the
developments, including the last convention, that the party is evolving,
not into a ‘revolutionary’ party, but into a kind of ILP, that is, a
miserable centrist political abortion without any perspective.

“The affirmation that the American Socialist Party is now ‘closer to the
position of revolutionary Marxism than any party of the Second or Third
Internationals’ is an absolutely unmerited compliment: the American
Socialist Party is only more backward than the analogous formations in
Europe – the POUM, ILP, SAP, etc. ... Our duty is to unmask this
negative advantage of Norman Thomas and Co., and not to speak about the
‘superiority (of the war resolution) over any resolution ever adopted
before by the party ...’ This is a _purely literary appreciation_,
because every resolution must be taken in connection with historical
events, with the political situation and its imperative needs ...”

In both of the documents mentioned in the above letter, Shachtman
revealed excessive adaptability toward the left wing of the
petty-bourgeois democrats – political mimicry – a very dangerous symptom
in a revolutionary politician! It is extremely important to take note of
his high appraisal of the “radical” position of Norman Thomas in
relation to war ... in Europe. Opportunists, as is well known, tend to
all the greater radicalism the further removed they are from events.
With this law in mind it is not difficult to appraise at its true value
the fact that Shachtman and his allies accuse us of a tendency to
“capitulate to Stalinism.” Alas, sitting in the Bronx, it is much easier
to display irreconcilability toward the Kremlin than toward the American
petty bourgeoisie.

II.

To believe comrade Shachtman, I dragged the question of the class
composition of the factions into the dispute by the hair. Here too, let
us refer to the recent past.

On October 3, 1937, I wrote to New York:

“I have remarked hundreds of times that the worker who re mains
unnoticed in the ‘normal’ conditions of party life reveals remarkable
qualities in a change of the situation when general formulas and fluent
pens are not sufficient, where acquaintance with the life of workers and
practical capacities are necessary. Under such conditions a gifted
worker reveals a sureness of himself and reveals also his general
political capabilities.

“Predominance in the organization of intellectuals is inevitable in the
first period of the development of the organization. It is at the same
time a big handicap to the political education of the more gifted
workers ... It is absolutely necessary at the next convention to
introduce in the local and central committees as many workers as
possible. To a worker, activity in the leading party body is at the same
time a high political school ...

“The difficulty is that in every organization there are traditional
committee members and that different secondary, factional and personal
considerations play a too great role in the composition of the list of
candidates.”

I have never met either attention or interest from comrade Shachtman in
questions of this kind.

III.

To believe comrade Shachtman, I injected the question of comrade Abern’s
faction as a concentration of petty-bourgeois individuals artificially
and without any basis in fact. Yet on October 10, 1937, at a time when
Shachtman marched shoulder to shoulder with Cannon and it was considered
officially that Abern had no faction, I wrote to Cannon:

“The party has only a minority of genuine factory workers ... The
non-proletarian elements represent a very necessary yeast, and I believe
that we can be proud of the good quality of these elements ... But ...
Our party can be inundated by non-proletarian elements and can even lose
its revolutionary character. The task is naturally not to prevent the
influx of intellectuals by artificial methods, ... but to orientate
practically all the organization toward the factories, the strikes, the
unions ...

“A concrete example: We cannot devote enough or equal forces to all the
factories. Our local organization can choose for its activity in the
next period one, two or three factories in its area and concentrate all
its forces upon these factories. If we have in one of them two or three
workers we can create a special help commission of five non-workers with
the purpose of enlarging our influence in these factories.

“The same can be done among the trade unions. We cannot introduce
non-worker members in workers’ unions. But we can with success build up
help commissions for oral and literary action in connection with our
comrades in the union. The unbreakable conditions should be: _not to
command the workers but only to help them_, to give them suggestions, to
arm them with the facts, ideas, factory papers, special leaflets, and so
on.

“Such collaboration would have a tremendous educational importance from
one side for the worker comrades, from the other side for the
non-workers who need a solid re-education.

“You have for example an important number of Jewish non-worker elements
in your ranks. They can be a very valuable yeast _if the party succeeds
by and by in extracting them from a closed milieu_ and ties them to the
factory workers by daily activity. I believe _such an orientation would
also assure a more healthy atmosphere in side the patty_.

“One general rule we can establish immediately: a party member who
doesn’t win during three or six months a new worker for the party is not
a good party member.

“If we established seriously such a general orientation and if we
verified every week the practical results, we will avoid a great danger;
namely, that the intellectuals and white collar workers might suppress
the worker minority, condemn it to silence, transform the party into a
very intelligent discussion club but absolutely not habitable for
workers.

“The same rules should be in a corresponding form elaborated for the
working and recruiting of the _youth organization, otherwise we run the
danger of educating good young elements into revolutionary dilettantes
and not revolutionary fighters_.”

From this letter it is obvious, I trust, that I did not mention the
danger of a petty-bourgeois deviation the day following the
Stalin-Hitler pact or the day following the dismemberment of Poland, but
brought it forward persistently two years ago and more. Further more, as
I then pointed out, bearing in mind primarily the “non existent” Abern
faction, it was absolutely requisite in order to cleanse the atmosphere
of the party, that the Jewish petty-bourgeois elements of the New York
local be shifted from their habitual conservative milieu and dissolved
in the real labor movement. It is precisely be cause of this that the
above letter (not the first of its kind), written more than two years
before the present discussion began, is of far greater weight as
evidence than all the writings of the opposition leaders on the motives
which impelled me to come out in defense of the “Cannon clique.”

IV.

Shachtman’s inclination to yield to petty-bourgeois influence,
especially the academic and literary, has never been a secret to me.
During the time of the Dewey Commission I wrote, on October 14, 1937, to
Cannon, Shachtman and Warde :

“... I insisted upon the necessity to surround the Committee by
delegates of workers’ groups in order to create channels from the
Committee in the masses ... Comrades Warde, Shachtman and others
declared themselves in agreement with me on this point. Together we
analyzed the practical possibilities to realize this plan ... But later,
in spite of repeated questions from me, I never could have information
about the matter and only accidentally I heard that comrade Shachtman
was opposed to it. Why? I don’t know.”

Shachtman never did divulge his reasons to me. In my letter I expressed
myself with the utmost diplomacy but I did not have the slightest doubt
that while agreeing with me in words Shachtman in reality was afraid of
wounding the excessive political sensibilities of our temporary liberal
allies: in _this_ direction Shachtman demonstrates exceptional
“delicacy.”

V.

On April 15, 1938, I wrote to New York:

“I am a bit astonished about the kind of publicity given to Eastman’s
letter in the NEW INTERNATIONAL. The publication of the letter is all
right, but the prominence given it on the cover, combined with the
silence about Eastman’s article in HARPER’S, seems to me a bit
compromising for the NEW INTERNATIONAL. Many people will interpret this
fact as our willingness to close our eyes on principles when friendship
is concerned.”

VI.

On June 1, 1938, I wrote comrade Shachtman:

“It is difficult to understand here why you are so tolerant and even
friendly toward Mr. Eugene Lyons. He speaks, it seems, at your banquets;
at the same time he speaks at the banquets of the White Guards.”

This letter continued the struggle for a more independent and resolute
policy toward the so-called “liberals,” who, while waging a struggle
against the revolution, wish to maintain “friendly relations” with the
proletariat, for this doubles their market value in the eyes of
bourgeois public opinion.

VII.

On October 6, 1938, almost a year before the discussion began, I wrote
about the necessity of our party press turning its face decisively
toward the workers:

“Very important in this respect is the attitude of the SOCIALIST APPEAL.
It is undoubtedly a very good Marxist paper, but it is not a genuine
instrument of political action ... I tried to interest the editorial
board of the SOCIALIST APPEAL in this question, but without success.”

A note of complaint is evident in these words. And it is not accidental.
Comrade Shachtman as has been mentioned already displays far more
interest in isolated literary episodes of long-ago-concluded struggles
than in the social composition of his own party or the readers of his
own paper.

VIII.

On January 20, 1939, in a letter which I have already cited in
connection with dialectic materialism, I once again touched on the
question of comrade Shachtman’s gravitation toward the milieu of the
petty-bourgeois literary fraternity.

“I cannot understand why the SOCIALIST APPEAL is almost neglecting the
Stalinist Party. This party now represents a mass of contradictions.
Splits are inevitable. The next important acquisitions will surely come
from the Stalinist Party. Our political attention should be concentrated
on it. We should follow the development of its contradictions day by day
and hour by hour. Someone on the staff ought to devote the bulk of his
time to the Stalinists’ ideas and actions. We could provoke a discussion
and, if possible, publish the letters of hesitating Stalinists.

“It would be a thousand times more important than inviting Eastman,
Lyons and the others to present their individual sweatings. I was
wondering a bit at why you gave place to Eastman’s last insignificant
and arrogant article ... But I am absolutely perplexed that you,
personally, _invite_ these people to besmirch the not so numerous pages
of the NEW INTERNATIONAL. The perpetuation of this polemic can interest
some _petty-bourgeois intellectuals_, but not the revolutionary
elements.

“It is my firm conviction that a certain reorganization of the NEW
INTERNATIONAL and the SOCIALIST APPEAL is necessary: more distance from
Eastman, Lyons and so on; and nearer the workers and, in this sense, to
the Stalinist Party.”

Recent events have demonstrated, sad to say, that Shachtman did not turn
away from Eastman and Co. but on the contrary drew closer to them.

IX.

On May 27, 1939, I again wrote concerning the character of the SOCIALIST
APPEAL in connection with the social composition of the party:

“From the mintutes I see that you are having difficulty with the
SOCIALIST APPEAL. The paper is very well done from the journalistic
point of view; but it is a paper for the workers and not a workers’
paper.

“As it is, the paper is divided among various writers, each of whom is
very good, but collectively they do not permit the workers to penetrate
to the pages of the APPEAL. Each of them speaks for the workers (and
speaks very well) but nobody will hear the workers. In spite of its
literary brilliance, to a certain degree the paper becomes a victim of
journalistic routine. You do not hear at all how the workers live,
fight, clash with the police or drink whiskey. It is very dangerous for
the paper as a revolutionary instrument of the party. The task is not to
make a paper through the joint forces of a skilled editorial board but
to encourage the workers to speak for themselves.

“A radical and courageous change is necessary as a condition of success.

“Of course it is not only a question of the paper, but of the whole
course of policy. I continue to be of the opinion that you have _too
many petty-bourgeois boys and girls_ who are very good and devoted to
the party, but who do not fully realize that their duty is not to
discuss among themselves, but to penetrate into the fresh milieu of
workers. I repeat my proposition: Every petty-bourgeois member of the
party who, during a certain time, let us say three or six months, does
not win a worker for the party, should be demoted to the rank of
candidate and after another three months expelled from the party. In
some cases it might be unjust, but the party as a whole would receive a
salutary shock which it needs very much. A very radical change is
necessary.”

In proposing such Draconian measures as the expulsion of those
petty-bourgeois elements incapable of linking themselves to the workers,
I had in mind not the “defense” of Cannon’s faction but the rescue of
the party from degeneration.

X.

Commenting on skeptical voices from the Socialist Workers Party which
had reached my ears, I wrote comrade Cannon on June 16, 1939:

“The pre-war situation, the aggravation of nationalism and so on is a
natural hindrance to our development and the profound cause of the
depression in our ranks. But it must now be underlined that _the more
the party is petty-bourgeois in its composition, the more it is de
pendent upon the changes in the official public opinion._ It is a
supplementary argument for the necessity for a courageous and active
re-orientation toward the masses.

“The pessimistic reasonings you mention in your article are, of course,
a reflection of the patriotic, nationalistic pressure of the official
public opinion. ‘If fascism is victorious in France ...’ ‘If fascism is
victorious in England ...’ And so on. The victories of fascism are
important, but the death agony of capitalism is more important.”

The question of the dependence of the petty-bourgeois wing of the party
upon official public opinion consequently was posed several months
before the present discussion began and was not at all dragged in
artificially in order to discredit the opposition.

* * *

Comrade Shachtman demanded that I furnish ’precedents” of
petty-bourgeois tendencies among the leaders of the opposition during
the past period. I went so far in answering, this demand as to single
out from the leaders of the opposition comrade Shachtman himself. I am
far from having exhausted the material at my disposal. Two letters – one
of Shachtman’s, the other mine – which are perhaps still more
interesting as “precedents,” I shall cite presently in another
connection. Let Shachtman not object that the lapses and mistakes in
which the correspondence is concerned likewise can be brought against
other comrades, including representatives of the present majority.
Possibly. Probably. But Shachtman’s name is not repeated in this
correspondence accidentally. Where others have committed episodic
mistakes, Shachtman has evinced a tendency.

In any event, completely opposite to what Shachtman now claims
concerning my alleged ’sudden” and “unexpected” appraisals, I am able,
documents in hand, to prove – and I believe have proved – that my
article on the _Petty-Bourgeois Opposition_ did no more than summarize
my correspondence with New York during the last three years. (In reality
the past ten.) Shachtman has very demonstratively asked for
“precedents.” I have given him ’precedents.” They speak entirely against
Shachtman.

 

The Philosophic Bloc Against Marxism

The opposition circles consider it possible to assert that the question
of dialectic materialism was introduced by me only because I lacked an
answer to the “concrete” questions of Finland, Latvia, India,
Afghanistan, Baluchistan and so on. This argument, void of all merit in
itself, is of interest however in that it characterizes the level of
certain individuals in the opposition, their attitude toward theory and
toward elementary ideological loyalty. It would not be amiss, therefore,
to refer to the fact that my first serious conversation with comrades
Shachtman and Warde, in the train immediately after my arrival in Mexico
in January 1937, was devoted to the necessity of persistently
propagating dialectic materialism. After our American section split from
the Socialist Party I insisted most strongly on the earliest possible
publication of a theoretical organ, having again in mind the need to
educate the party, first and foremost its new members, in the spirit of
dialectic materialism. In the United States, I wrote at that time, where
the bourgeoisie systematically in stills vulgar empiricism in the
workers, more than anywhere else is it necessary to speed the elevation
of the movement to a proper theoretical level. On January 20, 1939, I
wrote to comrade Shachtman concerning his joint article with comrade
Burnham, _Intellectuals in Retreat_:

“The section on the dialectic is the greatest blow that you, personally,
as the editor of the NEW INTERNATIONAL could have delivered to Marxist
theory ... Good! We will speak about it publicly.”

Thus a year ago I gave open notice in advance to Shachtman that I
intended to wage a public struggle against his eclectic tendencies. At
that time there was no talk whatever of the coming opposition; in any
case furthest from my mind was the supposition that the philosophic bloc
against Marxism prepared the ground for a political bloc against the
program of the Fourth International.

The character of the differences which have risen to the surface has
only confirmed my former fears both in regard to the social composition
of the party and in regard to the theoretical education of the cadres.
There was nothing that required a change of mind or “artificial”
introduction. This is how matters stand in actuality. Let me also add
that I feel somewhat abashed over the fact that it is almost necessary
to justify coming out in defense of Marxism within one of the sections
of the Fourth International

In his _Open Letter_, Shachtman refers particularly to the fact that
comrade Vincent Dunne expressed satisfaction over the article on the
intellectuals. But I too praised it: “Many parts are excellent.”
However, as the Russian proverb puts it, a spoonful of tar can spoil a
barrel of honey. It is precisely this spoonful of tar that is involved.
The section devoted to dialectic materialism expresses a number of
conceptions monstrous from the Marxist standpoint, whose aim, it is now
clear, was to prepare the ground for a political bloc. In view of the
stubbornness with which Shachtman persists that I seized upon the
article as a pretext, let me once again quote the central passage in the
section of interest to us:

“... nor has anyone yet demonstrated that agreement or disagreement on
the more abstract doctrines of dialectic materialism necessarily affects
(!) today’s and tomorrow’s concrete political issues – and political
parties, programs and struggles are based on such concrete issues.” (THE
NEW INTERNATIONAL, January 1939, p.7)

Isn’t this alone sufficient? What is above all astonishing is this
formula, unworthy of revolutionists: “... political parties, programs
and struggles are based on such concrete issues.” What parties? What
programs? What struggles? All parties and all programs are here lumped
together. The party of the proletariat is a party unlike all the rest.
It is not at all based upon “such concrete issues.” In its very
foundation it is diametrically opposed to the parties of bourgeois
horse-traders and petty-bourgeois rag patchers. Its task is the
preparation of a social revolution and the regeneration of mankind on
new material and moral foundations. In order not to give way under the
pressure of bourgeois public opinion and police repression, the
proletarian revolutionist, a leader all the more, requires a clear,
far-sighted, completely thought-out world outlook. Only upon the basis
of a unified Marxist conception is it possible to correctly approach
“concrete” questions.

Precisely here begins Shachtman’s betrayal – not a mere mistake as I
wished to believe last year; but, it is now clear, an outright
theoretical betrayal. Following in the footsteps of Burnham, Shachtman
teaches the young revolutionary party that “no one has yet demon
strated” prestimably that dialectic materialism affects the political
activity of the party. “No one has yet demonstrated,” in other words,
that Marxism is of any use in the struggle of the proletariat. The party
consequently does not have the least motive for acquiring and defending
dialectic materialism. This is nothing else than renunciation of
Marxism, of scientific method in general, a wretched capitulation to
empiricism. Precisely this constitutes the philosophic bloc of Shachtman
with Burnham and through Burnham with the priests of bourgeois
“Science.” It is precisely this and only this to which I referred in my
January 20 letter of last year.

On March 5, Shachtman replied:

“I have reread the January article of Burnham and Shachtman to which you
referred, and while in the light of which you have written I might have
proposed a different formulation here (!) and there (!) if the article
were to be done over again, I cannot agree with the substance of your
criticism.”

This reply, as is always the case with Shachtman in a serious situation,
in reality expresses nothing whatsoever; but it still gives the
impression that Shachtman has left a bridge open for retreat. Today,
seized with factional frenzy, he promises to “do it again and again
tomorrow.” Do what? Capitulate to bourgeois “Science”? Renounce Marxism?

Shachtman explains at length to me (we shall see presently with what
foundation) the utility of this or that _political bloc_. I am speaking
about the deadliness of _theoretical betrayal_. A bloc can be justified
or not depending upon its content and the circumstances. Theoretical
betrayal cannot be justified by any bloc. Shachtman refers to the fact
that his article is of purely political character. I do not speak of the
article but of that section which renounces Marxism. If a text book on
physics contained only two lines on God as the first cause it would be
my right to conclude the author is an obscurantist.

Shachtman does not reply to the accusation but tries to distract
attention by turning to irrelevant matters. “Wherein does what you call
my ‘bloc with Burnham in the sphere of philosophy’ differ,” he asks,
“from Lenin’s bloc with Bogdanov? Why was the latter principled and ours
unprincipled? I should be very much interested to know the answer to
this question.” I shall deal presently with the political difference, or
rather the political polar opposite between the two blocs. We are here
interested in the question of Marxist method. Wherein is the difference
you ask? In this, that Lenin never declaimed for Bogdanov’s profit that
dialectic materialism is superfluous in solving “concrete political
questions.” In this, that Lenin never theoretically confounded the
Bolshevik party with parties in general. He was organically incapable of
uttering such abominations. And not he alone but not a single one of the
serious Bolsheviks. That is the difference. Do you understand? Shachtman
sarcastically promised me that he would be “interested” in a clear
answer. The answer, I trust, has been given. I don’t demand the
“interest.”

 

The Abstract and the Concrete; Economics and Politics

The most lamentable section of Shachtman’s lamentable opus is the
chapter, _The State and the Character of the War_.

“What then is our position ?” asks the author. “Simply this: It is
impossible to deduce _directly_ our policy towards a _specific_ war from
an _abstract_ characterization of the class character of the state
involved in the war, more particularly, from the property forms
prevailing in that state. Our policy must flow from a _concrete_
examination of the character of the war in relation to the interests of
the international socialist revolution.” (LOC. CIT., p.13. My emphasis)

What a muddle! What a tangle of sophistry! If it is impossible to deduce
our policy _directly_ from the class character of a state, then why
can’t this be done _non-directly?_ Why must the analysis of the
character of the state be _abstract_ whereas the analysis of the
character of the war is _concrete?_ Formally speaking, one can say with
equal, in fact with much more right, that our policy in relation to the
USSR can be deduced not from an _abstract_ characterization of war as
“imperialist,” but only from a _concrete_ analysis of the character of
the state in the given historical situation. The fundamental sophistry
upon which Shachtman constructs everything else is simple enough: In as
much as the economic basis determines events in the super-structure not
_immediately_; inasmuch as the mere class characterization of the state
is _not enough_ to solve the practical tasks, therefore ... therefore we
can get along without examining economics and the class nature of the
state; by replacing them, as Shachtman phrases it in his journalistic
jargon, with the “realities of living events.” (LOC. CIT., p.14)

The very same artifice circulated by Shachtman to justify his
philosophic bloc with Burnham (dialectic materialism determines our
politics not immediately, consequently ... it does not _in general_
affect the “concrete political tasks”), is repeated here word for word
in relation to Marxist sociology: Inasmuch as property forms deter mine
the policy of a state not immediately it is possible therefore to throw
Marxist sociology overboard in general in determining “concrete
political tasks.”

But why stop there? Since the law of labor value determines prices not
“directly” and not “immediately”; since the laws of natural selection
determine not “directly” and not “immediately” the birth of a suckling
pig; since the laws of gravity determine not “directly” and not
“immediately” the tumble of a drunken policeman down a flight of stairs,
therefore ... therefore let us leave Marx, Darwin, Newton, and all the
other lovers of “abstractions” to collect dust on a shelf. This is
nothing less than the solemn burial of science for, after all, the
entire course of the development of science proceeds from “direct” and
“immediate” causes to the more remote and pro found ones, from multiple
varieties and kaleidoscopic events – to the unity of the driving forces.

The law of labor value determines prices not “immediately,” but it
nevertheless does determine them. Such “concrete” phenomena as the
bankruptcy of the New Deal find their explanation in the final analysis
in the “abstract” law of value. Roosevelt does not know this, but a
Marxist dare not proceed without knowing it. Not immediately but through
a whole series of intermediate factors and their reciprocal interaction,
property forms determine not only politics but also morality. A
proletarian politician seeking to ignore the class nature of the state
would invariably end up like the policeman who ignores the laws of
gravitation; that is, by smashing his nose.

Shachtman obviously does not take into account the distinction between
the abstract and the concrete. Striving toward concreteness, our mind
operates with abstractions. Even “this,” “given,” “concrete” dog is an
abstraction because it proceeds to change, for example, by dropping its
tail the “moment” we point a finger at it. Concreteness is a relative
concept and not an absolute one: what is concrete in one case turns out
to be abstract in another: that is, insufficiently de fined for a given
purpose. In order to obtain a concept “concrete” enough _for a given
need_ it is necessary to correlate several abstractions into one – just
as in reproducing a segment of life upon the screen, which is a picture
in movement, it is necessary to combine a number of still photographs.

_The concrete is a combination of abstractions_ – not an arbitrary or
subjective combination but one that corresponds to the laws of the
movement of a given phenomenon.

“The interests of the international socialist revolution,” to which
Shachtman appeals against the class nature of the state, represent in
this given instance the vaguest of all abstractions. After all, the
question which occupies us is precisely this, in what concrete way can
we further the interests of the revolution? Nor would it be amiss to
remember, too, that the task of the socialist revolution is to create a
workers’ state. Before talking about the socialist revolution it is
necessary consequently to learn how to distinguish between such
“abstractions” as the bourgeoisie and the proletariat, the capitalist
state and the workers’ state.

Shachtman indeed squanders his own time and that of others in proving
that nationalized property does not determine “in and of itself,”
“automatically,” “directly,” “immediately” the policies of the Kremlin.
On the question as to how the economic “base” deter mines the political,
juridical, philosophical, artistic and so on “superstructure” there
exists a rich Marxist literature. The opinion that economics presumably
determines directly and immediately the creativeness of a composer or
even the verdict of a judge, represents a hoary caricature of Marxism
which the bourgeois professordom of all countries has circulated time
out of end to mask their intellectual impotence. [1]

As for the question which immediately concerns us, the inter
relationship between the social foundations of the Soviet state and the
policy of the Kremlin, let me remind the absent-minded Shachtman that
for seventeen years we have already been establishing, publicly, the
growing _contradiction_ between the foundation laid down by the October
Revolution and the tendencies of the state “superstructure.” We have
followed step by step the increasing independence of tile bureaucracy
from the Soviet proletariat and the growth of its dependence upon other
classes and groups both inside and out side the country. Just what does
Shachtman wish to add in this sphere to the analysis already made?

However, although economics determines politics not directly or
immediately, but only in the last analysis, _nevertheless economics does
determine politics._ The Marxists affirm precisely this in contrast to
the bourgeois professors and their disciples. While analyzing and
exposing the growing political independence of the bureaucracy from the
proletariat, we have never lost sight of the objective social boundaries
of this “independence”; namely, nationalized property supplemented by
the monopoly of foreign trade.

It is astonishing! Shachtman continues to support the slogan for a
political revolution against the Soviet bureaucracy. Has he ever
seriously thought out the meaning of this slogan? If we hold that the
social foundations laid down by the October Revolution were
“automatically” reflected in the policy of the state, then why would a
_revolution_ against the bureaucracy be necessary? If the USSR, on the
other hand, has completely ceased being a workers’ state, not a
_political_ revolution would be required but a _social_ revolution.
Shachtman consequently continues to defend the slogan which follows (1)
from the character of the USSR as a workers’ state and (2) from the
irreconcilable antagonism between the social foundations of the state
and the bureaucracy. But as he repeats this slogan, he tries to
undermine its theoretical foundation. Is it perhaps in order to
demonstrate once again the independence of his politics from scientific
“abstractions”?

Under the guise of waging a struggle against the bourgeois caricature of
dialectic materialism, Shachtman throws the doors wide open to
historical idealism. Property forms and the class character of the state
are a matter of _indifference_ to him in analyzing the policy of a
government. The state itself appears to him an animal of indiscriminate
sex. Both feet planted firmly on this bed of chicken feathers, Shachtman
pompously explains to us – today in the year 1940 – that in addition to
the nationalized property there is also the Bonapartist filth and their
reactionary politics. How new! Did Shachtman perchance think that he was
speaking in a nursery.

 

Shachtman Makes a Bloc – Also with Lenin

To camouflage his failure to understand the essence of the problem of
the nature of the Soviet state, Shachtman leaped upon the words of Lenin
directed against me on December 30, 1920, during the so-called Trade
Union Discussion.

“Comrade Trotsky speaks of the workers’ state. Permit me, this is an
abstraction ... Our state is in reality not a workers’ state but a
workers’ and peasants’ state ... Our present state is such that the
inclusively-organized proletariat must defend itself, and we must
utilize these workers’ organizations for the defense of the workers
against their state and for the defense of our state by the workers.”

Pointing to this quotation and hastening to proclaim that I have
repeated my “mistake” of 1920, Shachtman in his precipitance failed to
notice a major error in the quotation concerning the definition of the
nature of the Soviet state. On January 19, Lenin himself wrote the
following about his speech of December 30:

“I stated, ‘our state is in reality not a workers’ state but a workers’
and peasants’ state.’ ... On reading the report of the discussion, I now
see that I was wrong ... I should have said: ‘The workers’ state is an
abstraction. In reality we have a workers’ state with the following
peculiar features, (1) it is the peasants and not the workers who
predominate in the population and (2) it is a workers’ state with
bureaucratic deformations.’“

From this episode two conclusions follow: Lenin placed such great
importance upon the precise sociological definition of the state that he
considered it necessary to correct himself in the very heat of a
polemic! But Shachtman is so little interested in the class nature of
the Soviet state that twenty years later he noticed neither Lenin’s
mistake nor Lenin’s correction!

I shall not dwell here on the question as to just how correctly Lenin
aimed his argument against me. I believe he did so incorrectly – there
was no difference of opinion between us on the definition of the state.
But that is not the question now. The theoretical formulation on the
question of the state, made by Lenin in the above-cited quotation – in
conjunction with the major correction which he himself introduced a few
days later – is absolutely correct. But let us hear what incredible use
Shachtman makes of Lenin’s definition:

“Just as it was possible twenty years ago,” he writes, “to speak of the
term ‘workers’ state’ as an abstraction, so is it possible to speak of
the term ‘degenerated workers’ state’ as an abstraction.” (LOC. CIT.,
p.14)

It is self-evident that Shachtman fails completely to understand Lenin.
Twenty years ago the term “workers’ state” could not be considered in
any way an abstraction _in general_; that is, something not real or not
existing. The definition “workers’ state,” while correct in and of
itself, was _inadequate_ in relation to the _particular_ task; namely,
the defense of the workers through their trade unions, and only in this
sense was it abstract. However, in relation to the defense of the USSR
against imperialism this self-same definition was in 1920, just as it
still is today, unshakably concrete, making it obligatory for workers to
defend the given state.

Shachtman does not agree. He writes:

“Just as it was once necessary in connection with the trade union
problem to speak concretely of what _kind_ of workers’ state exists in
the Soviet Union, so it is necessary to establish in connection with the
present war, the _degree_ of degeneration of the Soviet state ... And
the _degree_ of the degeneration of the regime cannot be established by
abstract reference to the existence of nationalized property, but only
by observing the realities (!) of living (!) events (!).”

From this it is completely incomprehensible why in 1920 the question of
the character of the USSR was brought up in connection with the trade
unions, i.e., particular internal questions of the regime, while today
it is brought up in connection with the defense of the USSR, that is, in
connection with the entire fate of the state. In the former case the
workers’ state was counterpoised to the workers, in the latter case – to
the imperialists. Small wonder that the analogy limps on both legs; what
Lenin counterpoised, Shachtman identifies.

Nevertheless even if we take Shachtman’s words at face value, it follows
that the question over which he is concerned is only the _degree of the
degeneration_ (of what? a workers’ state?); that is, of quantitative
differences in the evaluation. Let us grant that Shachtman has worked
out (where?) the “degree” more precisely than we have. But in what way
can purely quantitative differences in the evaluation of the
degeneration of the _workers’_ state affect our decision as to the
defense of the USSR? It is impossible to make head or tail out of this.
As a matter of fact, Shachtman, remaining true to eclecticism, that is,
to himself, dragged in the question of “degree” only in an effort to
maintain his equilibrium between Abern and Burnham. What is in dispute
actually is not at all the _degree_ determined by “the realities of
living events” (what a precise, “scientific,” “concrete,” “experimental”
terminology!) but whether these _quantitative_ changes have been
transformed into _qualitative_ changes; i.e., whether the USSR is still
a workers’ state, even though degenerated, or whether it has been
transformed into a new type of exploitive state.

To this basic question Shachtman has no answer; feels no need for an
answer. His argument is merely verbal mimicry of Lenin s words which
were spoken in a different connection, which had a different content and
included an outright error. Lenin in his corrected version declares:
“The given state is not merely a workers’ state but a workers’ state
with bureaucratic deformations.” Shachtman declares: “The given state is
not merely a degenerated workers’ state but ...” ... but? Shachtman has
nothing further to say. Both the orator and the audience stare at each
other, mouths wide open.

What does “degenerated workers’ state” signify in our program? To this
question our program responds with a degree of concreteness which is
wholly adequate for solving the question of the defense of the USSR;
namely: (1) those traits which in 1920 were a “bureaucratic deformation”
of the soviet system have now become an independent bureaucratic regime
which has devoured the soviets; (2) the dictatorship of the bureaucracy,
incompatible with the internal and international tasks of socialism, has
introduced and continues to introduce profound deformations in the
economic life of the country as well; (3) basically, however, the system
of planned economy, on the foundation of state ownership of the means of
production, has been preserved and continues to remain a colossal
conquest of man kind. The defeat of the USSR in a war with imperialism
would signify not solely the liquidation of the bureaucratic
dictatorship, but of the planned state economy; and the dismemberment of
the country into spheres of influence; and a new stabilization of
imperialism; and a new weakening of the world proletariat.

From the circumstance that the “bureaucratic” deformation has grown into
a regime of bureaucratic autocracy we draw the conclusion that the
defense of the workers through their trade unions (which have undergone
the self-same degeneration as the state) is today in contrast to 1920
completely unrealistic; it is necessary to overthrow the bureaucracy;
this task can be carried out only by creating an illegal Bolshevik party
in the USSR.

From the circumstance that the degeneration of the political system has
not yet led to the destruction of planned state economy, we draw the
conclusion that it is still the duty of the world proletariat to defend
the USSR against imperialism and to aid the Soviet proletariat in its
struggle against the bureaucracy.

Just what in our definition of the USSR does Shachtman find abstract?
What concrete amendments does he propose? If the dialectic teaches us
that “truth is always concrete” then this law applies with equal force
to criticism. It is not enough to label a definition abstract. It is
necessary to point out exactly what it lacks. Otherwise criticism itself
becomes sterile. Instead of concretizing or changing the definition
which he claims is abstract, Shachtman replaces it with a vacuum. That’s
not enough. A vacuum, even the most pretentious vacuum, must be
recognized as the worst of all abstractions – it can be filled with any
content. Small wonder that the theoretical vacuum, in displacing the
class analysis, has sucked in the politics of impressionism and
adventurism.

 

“Concentrated Economics”

Shachtman goes on to quote Lenin’s words that “politics is concentrated
economics” and that in this sense “politics cannot but take primacy over
economics.” From Lenin’s words Shachtman directs at me the moral that I,
if you please, am interested only in “economics” (nationalized means of
production) and skip over “politics.” This second effort to exploit
Lenin is not superior to the first. Shachtman’s mistake here assumes
truly vast proportions! Lenin meant: when economic processes, tasks and
interests acquire a _conscious_ and _generalized_ (“concentrated”)
character, they enter the sphere of politics by virtue of this very
fact, and constitute the essence of politics. In this sense politics as
concentrated economics rises above the day-to-day atomized, unconscious
and ungeneralized economic activity.

The correctness of politics from the Marxist standpoint is deter mined
precisely to the extent that it profoundly and all-sidedly
“concentrates” economics: that is, expresses the progressive tendencies
of its development. That is why we base our politics first and foremost
upon our analysis of property forms and class relationships. A more
detailed and concrete analysis of the factors in the “superstructure” is
possible for us only on this theoretical basis. Thus, for example, were
we to accuse an opposing faction of “bureaucratic conservatism” we would
immediately seek the social, i.e., class roots of this phenomenon. Any
other procedure would brand us as “Platonic” Marxists, if not simply
noisy mimics.

“Politics is concentrated economics.” This proposition one should think
applies to the Kremlin too. Or, in exception to the general law, is the
policy of the Moscow government not “concentrated economics” but a
manifestation of the bureaucracy’s free will? Our attempt to reduce the
politics of the Kremlin to nationalized economy, refracted through the
interests of the bureaucracy, provokes frantic resistance from
Shachtman. He takes his guidance in relation to the USSR not from the
conscious generalization of economics but from “observing the realities
of living events”; i.e., from rule of thumb, improvizations, sympathies
and antipathies. He counterpoises this impressionistic policy to our
sociologically grounded policy and accuses us at the same time of ...
ignoring politics. Incredible but true! To be sure, in the final
analysis Shachtman’s weak-kneed and capricious politics is likewise the
“concentrated” expression of economics but, alas, it is the economics of
the declassed petty bourgeoisie.

 

Comparison with Bourgeois Wars

Shachtman reminds us that bourgeois wars were at one time progressive
and that in another period they became reactionary and that therefore it
is not enough to give the class definition of a state engaged in war.
This proposition does not clarify the question hut muddles it. Bourgeois
wars could be progressive only at a time when the entire bourgeois
regime was progressive; in other words, at a time when _bourgeois
property_ in contradistinction to feudal property was a progressive and
constructive factor. Bourgeois wars became reactionary when bourgeois
property became a brake on development. Does Shachtman wish to say in
relation to the USSR that the state ownership of the means of production
has become a brake upon development and that the extension of this form
of property to other countries constitutes economic reaction? Shachtman
obviously does not want to say this. He simply does not draw the logical
conclusion to his own thoughts.

The example of national bourgeois wars does indeed offer a very
instructive lesson, but Shachtman passes it by unconcernedly. Marx and
Engels were striving for a unified German republic. In the war of
1870-71 they stood on the side of the Germans despite the fact that the
struggle for unification was exploited and distorted by the dynastic
parasites.

Shachtman refers to the fact that Marx and Engels immediately turned
against Prussia upon the annexation of Alsace-Lorraine. But this turn
only illustrates our standpoint all the more lucidly. It is
impermissible to forget for a moment that what was in question was a war
between two _bourgeois_ states. Thus both camps had a common class
denominator. To decide which of the two sides was the “lesser evil” –
insofar at as history generally left any room for choice – was possible
only on the basis of supplementary factors. On the German side it was a
question of creating a _national_ bourgeois state as an economic and
cultural arena. The _national_ state during that period was a
progressive historical factor. To that extent Marx and Engels stood on
the side of the Germans despite Hohenzollern and his junkers. The
annexation of Alsace-Lorraine violated the principle of the national
state in regard to France as well as Germany and laid the basis for a
war of revenge. Marx and Engels, naturally, turned sharply against
Prussia. They did not thereby at all incur the risk of rendering service
to an inferior system of economy as against a superior one since in both
camps, we repeat, bourgeois relations prevailed. If France had been a
workers’ state in 1870, then Marx and Engels would have been for France
from the very beginning, inasmuch as they – one feels abashed again that
this must be mentioned – guided themselves in all their activity by the
class criterion.

Today in the old capitalist countries the solving of national tasks is
no longer at stake at all. On the contrary mankind is suffering from the
contradiction between the productive forces and the too narrow framework
of the national state. Planned economy on the basis of socialized
property freed from national boundaries is the task of the international
proletariat, above all – in Europe. It is precisely this task which is
expressed in our slogan, “For the Socialist United States of Europe!”
The expropriation of the property owners in Poland as in Finland is a
progressive factor in and of itself. The bureaucratic methods of the
Kremlin occupy the very same place in this process as did the dynastic
methods of Hohenzollern – in the unification of Germany. Whenever we are
confronted with the necessity of choosing between the defense of
reactionary property forms through reactionary measures and the
introduction of progressive property forms through bureaucratic
measures, we do not at all place both sides on the same plane, but
choose the lesser evil. In this there is no more “capitulation” to
Stalinism than there was capitulation to Hohenzollern in the policy of
Marx and Engels. It is scarcely necessary to add that the role of
Hohenzollern in the war of 1870-71 justified neither the general
historical role of the dynasty nor so much as its existence.

Conjunctural Defeatism, or Columbus and the Egg

Let us now check up on how Shachtman, aided by a theoretical vacuum,
operates with the “realities of living events” in an especially vital
question. He writes:

“We have never supported the Kremlin’s international policy ... but what
is war? War is the continuation of politics by other means. Then why
should we support the war which is the continuation of the international
policy which we _did not_ and do not support?” (LOC. CIT., p.15)

The completeness of this argument cannot be denied; in the shape of a
naked syllogism we are presented here with a rounded-out theory of
_defeatism_. It is as simple as Columbus and the egg! Since we have
never supported the Kremlin’s international policy, therefore we ought
_never_ to support the USSR. Then why not say it?

We rejected the internal and international policies of the Kremlin prior
to the German-Soviet pact and prior to the invasion of Poland by the Red
Army. This means that the “realities of living events” of last year do
not have the slightest bearing on the case. If we were defensists in the
past in connection with the USSR, it was only out of inconsistency.
Shachtman revises not only the present policy of the Fourth
International but also the past. Since we are against Stalin we must
therefore be against the USSR too. Stalin has long held this opinion.
Shachtman has arrived at it only recently. From his rejection of the
Kremlin’s politics flows complete and indivisible defeatism. Then why
not say so!

But Shachtman can’t bring himself to say so. In a previous passage he
writes:

“We said – the Minority continues to say it – that if the imperialists
assail the Soviet Union with the aim of crushing the last conquest of
the October Revolution and reducing Russia to a bunch of colonies we
will support the Soviet Union unconditionally.” (LOC. CIT., p.15)

Permit me, permit me, permit me! The Kremlin’s international policy is
reactionary; the war is the continuation of its reactionary politics; we
cannot support a reactionary war. How then does it unexpectedly turn out
that if the pernicious imperialists “assail” the USSR and if the
pernicious imperialists pursue the uncommendable aim of transforming it
into a colony, that under these exceptional “conditions,” Shachtman will
defend the USSR “unconditionally”? How does this make sense? Where is
the logic? Or has Shachtman, following Burnham’s example, also relegated
logic to the sphere of religion and other museum exhibits?

The key to this tangle of confusion rests in the fact that the
statement, “We have never supported the Kremlin’s international policy,”
is an abstraction. It must be dissected and concretized. In its present
foreign as well as domestic policy, the bureaucracy places first and
foremost for defense its own parasitic interests. To that extent we wage
mortal struggle against it, but in the final analysis, through the
interests of the bureaucracy, in a very distorted form the interests of
the workers’ state are reflected. These interests we defend – with our
own methods. Thus we do not at all wage a struggle against the fact that
the bureaucracy safeguards (in its own way!) state property, the
monopoly of foreign trade or refuses to pay Czarist debts. Yet in a war
between the USSR and the capitalist world – independently of the
incidents leading up to that war or the “aims” of this or that
government – what is involved is the fate of precisely those historical
conquests which we defend unconditionally, i.e., despite the reactionary
policy of the bureaucracy. The question consequently boils down – _in
the last and decisive instance_ – to the class nature of the USSR.

Lenin deduced the policy of defeatism from the imperialist character of
the war; but he did not stop there. He deduced the imperialist character
of the war from a specific stage in the development of the capitalist
regime and its ruling class. Since the character of the war is
determined precisely by the class character of society and the state,
Lenin recommended that in determining our policy in regard to
imperialist war we abstract ourselves from such “concrete” circumstances
as democracy and monarchy, as aggression and national defense. In
opposition to this Shachtman proposes that we deduce defeatism from
conjunctural conditions. This defeatism is indifferent to the class
character of the USSR and of Finland. Enough for it are the reactionary
features of the bureaucracy and the “aggression.” If France, England or
the United States sends airplanes and guns to Finland, this has no
bearing in the determination of Shachtman’s politics. But if British
troops land in Finland, then Shachtman will place a thermometer under
Chamberlain’s tongue and determine Chamberlain’s intentions – whether he
aims only to save Finland from the Kremlin’s imperialistic politics or
whether in addition he aims to over throw the “last conquest of the
October Revolution.” Strictly in accordance with the readings of the
thermometer, Shachtman, the defeatist, is ready to change himself into a
defensist. This is what it means to replace abstract principles with the
“realities of living events.”

Shachtman, as we have already seen, persistently demands the citation of
precedents: when and where in the past have the leaders of the
opposition manifested petty-bourgeois opportunism? The reply which I
have already given him on this score must be supplemented here with two
letters which we sent each other on the question of defensism and
methods of defensism in connection with the events of the Spanish
Revolution. On September 18, 1937, Shachtman wrote me:

“... You say, ‘If we would have a member in the Cortes he would vote
_against_ the military budget of Negrin.’ Unless this is a typographical
error it seems to us to be a _non-sequitur_. If, as we all contend, _the
element of an imperialist war_ is not dominant at the present time in
the Spanish struggle, and if instead the decisive element is still the
struggle between the decaying bourgeois democracy, with all that it
involves, on the one side, and fascism on the other, and further if we
are obliged to give military assistance to the struggle against fascism,
we don’t see how it would be possible to vote in the Cortes against the
military budget ... If a Bolshevik-Leninist on the Huesca front were
asked by a Socialist comrade why his representative in the Cortes voted
against the proposal by Negrin to devote a million pesetas to the
purchase of rifles for the front, what would this Bolshevik-Leninist
reply? It doesn’t seem to us that he would have an effective answer ...”
(My emphasis)

This letter astounded me. Shachtman was willing to express confidence in
the perfidious Negrin government on the purely negative basis that the
“element of an imperialist war” was not dominant in Spain.

On September 20, 1937, I replied to Shachtman:

“To vote the military budget of the Negrin government signifies to vote
him _political_ confidence ... To do it would be a crime. How we explain
our vote to the anarchist workers? Very simply: We have not the
slightest confidence in the capacity of this government to conduct the
war and assure victory. We accuse this government of protecting the rich
and starving the poor. This government must be smashed. So long as we
are not strong enough to replace it, we are fighting under its command.
But on every occasion we express openly our non-confidence in it: it is
the only one possibility to mobilize the masses _politically_ against
this government and to prepare its over throw. Any other politics would
be a betrayal of the revolution.”

The tone of my reply only feebly reflects the ... amazement which
Shachtman’s opportunist position produced in me. Isolated mistakes are
of course unavoidable but today, two and a half years later, this
correspondence is illuminated with new light. Since we defend bourgeois
democracy against fascism, Shachtman reasons, we there fore cannot
refuse confidence to the bourgeois government. In applying this very
theorem to the USSR it is transformed into its converse – since we place
no confidence in the Kremlin government, we cannot, therefore, defend
the workers’ state. Pseudo-radicalism in this instance, too, is only the
obverse side of opportunism.

 

Renunciation of the Class Criterion

Let us return once more to the ABC’s. In Marxist sociology the initial
point of analysis is the _class_ definition of a given phenomenon, e.g.,
state, party, philosophic trend, literary school, etc. In most cases,
however, the mere class definition is inadequate, for a class consists
of different strata, passes through different stages of development,
comes under different conditions, is subjected to the influence of other
classes. It becomes necessary to bring up these second and third rate
factors in order to round out the analysis, and they are taken either
partially or completely, depending upon the specific aim. But for a
Marxist, analysis is impossible without a class characterization of the
phenomenon under consideration.

The skeletal and muscular systems do not exhaust the anatomy of an
animal; nevertheless an anatomical treatise which attempted to
“abstract” itself from bones and muscles would dangle in mid-air. War is
not an organ but a function of society, i.e., its ruling class. It is
impossible to define and study a function without understanding the
organ, i.e., the state; it is impossible to gain scientific
understanding of the organ without understanding the general structure
of the organism, i.e., society. The bones and muscles of society consist
of the productive forces and the class (property) relations. Shachtman
holds it possible that a function, namely, war, can be studied “con
cretely” independently of the organ to which it pertains, i.e., the
state. Isn’t this monstrous?

This fundamental error is supplemented by another equally glaring. After
splitting function away from organ, Shachtman in studying the function
itself, contrary to all his promises, proceeds not from the abstract to
the concrete but on the contrary dissolves the concrete in the abstract.
_Imperialist_ war is one of the functions of finance capital, i.e., the
bourgeoisie at a certain stage of development resting upon capitalism of
a specific structure, namely, monopoly capital. This definition is
sufficiently concrete for our basic political conclusions. But by
extending the term _imperialist_ war to cover the Soviet state too,
Shachtman cuts the ground away from under his own feet. In order to
reach even a superficial justification for applying one and the same
designation to the expansion of finance capital and the expansion of the
workers’ state, Shachtman is compelled to detach himself from the social
structure of both states altogether by proclaiming it to be – an
abstraction. Thus playing hide and seek with Marxism, Shachtman labels
the concrete as abstract. and palms off the abstract as concrete!

This outrageous toying with theory is not accidental. Every petty
bourgeois in the United States without exception is ready to call every
seizure of territory “imperialist,” especially today when the United
States does not happen to be occupied with acquiring territories. But if
this very same petty bourgeois is told that the entire foreign policy of
finance capital is imperialist regardless of whether it be occupied at
the given moment in carrying out an annexation or in “defending” Finland
against annexation – then our petty bourgeois jumps back in pious
indignation. Naturally the leaders of the opposition differ considerably
from an average petty bourgeois in their aim and in their political
level. But alas they have common roots of thought. A petty bourgeois
invariably seeks to tear political events away from their social
foundation, since there is an organic conflict between a class approach
to facts and the social position and education of the petty bourgeoisie.

 

Once Again: Poland

My remark that the Kremlin with its bureaucratic methods gave an impulse
to the socialist revolution in Poland, is converted by Shachtman into an
assertion that in my opinion a “bureaucratic revolution" of the
proletariat is presumably possible. This is not only in correct but
disloyal. My expression was rigidly limited. It is not the question of
“bureaucratic revolution” but only a bureaucratic impulse. To deny this
impulse is to deny reality. The popular masses in western Ukraine and
Byelo-Russia, in any event, felt this impulse, understood its meaning,
and used it to accomplish a drastic overturn in property relations. A
revolutionary party which failed to notice this impulse in time and
refused to utilize it would be fit for nothing but the ash can.

This impulse in the direction of socialist revolution was possible only
because the bureaucracy of the USSR straddles and has its roots in the
economy of a workers’ state. The revolutionary utilization of this
“impulse” by the Ukrainian Byelo-Russians was possible only through the
class struggle in the occupied territories and through the power of the
example of the October Revolution. Finally, the swift strangulation or
semi-strangulation of this revolutionary mass movement was made possible
through the isolation of this movement and the might of the Moscow
bureaucracy. Whoever failed to under stand the dialectic interaction of
these three factors: the workers’ state, the oppressed masses and the
Bonapartist bureaucracy, had best restrain himself from idle talk about
events in Poland.

At the elections for the National Assembly of western Ukraine and
western Byelo-Russia the electoral program, dictated of course by the
Kremlin, included three extremely important points: inclusion of both
provinces in the Federation of the USSR; confiscation of landlords’
estates in favor of the peasants; nationalization of large industry and
the banks. The Ukrainian democrats, judging from their conduct, deem it
a lesser evil to be unified under the rule of a single state. And from
the standpoint of the future struggle for independence, they are
correct. As for the other two points in the program one would think that
there could be no doubt in our midst ~s to their progressiveness.
Seeking to get around reality, namely that nothing else but the social
foundations of the USSR forced a social revolutionary program upon the
Kremlin, Shachtman refers to Lithuania, Estonia and Latvia where
everything has remained as of old. An incredible argument! No one has
said that the Soviet bureaucracy _always_ and _everywhere_ either wishes
or is able to accomplish the expropriation of the bourgeoisie. We only
say that no other government could have accomplished that social
overturn which the Kremlin bureaucracy notwithstanding its alliance with
Hitler found itself compelled to sanction in eastern Poland. Failing
this, it could not include the territory in the Federation of the USSR.

Shachtman is aware of the overturn itself. He cannot deny it. He is
incapable of explaining it. But he nevertheless attempts to save face.
He writes:

“In the Polish Ukraine and White Russia, where class exploitation was
intensified by national oppression ... the peasants began to take over
the land themselves, to drive off the land lords who were already
half-in-flight,” etc. (LOC. CIT., p.16)

The Red Army it turns out had no connection whatever with all this. It
came into Poland only as a “counter-revolutionary force” in order to
suppress the movement. But why didn’t the workers and peasants in
western Poland seized by Hitler arrange a revolution? Why was it chiefly
revolutionists, “democrats,” and Jews who fled from there, while in
eastern Poland – it was chiefly the landlords and capitalists who fled?
Shachtman lacks the time to think this oot – he is in a hurry to explain
to me that the conception of “bureaucratic revolution” is absurd, for
the emancipation of the workers can be carried out only by the workers
themselves. Am I not justified in repeating that Shachtman obviously
feels he is standing in a nursery.

In the Parisian organ of the Mensheviks – who, if that is possible, are
even more “irreconcilable” in their attitude toward the Kremlin’s
foreign policy than Shachtman – it is reported that “in the villages –
very frequently at the very approach of the Soviet troops (i.e., even
prior to their entering a given district – _L.T._) – peasant committees
sprang up everywhere, the elementary organs of revolutionary peasant
self-rule ...” The military authorities hastened of course to
subordinate these committees to the bureaucratic organs established by
them in the urban centers. Nevertheless they were compelled to rest upon
the peasant committees since without them it was impossible to carry out
the agrarian revolution.

The leader of the Mensheviks, Dan, wrote on October 19:

“_According to the unanimous testimony of all observers_ the appearance
of the Soviet army and the Soviet bureaucracy provides not only in the
territory occupied by them but beyond its confines – an impulse(!) to
social turmoil and social transformations.”

The “impulse,” it will be observed, was invented not by me but by “the
unanimous testimony of all observers” who possessed eyes and ears. Dan
goes even further and expresses the supposition that “the waves
engendered by this impulse will not only hit Germany powerfully in a
comparatively short period of time but also to one degree or another
roll on to other states.”

Another Menshevik author writes:

“However they may have attempted in the Kremlin to avoid anything which
might smack of the great revolution, the very fact of the entry of
Soviet troops into the territories of eastern Poland with its long
outlived semi-feudal agrarian relations, had to provoke a stormy
agrarian movement. With the approach of Soviet troops the peasants began
to seize landlords’ estates and to form peasant committees.”

You will observe: with the _approach_ of Soviet troops and not at all
with their _withdrawal_ as should follow in accordance with Shachtman’s
words. I cite the testimony of the Mensheviks because they are very well
informed, their sources of information coming through Polish and Jewish
immigrants friendly to them who have gathered in France, and also
because having capitulated to the French bourgeoisie, these gentlemen
cannot possibly be suspected of capitulation to Stalinism.

The testimony of the Mensheviks furthermore is confirmed by the reports
of the bourgeois press:

“The agrarian revolution in Soviet Poland has had the force of a
spontaneous movement. As soon as the report spread that the Red Army had
crossed the river Zbrucz the peasants began to share out amongst
themselves the landlords’ acres. Land was given first to small holders
and in this way about thirty per cent of agricultural land was
expropriated.” (NEW YORK TIMES, January 17, 1940.)

Under the guise of a new argument Shachtman hands me my own words to the
effect that the expropriation of property owners in eastern Poland
cannot alter our appraisal of the _general_ policies of the Kremlin. Of
course it cannot! No one has proposed this. With the aid of the
Comintern the Kremlin has disoriented and demoralized the working class
so that it has not only facilitated the outbreak of a new imperialist
war but has also made extremely difficult the utilization of this war
for revolution. Compared with those crimes the social overturn in the
two provinces, which was paid for more over by the enslavement of
Poland, is of course of secondary importance and does not alter the
general reactionary character of the Kremlin’s policy. But upon the
initiative of the opposition itself, the question now posed is not one
of general policy but of its concrete refraction under specific
conditions of time and place. To the peas ants of Galicia and western
Byelo-Russia the agrarian Overturn was of highest importance. The Fourth
International could not have boycotted this overturn on the ground that
the initiative was taken by the reactionary bureaucracy. Our outright
duty was to participate in the overturn on the side of the workers and
peasants and _to that extent_ on the side of the Red Army. At the same
time it was indispensable to warn the masses tirelessly of the generally
reactionary character of the Kremlin’s policy and of those dangers it
bears for the occupied territories. To know how to combine these two
tasks or more precisely two sides of one and the same task – just this
is Bolshevik politics.

 

Once Again: Finland

Having revealed such odd perspicacity in understanding the events in
Poland, Shachtman descends upon me with redoubled authority in
connection with events in Finland. In my article _A Petty-Bourgeois
Opposition_, I wrote that “the Soviet-Finnish War is _apparently
beginning_ to be _supplemented_ by a civil war in which the Red Army
finds itself at a given stage in the same camp as the Finnish petty
peasants and the workers ...” This extremely cautious formula did not
meet with the approval of my unsparing judge. My evaluation of events in
Poland had already taken him off balance. “I find even less (proof) for
your – how shall I put it? – astonishing remarks about Finland,” writes
Shachtman on page 16 of his _Letter_. I am very sorry that Shachtman
chooses to become astonished rather than think things out.

In the Baltic states the Kremlin confined its tasks to making
strategical gains with the unquestionable calculation that in the future
these strategic military bases will permit the sovietization of these
former sections of the Czarist empire too. These successes in the
Baltic, achieved by diplomatic threat, met with resistance, however,
from Finland. To reconcile itself to this resistance would have meant
that the Kremlin placed in jeopardy its “prestige” and thereby its
successes in Estonia, Latvia and Lithuania. Thus contrary to its initial
plans the Kremlin felt compelled to resort to armed force. From this
fact every thinking person posed to himself the following question: Does
the Kremlin wish only to frighten the Finnish bourgeoisie and force them
to make concessions or must it now go further? To this question
naturally there could be no “automatic" answer. It was necessary – in
the light of general tendencies – -- to orient oneself upon concrete
symptoms. The leaders of the opposition are incapable of this.

Military operations began on November 30. That very same day the Central
Committee of the Finnish Communist Party, undoubtedly located in either
Leningrad or Moscow, issued a radio manifesto to the toiling people of
Finland. This manifesto proclaimed:

“For the second time in the history of Finland the Finnish working class
is beginning a struggle against the yoke of the plutocracy. The first
experience of the workers and peasants in 1918 terminated in the victory
of the capitalists and the landlords. But this time ... the toiling
people must win “

This manifesto alone clearly indicated that not an attempt to scare the
bourgeois government of Finland was involved, but a plan to provoke
insurrection in the country and to supplement the invasion of the Red
Army with civil war.

The declaration of the so-called People’s Government published on
December 2 states: “In different parts of the country the people have
already risen and proclaimed the creation of a democratic republic.”
This assertion is obviously a fabrication, otherwise the manifesto would
have mentioned the places where the attempts at insurrection took place.
It is possible, however, that isolated attempts, prepared from without,
ended in failure and that precisely because of this it was deemed best
not to go into details. In any case, the news concerning “insurrections”
constituted a call to insurrection. Moreover, the declaration carried
information concerning the formation of “the first Finnish corps which
in the course of coming battles will be enlarged by volunteers from the
ranks of revolutionary workers and peasants.” Whether there were one
thousand men in this “corps” or only one hundred, the meaning of the
“corps” in determining the policies of the Kremlin was incontestable. At
the same time cable dispatches reported the expropriation of large
landholders in the border regions. There is not the slightest ground to
doubt that this is just what took place during the first advance of the
Red Army. But even if these dispatches are considered fabrications, they
completely pre serve their meaning. as a call for an agrarian
revolution. Thus I had every justification to declare that “The
Soviet-Finnish War is apparently beginning to be supplemented by a civil
war.” At the beginning of December, true enough, I had at my disposal
only a part of these facts. But against the background of the general
situation, and I take the liberty to add, with the aid of an
understanding of its internal logic, the isolated symptoms enabled me to
draw the necessary conclusions concerning the direction of the entire
struggle. Without such semi-_a priori_ conclusions one can be a
rationalizing observer but in no case an active participant in events.
But why did the appeal of the “People’s Government” fail to bring
immediate mass response? For three reasons: first, Finland is dominated
completely by a reactionary military machine which is supported not only
by the bourgeoisie but by the top layers of the peasantry and the labor
bureaucracy; secondly, the policy of the Kremlin succeeded in
transforming the Finnish Communist Party into an insignificant factor;
thirdly, the regime of the USSR is in no way capable of arousing
enthusiasm among the Finnish toiling masses. Even in the Ukraine from
1918 to 1920 the peasants responded very slowly to appeals to seize the
estates of the landlords because the local soviet power was still weak
and every success of the Whites brought about ruthless punitive
expeditions. All the less reason is there for surprise that the Finnish
poor peasants delay in responding to an appeal for an agrarian
revolution. To set the peasants in motion, serious successes of the Red
Army are required. But during the first badly prepared advance the Red
Army suffered only failures. Under such conditions there could not even
be talk of the peasants rising. It was impossible to expect an
independent civil war in Finland at the given stage: my calculations
spoke quite precisely of _supplementing_ military operations by measures
of civil war. I have in mind – at least until the Finnish army is
annihilated – only the occupied territory and the nearby regions. Today
on January 17 as I write these lines dispatches from a Finnish source
report that one of the border provinces has been invaded by detachments
of Finnish émigrés and that brother is literally killing brother there.
What is this if not an episode in a civil war? In any case there can be
no doubt that a new advance of the Red Army into Finland will confirm at
every step our general appraisal of the war. Shachtman has neither an
analysis of the events nor the hint of a prognosis. He con fines himself
to noble indignation and for this reason at every step he sinks deeper
into the mire.

The appeal of the “People’s Government” calls for workers’ control. What
can this mean! exclaims Shachtman. There is no workers’ control in the
USSR; whence will it come in Finland? Sad to say, Shachtman reveals
complete lack of understanding of the situation. In the USSR workers’
control is a stage long ago completed. From control over the bourgeoisie
there they passed to management of nationalized production. From the
management of workers – to the command of the bureaucracy. New workers’
control would now signify control over the bureaucracy. This cannot be
established except as the result of a successful uprising against the
bureaucracy. In Finland, workers’ control still signifies nothing more
than crowding out the native bourgeoisie, whose place the bureaucracy
proposes to take. Furthermore one should not think that the Kremlin is
so stupid as to attempt ruling eastern Poland or Finland by means of
imported commissars. Of greatest urgency to the Kremlin is the
extraction of a new administrative apparatus from among the toiling
population of the occupied areas. This task can be solved only in
several stages. The first stage is the peasant committees and the
committees of workers’ control. [2]

Shachtman clutches eagerly even at the fact that Kuusinen’s program “is,
formally, the program of a bourgeois ’democracy’.” Does he mean to say
by this that the Kremlin is more interested in establishing bourgeois
democracy in Finland than in drawing Finland into the framework of the
USSR? Shachtman himself doesn’t know what he wants to say. In Spain,
which Moscow did not prepare for union with the USSR, it was actually a
question of demonstrating the ability of the Kremlin to safeguard
bourgeois democracy against proletarian revolution. This task flowed
from the interests of the Kremlin bureaucracy in that particular
international situation. Today the situation is a different one. The
Kremlin is not preparing to demonstrate its usefulness to France,
England and the United States. As its actions have proved, it has firmly
decided to sovietize Finland – at once or in two stages. The program of
the Kuusinen government, even if approached from a “formal” point of
view does not differ from the program of the Bolsheviks in November
1917. True enough, Shachtman makes much of the fact that I generally
place significance on the manifesto of the “idiot” Kuusinen. However, I
shall take the liberty of considering that the “idiot” Kuusinen acting
on the ukase of the Kremlin and with the support of the Red Army
represents a far more serious political factor than scores of
superficial wise acres who refuse to think through the internal logic
(dialectics) of events.

As a result 0f his remarkable analysis, Shachtman this time openly
proposes a _defeatist_ policy in relation to the USSR, adding (for
emergency use) that he does not at all cease to be a “patriot of his
class.” We are happy to get the information. But the trouble is that
Dan, the leader of the Mensheviks, as far back as November 12 wrote that
in the event the Soviet Union invaded Finland the world proletariat
“must take a definitive defeatist position in relation to this
violation.” (SOZIALISTICHESKI VESTNIK, No.19-20, p.43) It is necessary
to add that throughout the Kerensky regime, Dan was a rabid defensist;
he failed to be a defeatist even under the Czar. Only the invasion of
Finland by the Red Army has turned Dan into a defeatist. Naturally he
does not thereby cease to be a “patriot of his class.” What class? This
question is not an uninteresting one. So far as the analysis of events
is concerned Shachtman disagrees with Dan who is closer to the theater
of action and cannot replace facts with fiction; by way of compensation,
where the “concrete political conclusions” are concerned, Shachtman has
turned out to be a “patriot” of the very same time as Dan. In Marxist
sociology this class, if the opposition will permit me, this class is
called the _petty bourgeoisie_.

 

The Theory of “Blocs”

To justify his bloc with Burnham and Abern – against the proletarian
wing of the party, against the program of the Fourth International, and
against the Marxist method – Shachtman has not spared the history of the
revolutionary movement which he – according to his own words – studied
especially in order to transmit great traditions to the younger
generation. The goal itself is of course excellent. But it demands a
scientific method. Meanwhile, Shachtman has begun by sacrificing
scientific method for the sake of a bloc. His historical examples are
arbitrary, not thought out and downright false.

Not every collaboration is a bloc in the proper sense of the term. By no
means infrequent are episodic agreements which are not at all
transformed and do not seek to be transformed into a protracted bloc. On
the other hand membership in one and the same party can hardly be called
a bloc. We together with comrade Burnham have belonged (and I hope will
continue to belong to the end) to one and the same international party;
but this is still not a bloc. Two parties can conclude a long term bloc
with each other against a common enemy: such was the policy of the
“People’s Front.” Within one and the same party close but not congruent
tendencies can conclude a bloc against a third faction.

For the evaluation of inner-party blocs two questions are of decisive
significance: (1) First and foremost against whom or what is the bloc
directed? (2) What is the relationship of forces within the bloc? Thus
for a struggle against chauvinism within one’s own party a bloc between
internationalists and centrists is wholly permissible. The result of the
bloc would in this case depend upon the clarity of the program of the
internationalists, upon their cohesiveness and discipline, for these
traits are not infrequently more important in determining the
relationship of forces than their numerical strength.

Shachtman as we said before appeals to Lenin’s bloc with Bogdanov. I
have already stated that Lenin did not make the slightest theoretical
concessions to Bogdanov. Now we shall examine the political side of the
“bloc.” It is first of all necessary to state that what was actually in
question was not a bloc but a collaboration in a common organization.
The Bolshevik faction led an independent existence. Lenin did not form a
“bloc" with Bogdanov against other tendencies within his own
organization. On the contrary he formed a bloc even with the
Bolshevik-conciliators (Dubrovinsky, Rykov and others) against the
theoretical heresies of Bogdanov. In essence, the question so far as
Lenin was concerned was whether it was possible to remain with Bogdanov
in one and the same organization which although called a “faction” borc
all the traits of a party. If Shachtman does not look upon the
opposition as an independent organization then his reference to the
Lenin-Bogdanov “bloc” falls to pieces.

But the mistake in the analogy is not restricted to this. The Bolshevik
faction-party carried out a struggle against Menshevism which at that
time had already revealed itself completely as a petty-bourgeois agency
of the liberal bourgeoisie. This was far more serious than the
accusation of so-called “bureaucratic conservatism,” the class roots of
which Shachtman does not even attempt to define. Lenin’s collaboration
with Bogdanov was collaboration between a proletarian tendency and a
sectarian centrist tendency against petty-bourgeois opportunism. The
class lines are clear. The “bloc” (if one uses this term in the given
instance) was justified.

The subsequent history of the “bloc” is not lacking in significance. In
the letter to Gorky cited by Shachtman, Lenin expressed the hope that it
would be possible to separate the political questions from the purely
philosophic ones. Shachtman forgets to add that Lenin’s hope did not at
all materialize. Differences developed from the heights of philosophy
down the line of all the other questions, including the most current
ones. If the “bloc” did not discredit Bolshevism it was only because
Lenin had a finished program, a correct method, a firmly welded faction
in which Bogdanov’s group composed a small unstable minority.

Shachtman concluded a bloc with Burnham and Abern against the
proletarian wing of his own party. It is impossible to evade this. The
relationship of forces within the bloc is completely against Shachtman.
Abern has his own faction. Burnham with Shachtman’s assistance can
create the semblance of a faction constituting intellectuals
disillusioned with Bolshevism. Shachtman has no independent program, no
independent method, no independent faction. The eclectic character of
the opposition “program” is determined by the contradictory tendencies
within the bloc. In the event the bloc collapses – and the collapse is
inevitable – Shachtman will emerge from the struggle with nothing but
injury to the party and to himself.

Shachtman further appeals to the fact that in 1917 Lenin and Trotsky
united after a long struggle and it would therefore be incorrect to
remind them of their past differences. This example is slightly
compromised by the fact that Shachtman has already utilized it once
before to explain his bloc with – Cannon against Abern. But aside from
this unpleasant circumstance the historical analogy is false to the
core. Upon joining the Bolshevik party, Trotsky recognized completely
and whole-heartedly the correctness of the Leninist methods of building
the party. At the same time the irreconcilable class tendency of
Bolshevism had corrected an incorrect prognosis. If I did not again
raise the question of “permanent revolution” in 1917 it was because it
had already been decided for both sides by the march of events. The
basis for joint work was constituted not by subjective or episodic
combinations but by the proletarian revolution. This is a solid basis.
Furthermore in question here was not a “bloc” but unification in a
single party – against the bourgeoisie and its petty-bourgeois agents.
Inside the party the October bloc of Lenin and Trotsky was directed
against petty-bourgeois vacillations on the question of insurrection.

Equally superficial is Shachtman’s reference to Trotsky’s bloc with
Zinoviev in 1926. The struggle at that time was conducted not against
“bureaucratic conservatism” as the psychological trait of a few
unsympathetic individuals but against the mightiest bureaucracy in the
world, its privileges, its arbitrary rule and its reactionary policy.
The scope of permissible differences in a bloc is determined by the
character of the adversary.

The relationship of elements within the bloc was likewise altogether
different. The opposition of 1923 had its own program and its own cadres
composed not at all of intellectuals as Shachtman asserts, echoing the
Stalinists, but primarily workers. The Zinoviev Kamenev opposition on
our demand acknowledged in a special document that the 1923 opposition
was correct on all fundamental questions. Nevertheless since we had
different traditions and since we were far from agreeing in everything,
the merger never did take place; both groups remained independent
factions. In certain important questions, it is true, the 1923
opposition made principled concessions to the opposition in 1926 –
against my vote – concessions which I considered and still consider
impermissible. The circumstance that I did not protest openly against
these concessions was rather a mistake. But there was generally not much
room for open protests – we were working illegally. In any event, both
sides were very well acquainted with my views on the controversial
questions. Within the 1923 opposition, nine hundred and ninety-nine out
of a thousand if not more stood on my point of view and not on the point
of view of Zinoviev or Radek. With such a relation between the two
groups in the bloc there might have been these or other partial mistakes
but there was not so much as a semblance of adventurism.

With Shachtman the case is completely different. Who was right in the
past and just when and where? Why did Shachtman stand first with Abern,
then with Cannon and now back again with Abern? Shachtman’s own
explanation concerning the past bitter factional struggles is worthy not
of a responsible political figure but of a nursemaid: Johnny was a
little wrong, Max a little, all were a little wrong, and now we are all
a little right. Who was in the wrong and in what, not a word of this.
There is no tradition. Yesterday is expunged from the calculations – and
what is the reason for all this? Because in the organism of the party
comrade Shachtman plays the role of a floating kidney.

Seeking historical analogies, Shachtman avoids one example to which his
present bloc does actually bear a resemblance. I have in mind the
so-called August bloc of 1912. I participated actively in this bloc. In
a certain sense I created it. Politically I differed with the Mensheviks
on all fundamental questions. I also differed with the ultra-left
Bolsheviks, the _Vperyodists_. In the general tendency of politics I
stood far more closely to the Bolsheviks. But I was against the Leninist
“regime” because I had not yet learned to understand that in order to
realize the revolutionary goal a firmly welded centralized party is
indispensable. And so I formed this episodic bloc consisting of
heterogeneous elements which was directed against the proletarian wing
of the party.

In the August bloc the liquidators had their own faction, the
_Vperyodists_ also had something resembling a faction. I stood isolated,
having co-thinkers but no faction. Most of the documents were writ ten
by me and through avoiding principled differences had as their aim the
creation of a semblance of unanimity upon “concrete political
questions.” Not a word about the past! Lenin subjected the August bloc
to merciless criticism and the harshest blows fell to my lot. Lenin
proved that inasmuch as I did not agree politically with either the
Mensheviks or the _Vperyodists_ my policy was adventurism. This was
severe but it was true.

As “mitigating circumstances” let me mention the fact that I had set as
my task not to support the right or ultra-left factions against the
Bolsheviks but to unite the party as a whole. The Bolsheviks too were
invited to the August conference. But since Lenin flatly refused to
unite with the Mensheviks (in which he was completely correct) I was
left in an unnatural bloc with the Mensheviks and the _Vperyodists_. The
second mitigating circumstance is this, that the very phenomenon of
Bolshevism as the genuine revolutionary party was then developing for
the first time – in the practice of the Second International there were
no precedents. But I do not thereby seek in the least to absolve myself
from guilt. Notwithstanding the conception of permanent revolution which
undoubtedly disclosed the correct perspective, I had not freed myself at
that period especially in the organizational sphere from the traits of a
petty-bourgeois revolutionist. I was sick with the disease of
conciliationism toward Menshevism and with a distrustful attitude toward
Leninist centralism. Immediately after the August conference the bloc
began to disintegrate into its component parts. Within a few months I
was not only in principle but organizationally outside the bloc.

I address Shachtman today with the very same rebuke which Lenin
addressed to me 27 years ago: “Your bloc is unprincipled.” “Your policy
is adventurism.” With all my heart I express the hope that from these
accusations Shachtman will draw the same conclusions which I once drew.

 

The Factions in the Struggle

Shachtman expresses surprise over the fact that Trotsky, “the leader of
the 1923 opposition,” is capable of supporting the bureaucratic faction
of Cannon. In this as in the question of workers’ control Shachtman
again reveals his lack of feeling for historical perspective. True, in
justifying their dictatorship the Soviet bureaucracy exploited the
principles of Bolshevik centralism but in the very process it
transformed them into their exact opposite. But this does not discredit
in the least the methods of Bolshevism. Over a period of many years
Lenin educated the party in the spirit of proletarian discipline and
severe centralism. In so doing he suffered scores of times the attack of
petty-bourgeois factions and cliques. Bolshevik centralism was a
profoundly progressive factor and in the end secured the triumph of the
revolution. It is not difficult to understand that the struggle of the
present opposition in the Socialist Workers Party has nothing in common
with the struggle of the Russian opposition of 1923 against the
privileged bureaucratic caste but it does instead bear great resemblance
to the struggle of the Mensheviks against Bolshevik centralism.

Cannon and his group are according to the opposition “an expression of a
type of politics which can be best described as bureaucratic
conservatism.” What does this mean? The domination of a conservative
labor bureaucracy, share-holder in the profits of the national
bourgeoisie, would be unthinkable without direct or indirect support of
the capitalist state. The rule of the Stalinist bureaucracy would be
unthinkable without the GPU, the army, the courts, etc. The Soviet
bureaucracy supports Stalin precisely because he is the bureaucrat who
defends their interests better than anybody else. The trade union
bureaucracy supports Green and Lewis precisely because their vices as
able and dexterous bureaucrats, safeguard the material interests of the
labor aristocracy. But upon what base does “bureaucratic conservatism”
rest in the SWP? Obviously not of material interests but on a selection
of bureaucratic types in contrast to an other camp where innovators,
initiators and dynamic spirits have been gathered together. The
opposition does not point to any objective, ie., social basis for
“bureaucratic conservatism.” Everything is reduced to pure psychology.
Under such conditions every thinking worker will say: It is possible
that comrade Cannon actually does sin in the line of bureaucratic
tendencies – it is hard for me to judge at a distance – but if the
majority of the National Committee and of the entire party who are not
at all interested in bureaucratic “privileges” support Cannon they do so
not because of his bureaucratic tendencies but in spite of them. This
means that he has some other virtues which far outweigh his personal
failing. That is what a serious party member will say. And in my opinion
he would be correct.

To substantiate their complaints and accusations the leaders of the
opposition bring up disjointed episodes and anecdotes which can be
counted by the hundred and the thousand in every party and which
moreover are impossible to verify objectively in most instances.
Furthest from my mind is indulgence in a criticism of the story-telling
section of the opposition documents. But there is one episode about
which I wish to express myself as a participant and a witness. The
leaders of the opposition very superciliously relate how easily,
presumably without criticism and without deliberation, Cannon and his
group accepted the program of transitional demands. Here is what I wrote
on April 15, 1938 to comrade Cannon concerning the elaboration of this
program:

"We have sent you the transitional program draft and a short statement
about the labor party. Without your visit to Mexico I could never have
written the program draft because I learned during the discussions many
important things which permitted me to be more explicit and concrete
...”

Shachtman is thoroughly acquainted with these circumstances since he was
one of those who took part in the discussion.

Rumors, personal speculations and simple gossip cannot help but occupy
an important place in petty-bourgeois circles where people are bound
together not by party ties but by personal relationships and where no
habit has been acquired of a class approach to events. It is passed from
ear to ear that I have been visited exclusively by representatives of
the majority and that I have been led astray from the path of truth.
Dear comrades, don’t believe this nonsense! I collect political
information through the very same methods that I use in my work
generally. A critical attitude toward information is an organic part of
the political physiognomy of every politician. If I were incapable of
distinguishing false communications from true ones what value could my
judgments have in general?

I am personally acquainted with no less than twenty members of Abern’s
faction. To several of them I am obligated for their friendly help in my
work and I consider all of them, or almost all, as valuable party
members. But at the same time I must say that what distinguishes each of
them to one degree or another is the aura of a petty-bourgeois milieu,
lack of experience in the class struggle and to a certain extent lack of
the requisite connection with the proletarian movement. Their positive
features link them to the Fourth International. Their negative features
bind them to the most conservative of all factions.

“An ‘anti-intellectual’ and ‘anti-intellectuals’ attitude is drummed
into the minds of party members,” complains the document on
_Bureaucratic Conservatism_. (INTERNAL BULLETIN, Vol.2 No.6, January
1940, p.12) This argument is dragged in by the hair. It is not those
intellectuals who have completely gone over to the side of the
proletariat who are in question, but those elements who are seeking to
shift our party to the position of petty-bourgeois eclecticism. This
same document declares: “An anti-New York propaganda is spread which is
at bottom a catering to prejudices that are not always healthy.” (IDEM)
What prejudices are referred to here? Apparently anti-Semitism. If
anti-Semitic or other race prejudices exist in our party, it is
necessary to wage a ruthless struggle against them through open blows
and not through vague insinuations. But the question of the Jewish
intellectuals and semi-intellectuals of New York is a _social_ not a
_national_ question. In New York there are a great many Jewish
proletarians, but Abern’s faction is not built up of them. The
petty-bourgeois elements of this faction have proved incapable to this
day of finding a road to the Jewish workers. They are contented with
their own milieu.

There has been more than one instance in history – more precisely it
does not happen otherwise in history – that with the transition of the
party from one period to the next those elements which played a
progressive role in the past but who proved incapable of adapting
themselves with timeliness to new tasks have drawn closer together in
the face of danger and revealed not their positive but almost
exclusively their negative traits. That is precisely the role today of
Aberns faction in which Shachtman plays the role of journalist and
Burnham the role of theoretical brain trust. “Cannon knows,” persists
Shachtman, “how spurious it is to inject in the present discussion the
‘Abern question.’ He knows what every informed party leader, and many
members know, namely, that for the past several years at least there has
been no such thing as an ‘Abern Group’.” I take the liberty of remarking
that if anybody is here distorting reality it is none other than
Shachtman himself. I have been following the development of the internal
relations in the American section for about ten years. The specific
composition and the special role played by the New York organization
became clear to me before anything else. Shachtman will perhaps recall
that while I was still in Prinkipo I advised the National Committee to
move away from New York and its atmosphere of petty-bourgeois squabbles
for a while to some industrial center in the provinces. Upon arriving in
Mexico I gained the opportunity of becoming better acquainted with the
English language and thanks to many visits from my northern friends, of
arriving at a more vivid picture of the social composition and the
political psychology of the various groupings. On the basis of my own
personal and immediate observations during the past three years I assert
that the Abern faction has existed uninterruptedly, statically if not
“dynamically.”

The members of the Abern faction, given a modicum of political
experience, are easily recognizable not only by their social traits but
by their approach to all questions. These comrades have always formally
denied the existence of their faction. There was a period when some of
them actually did try to dissolve themselves into the party. But they
attempted this by doing violence to themselves, and on all critical
questions they came out in relation to the party as a group. They were
far less interested in principled questions, in particular the question
of changing the social composition of the party, than in combinations at
the top, personal conflicts and generally occurrences in the “general
staff.” This is the Abern school. I persistently warned many of these
comrades that soaking in this artificial existence would unfailingly
bring them sooner or later to a new factional explosion.

The leaders of the opposition speak ironically and disparagingly of the
proletarian composition of the Cannon faction; in their eyes this
incidental “detail” carries no importance. What is this if not
petty-bourgeois disdain combined with blindness? At the Second Congress
of the Russian Social-Democrats in 1903 where the split took place
between the Bolsheviks and the Mensheviks there were only three workers
among several scores of delegates. All three of them turned up with the
majority. The Mensheviks jeered at Lenin for Investing this fact with
great symptomatic significance. The Mensheviks themselves explained the
position the three workers took by their lack of “maturity.” But as is
well known it was Lenin who proved correct.

If the proletarian section of our American party is “politically
backward,” then the first task of those who are “advanced” should have
consisted in raising the workers to a higher level. But why has the
present opposition failed to find its way to these workers? Why did they
leave this work to the “Cannon clique”? What is involved here? Aren’t
the workers good enough for the opposition? Or is the opposition
unsuitable for workers?

It would be asinine to think that the workers’ section of the party is
perfect. The workers are only gradually reaching clear class
consciousness. The trade unions always create a culture medium for
opportunist deviations. Inevitably we will run up against this, question
in one of the next stages. More than once the party will have to remind
its own trade unionists that a _pedagogical adaptation to the more
backward layers of the proletariat must not become transformed into a
political adaptation to the conservative bureaucracy of the trade
unions._ Every new stage of development, every increase in the art ranks
and the complication of the methods of its work open up not only new
possibilities but also new dangers. Workers in the trade unions, even
those trained in the most revolutionary school, often display a tendency
to free themselves from party control. At the present time however, this
is not at all in question. At the present time the non-proletarian
opposition, dragging behind it the majority of the non-proletarian
youth, is attempting to revise our theory, our program, our tradition –
and it does all this light-mindedly, in passing, for greater convenience
in the struggle against the “Cannon clique”. At the present time
disrespect for the party is shown not by the trade unionists but by the
petty-bourgeois oppositionists. It is precisely in order to prevent the
trade unionists from turning their backs to the party in the future that
it is necessary to decisively repulse these petty-bourgeois
oppositionists.

It is moreover impermissible to forget that the actual or possible
mistakes of those comrades working in the trade unions reflect the
pressure of the American proletariat as it is today. This is our class.
We are not preparing to capitulate to its pressure. But this pressure at
the same time shows us our main historic road. The mistakes of the
opposition on the other hand reflect the pressure of another and alien
class. An ideological break with that class is the elementary condition
for our future successes.

The reasonings of the opposition in regard to the youth are false in the
extreme. Assuredly, without the conquest of the proletarian youth the
revolutionary party cannot develop. But the trouble is that we have
almost an entirely petty-bourgeois youth, to a considerable degree with
a social-democratic. i.e., opportunist past. The leaders of this youth
have indubitable virtues and ability but, alas, they have been educated
in the spirit of petty-bourgeois combinationism and if they are not
wrenched out of their habitual milieu, if they are not sent without
high-sounding titles into working-class districts for day-to-day dirty
work among the proletariat, they can forever perish for the
revolutionary movement. In relation to the youth as in all the other
questions, Shachtman unfortunately has taken a position that is false to
the core.

 

It Is Time to Halt!

To what extent Shachtman’s thought from a false starting point has
become debased is to be seen from the fact that he depicts my position
as a defense of the “Cannon clique” and he harps several times on the
fact that in France I supported just as mistakenly the “Molinier
clique.” Everything is reduced to my supporting isolated individuals or
groups entirely independently of their program. The example of Molinier
only thickens the fog. I shall attempt to dispel it. Molinier was
accused not of retreating from our program but of being undisciplined,
arbitrary and of venturing into all sorts of financial adventures to
support the party and his faction. Since Molinier is a very energetic
man and has unquestionable practical capacities I found it necessary –
not only in the interests of Molinier but above all in the interests of
the organization itself – to exhaust all the possibilities of convincing
and re-educating him in the spirit of proletarian discipline. Since many
of his adversaries possessed all of his failings but none of his virtues
I did everything to convince them not to hasten a split but to test
Molinier over and over again. It was this that constituted my “defense”
of Molinier in the adolescent period of the existence of our French
section.

Considering a patient attitude toward blundering or undisciplined
comrades and repeated efforts to reeducate them in the revolutionary
spirit as absolutely compulsory I applied these methods by no means
solely to Molinier. I made attempts to draw closer into the party and
save Kurt Landau, Field, Weisbord, the Austrian Frey, the Frenchman
Treint, and a number of others. In many cases my efforts proved
fruitless; in a few cases it was possible to rescue valuable comrades.

In any case I did not make the slightest principled concession to
Molinier. When he decided to found a paper on the basis of “four
slogans” instead of our program, and set out independently to execute
this plan, I was among those who insisted upon his immediate expulsion.
But I will not hide the fact that at the Founding Congress of the Fourth
International I was in favor of once again testing Molinier and his
group within the framework of the International to see if they had
become convinced of the erroneousness of their policy. This time, too,
the attempt led to nothing. But I do not renounce repeating it under
suitable conditions once again. It is most curious that among the
bitterest opponents of Molinier there were people like Vereecken and
Sneevliet, who after they had broken with the Fourth International
successfully united with him.

A number of comrades upon acquainting themselves with my archives have
reproached me in a friendly way with having wasted and still continuing
to waste so much time on convincing “hopeless people.” I replied that
many times I have had the occasion to observe how people change with
circumstances and that I am therefore not ready to pronounce people as
“hopeless” on the basis of a few even though serious mistakes.

When it became clear to me that Shachtman was driving himself and a
certain section of the party into a blind alley I wrote him that if the
opportunity were mine I would immediately take an airplane and fly to
New York in order to discuss with him for seventy-two hour stretches at
a time. I asked him if he didn’t wish to make it possible somehow for us
to get together. Shachtman did not reply. This is wholly within his
right. It is quite possible that those comrades who may become
acquainted with my archives in the future will say in this case too that
my letter to Shachtman was a false step on my part and they will cite
this “mistake” of mine in connection with my over-persistent “defense”
of Molinier. They will not convince me. It is an extremely difficult
task to form an international proletarian vanguard under present
conditions. To chase after individuals at the expense of principles
would of course be a crime. But to do everything to bring back
outstanding yet mistaken comrades to our programme I have considered and
still consider my duty.

From the very Trade Union discussion which Shachtman utilised with such
glaring irrelevance I quote the words of Lenin which Shachtman should
engrave on his mind:

A mistake always begins by being small and growing ever-greater.
Differences always begin with trifles. Everypone has at times suffered a
tiny wound but should this tiny wound become infected, a mortal disease
may follow.”

Thus spoke Lenin on January 23, 1921. It is impossible not to make
mistakes; some err more frequently, others less frequently. The duty of
a proletarian revolutionist is not to persist in mistakes, not to place
ambition above the interests of the cause but to call a halt in time. It
is time for comrade Shachtman to call a halt! Otherwise the scratch
which has already developed into an ulcer can lead to gangrene.

January 24, 1940.
_Coycacan, D.F._

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. To young comrades I recommend that they study on this question the
works of Engels (ANTI-DÜHRING), Plekhanov and Antonio Labriola. – _L.T._

2. This article was already written when I read in the NEW YORK TIMES of
January 17 the following lines relating to former eastern Poland:

“In industry, drastic acts of expropriation have not yet been carried
out on a large scale. The main centers of the banking system, the
_railway_ system and a number of large industrial undertakings were
State-owned for years before the Russian occupation. In small and
medium-sized industries workmen now exercise control over production.

“The industrialists nominally retain a full right of ownership in their
own establishments, but they are compelled to submit statements of Costs
of production, and so on, for the consideration of the workmen’s
delegates. The latter, jointly, with the employers, fix wages,
conditions of work, and a ‘just rate of profit’ for the industrialist.”

Thus we see that “the realities of living events” do not at all submit
themselves to the pedantic and lifeless patterns of the leaders of the
opposition. Meanwhile our “.. abstractions” are becoming transformed
into flesh and blood. – _L.T._



A LETTER TO MARTIN ABERN


 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

First Published: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENSE OF MARXISM, New York 1942.
Checked against: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENCE OF MARXISM, London 1966,
pp.188-189.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

January 29, 1940

Dear Comrade Abern:

I received the communication about your alleged expression “This means
split” from Comrade Cannon. He wrote on December 28th, 1939:

Your document has already been widely distributed in the party. So far I
have heard only two definite comments from leaders of the minority.
Abern, after he had read the title and the first few paragraphs,
remarked to Goldman, “This means a split.”

I know Cannon as a trustworthy comrade and I didn’t have the slightest
reason to doubt the veracity of his communication.

You say this report “is a lie.” I know by a long experience that during
the sharp fight, misunderstandings of such a kind are very often without
bad will from one side or the other.

You ask me whether I made any effort to check the veracity of this
report. None at all. If I had spread it in private correspondence as a
fact known to me, it would not have been loyal. But I published it with
a remark “it has been reported” and so gave you the full possibility to
confirm or deny the report. I believe this to be the best checking
possible in a party discussion.

You say in the beginning of your letter: “I have disregarded in the past
a number of false statements, but I note among other things, in your
open letter ...” etc. What signifies here the phrase, “a number of false
statements”? From whom? What signifies the expression, “among other
things”? What kind of things? Don’t you believe that your expressions
can be understood by inexperienced comrades as vague insinuations? If,
in my article, there are “a number of false statements” and “other
things,” it would be better to enumerate them exactly. If the false
statements are not from me, I don’t understand why you introduce them in
your letter to me. I can also hardly understand how one can “disregard”
a number of false statements if they have any political importance: it
could be interpreted as a lack of attention toward the party.

In any case I note with satisfaction that you categorically deny the
sentence “this means split.” I interpret the energetic tone of your
letter in this sense, that your denial is not a formal one, that is,
that you deny not only the quotation, but that you consider as I do, the
idea of split itself as a despicable betrayal of the Fourth
International.

Fraternally yours,
LEON TROTSKY

Coyoacan, D.F.
Copy to Cannon



TWO LETTERS TO ALBERT GOLDMAN [1]


 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

First Published: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENSE OF MARXISM, New York 1942.
Checked against: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENCE OF MARXISM, London 1966,
pp.190-191.
All footnotes stem from the latter edition.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

February 10, 1940

Dear Comrade Goldman,

I agree completely with your letter of February 5th. If I published
Abern’s remark about the split, it was with the purpose of provoking a
clear and unambiguous statement from Comrade Abern and other leaders of
the opposition – not about the alleged hidden intentions of the majority
leaders in this respect but about their own.

I have already heard the aphorism about the “second-class citizens.” I
would ask the leaders of the opposition: when they call the opposing
group, “Cannon’s clique” or “conservative bureaucrats” and so you, do
they wish to make second class citizens of them? I can only add that
extreme sensitiveness is one of the most salient features of every petty
bourgeois faction. I don’t know if Shachtman, for example, wishes by his
_Open Letter_ to make me a second-class citizen. I am interested only in
his ideas, not in his psychoanalytical guessing.

I am a bit under the impression that, unnerved by a series of mistakes,
the leaders of the opposition push each other into a hysterical mood and
then in order to justify their factional hysteria in their own eyes,
they attribute to their adversaries the darkest and most incredible
designs. When they say my exchange of letters with Cannon was a
camouflage, I can only shrug my shoulders.

The best treatment for petty bourgeois hysteria is Marxist objectivism.
We will continue to discuss dialectics, Marxian sociology, the class
nature of the Soviet State, the character of the war, not with the
absurd and criminal purpose of provoking a split, but with the more
reasonable purpose of convincing an important part of the party and of
helping it pass over from a petty bourgeois position to a proletarian
one.

With warmest comradely greetings,
L. TROTSKY

------------------------------------------------------------------------

February 19, 1940

Dear Comrade Goldman,

A convention of the minority is only a caucus on a national scale. [2]
This is why it does not signify, in itself, a principled change of the
situation. It is only a new step on the same road, a bad step on the
road of split, but not necessarily the split itself. Possibly, even
surely, there are two or three tendencies inside the opposition in
respect to the split question and the aim of the convention is to unify
them. On what basis? Probably some leaders don’t see in their
desperation any other way than a split.

Under these conditions a vigorous intervention in favor of unity by the
majority could possibly make more difficult the task of the conscious
splitters. Could not your caucus or possibly even better, the official
majority of the NC or the PC address the Cleveland convention with a
message concerning one question only, namely the unity of the party. In
such a letter I wouldn’t introduce the question of the character of the
Soviet Union or of the mixed war, otherwise it could be understood that
their position on these questions must be abandoned as a precondition
for remaining in the party. Not at all. You accept them as they are, if
they have a real devotion to the party and the 4th International and are
ready to accept discipline in action.

With best greetings,
LEON TROTSKY

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. These letters were written by Trotsky in English.

2. The minority convoked a conference of their group in cleveland on
February 24-25, 1940. This conference resolved that there existed two
politically irreconcilable tendencies in the party and that “_the party
must extend to whichever group is the minority_ at the convention _the
right to publish a public political journal of its own_ defending the
general programme of the Fourth International [and which] would at the
same time present in an objective manner the special position of its
tendency on the disputed Russian question.” The majority rejected the
demands of the minority. – _Ed._



BACK TO THE PARTY [1]


 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

First Published: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENSE OF MARXISM, New York 1942.
Checked against: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENCE OF MARXISM, London 1966,
pp.192-195.
All footnotes stem from the latter edition.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

February 21, 1940

Dear Comrades,

The leaders of the Minority have not as yet answered any theoretical or
political argument from our part. The inconsistency of their own
arguments was unmasked in the writings of the Majority. Now the
opposition leaders seem to have passed over to guerrilla warfare:

It is the fate of many other defeated armies. Comrade A. Goldman
characterized aptly the new method of the opposition in his circular
letter of February 12th. One of the most curious examples of this new
warfare is the more valiant than sensible attack of Comrade MacDonald in
connection with my LIBERTY article. He didn’t find, you see, in this
article an analysis of the contradictory character of the Soviet state
and of the “progressive role” of the Red Army. With the same logic which
he shows in the editing of PARTISAN REVIEW as in his analysis of the
Kronstadt uprising, he discovers that I am “in reality” a minorityite, a
Shachtmanite, or a MacDonaldist, at least when I speak for the bourgeois
press and that my contrary declarations, capitulatory toward Stalinism,
are made only in the internal bulletins for the purpose of helping
Cannon. If we should express MacDonald’s discovery in a more articulate
manner, it would signify: When Trotsky wishes to adapt himself to the
bourgeois public opinion, to make himself agreeable to the readers of
LIBERTY, he writes like Shachtman, and almost like MacDonald; but when
he speaks to the Party, he becomes terribly anti-minority. The PARTISAN
REVIEW is very interested in psychoanalysis and I permit myself to say
that the editor of this review, if he analyzes himself a bit, would
recognize that he has uncovered his own subconscious.

Nobody asks from the Minority that they analyze in every article and in
every speech the contradictory nature of the Soviet state and the
contradictory role of the Red Army. What we ask of them is that they
understand this nature and this role and that they apply their
understanding adequately at every occasion. My article was devoted to
Stalin’s politics and not to the nature of the Soviet state. In the
Mexican bourgeois press, there was published an anonymous statement
asserting “from sources near to Trotsky” that I approve Stalin’s
international politics and that I am seeking a reconciliation with
Stalin. I don’t know whether such statements appeared also in the United
States’ press. It is clear that the Mexican press reproduced only in its
own manner the terribly serious accusation of MacDonald and Company
about my capitulation to Stalinism. In order to prevent such a misuse of
the internal discussion by the world bourgeois press, I devoted my
article in LIBERTY to the unmasking of Stalin’s role in international
politics and not at all to the sociological analysis of the nature of
the Soviet state. I wrote what I found more urgent for that moment.
Politics consists not in saying at each occasion everything one knows,
but in saying at the given occasion just what is necessary. Possibly I
coincided thereby with some assertions of the opposition, but surely the
corresponding assertions of the opposition were only a repetition of
thoughts that we expressed a thousand times before MacDonald appeared on
our horizon.

But we will pass to more serious things. Comrade Abern’s letter to me is
an absolutely clear enunciation of his will to split. The justification
he gives is simultaneously lamentable and scandalous these are the two
mildest words I can find. If “Cannon’s clique” should have the majority
in the convention, it will, you see, transform Abern and his associates
into “second-class” citizens. This is why he, Abern, prefers to have his
own state where he will be like Weisbord, Field and Oehler, the first of
the first-class citizens. Who can decide about the places of different
“citizens” inside the Party? The Party itself. How can the Party come to
a decision? Through a free discussion. Who took the initiative in this
discussion? Abern and his associates. Where or are they limited in the
use of their pen or their tongue? Not at all. They didn’t succeed, it
seems from Abern’s letter, in convincing the Party. Worse than that:
they discredited themselves a bit in the eyes of the Party and the
International. This is very regret table because they are valuable
people. They could re-establish their authority now only by assiduous
and serious work in the Party. It needs time, patience and firmness. But
it seems that Abern lost hope in ever convincing the Party based on the
principles of the Fourth International. The split tendency is a kind of
desertion. This is why it is so lamentable.

But it is also scandalous The underlying tone is the contempt of
petty-bourgeois elements for the proletarian majority: We are such
excellent writers, speakers, organizers, and they, the uncultivated
people, are incapable of appreciating us at face value. Better to build
our own league of elevated souls.

In the Third International we persisted with all our power to remain a
tendency or a faction. They persecuted us, they deprived us of all the
means of legal expression, they invented the worst calumnies, in the
USSR they arrested and shot our comrades – in spite of all we didn’t
wish to separate ourselves from the workers. We considered ourselves as
a faction to the very last possibility. And all that – in spite of the
corrupt totalitarian bureaucracy of the Third International. The Fourth
International is the only honest revolutionary organization in the
world. We don’t have a professional bureaucracy. Our “apparatus” has no
means of coercion. Every question is decided and every comrade is
appreciated through methods of the most complete party democracy. If the
majority of party members are mistaken, the minority can, by and by,
educate them. If not before the next convention, then after it. The
minority can attract new members to the Party and transform itself into
a majority. It is necessary only to have a bit of confidence in the
workers and a bit of hope that the workers can be imbued with confidence
in the leaders of the opposition. But these leaders created in their own
milieu an atmosphere of hysteric impatience. They adapt themselves to
bourgeois public opinion, but they don’t wish to adapt themselves to the
rhythm of development of the Fourth International. Their impatience has
a class character, it is the reverse side of the contempt of
petty-bourgeois intellectuals toward the workers. This is why the split
tendency expressed by Abern is so scandalous

Comrade Abern in his appreciation as in his perspective is moved by
hatred. And personal hatred is an abominable feeling in politics. I am
sure that Abern’s attitude and his split objectives can only repulse
every sound member of the opposition. Back to the Party, comrades
Abern’s way is a blind alley. There is no other way than that of the
Fourth International.

LEON TROTSKY

Coyoacan, D.F.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. This letter was written by Trotsky in English.



“SCIENCE AND STYLE” [1]


 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

First Published: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENSE OF MARXISM, New York 1942.
Checked against: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENCE OF MARXISM, London 1966,
pp.192-195.
All footnotes stem from the latter edition.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

February 23, 1940

Dear Comrades,

I received Burnham’s _Science and Style_. The abscess is open and this
is an important political advantage. The theoretical backwardness of the
American “radical” opinion is expressed by the fact that Burnham repeats
only – with some “modernized” illustrations – what Struve wrote in
Russia more than forty years ago and to a great degree what Diihring
tried to teach German Social Democracy three quarters of a century ago.
So much from the point of view of “science.” As far as “style” is
concerned, I frankly prefer Eastman.

The interest of the document is not at all of a theoretical character:
the thousand and first professorial refutation of dialectics has no more
worth than all its precedents. But, from the political point of view the
importance of the document is indisputable. It shows that the
theoretical inspirer of the opposition is not at all nearer to
scientific socialism than was Muste, the former associate of Abern.
Shachtman mentioned Bogdanov’s philosophy. But it is absolutely
impossible to imagine Bogdanov’s signature under such a document, even
after his definite rupture with Bolshevism. I believe the Party should
ask Comrades Abern and Shachtman, as I do at this moment: What do you
think of Burnham’s “science” and of Burnham’s “style”? The question of
Finland is important but it is finally only an episode and the change of
the international situation, revealing the genuine factors of events,
can at once dissipate the divergences on this concrete issue. But can
Comrades Abern and Shachtman now, after the appearance of _Science and
Style_, continue to carry the slightest responsibility, not for tbe poor
document as such, but for Burnham’s entire conception on science,
Marxism, politics, and “morals.” Those Minorityites who prepared
themselves for a split should consider that they would be connected not
for a week and not for the duration of the Soviet-Finnish War, but for
years with a “leader” who has in his entire conception nothing in common
with the proletarian revolution.

The abscess is open. Abern and Shachtman can no longer repeat that they
wish only to discuss Finland and Cannon a bit. They can no longer play
blind man’s buff with Marxism and with the Fourth International. Should
the Socialist Workers Party remain in the tradition of Marx, Engels,
Franz Mehring, Lenin and Rosa Luxemburg,—a tradition which Burnham
proclaims “reactionary,” – or should it accept Burnham’s conceptions
which are only a belated reproduction of pre-Marxian petty-bourgeois
socialism?

We know too well what such revisionism signified politically in the
past. Now in the epoch of the death-agony of the bourgeois society, the
political consequences of Burnhamism would be incom parably more
immediate and anti-revolutionary. Comrades Abern and Shachtman, you have
the floor!

LEON TROTSKY

Coyoacan, D.F.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. This letter was written by Trotsky in English.



A LETTER TO JAMES P. CANNON [1]


 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

First Published: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENSE OF MARXISM, New York 1942.
Checked against: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENCE OF MARXISM, London 1966,
p.198.
All footnotes stem from the latter edition.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

February 27, 1940

Dear Friend,

I am answering your letter of February 20th. The Minority convention is
now, as I suppose, over and I believe that in the concrete tactical
question which you analyze in your letter, your immediate moves depend
at least to 51 per cent on the results of this convention.

You are convinced that the Minority as a whole is preparing for a split
and that you cannot win over anyone else. I accept this premise. But the
more was it necessary to accomplish before the Cleveland convention an
energetic gesture of peace in order to change radically your line after
their negative answer. I appreciate completely your considerations in
favor of the necessity to publish an issue of the NEW INTERNATIONAL
preparing public opinion for the split. But the Minority convention took
place on the 24th-25th of February and the Party convention will not be
until the beginning of April. You have enough time at your disposal for
the proposal of peace, for the denunciation of the Minority’s refusal,
and for the publication of the issue of the NEW INTERNATIONAL. We must
do everything in order to convince also the other sections [2] that the
Majority exhausted all the possibilities in favor of unity. This is why
we three made the proposition to the International Executive Committee:
it is necessary also to put to test every member of this not unimportant
body.

I understand well the impatience of many Majority comrades (I suppose
that this impatience is not infrequently connected with theoretical
indifference), but they should be reminded that the happenings in the
Socialist Workers Party have now a great inter national importance and
that you must act not only on the basis of your subjective
appreciations, as correct as they may be, but on the basis of objective
facts available to everyone.

W. RORK [_Leon Trotsky_]

Coyoacan, D.F.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. This letter was written by Trotsky in English.

2. Trotsky refers to other sections of the Fourth International. – _Ed._



A LETTER TO JOSEPH HANSEN [1]


 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

First Published: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENSE OF MARXISM, New York 1942.
Checked against: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENCE OF MARXISM, London 1966,
pp.199-200.
All footnotes stem from the latter edition.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

February 29, 1940

My dear Joe,

If Shachtman affirms that the letter quoted by me about Spain was signed
not only by him but also by Cannon and Carter, then he is completely
mistaken. I would of course not have hidden the other signatures but
they did not exist. As you will see from the photographs, the letter was
signed only by Max Shachtman.

In my article I admitted that in different questions the Majority
comrades could have shared the errors of Shachtman but they never made a
system of them, they never transformed them into a factional platform.
And that is the whole question.

Abern and Burnham are indignant that I quote their oral declarations
without a previous “verification.” They mean obviously that instead of
publishing these alleged declarations and of giving to both 0f them the
full possibility to confirm or to deny them, I should send an
investigating committee from here with 5 or 7 impartial persons and a
couple of stenographers. And why the terrible moral noise? Burnham
several times identified dialectics with religion. Yes, it is a fact.
But on this special occasion he didn’t pronounce the sentence I quote
(as reported to me). Oh, horror! Oh, Bolshevik cynicism, etc.!

The same with Abern. [2] In his letter to me he shows clearly that he is
preparing for a split. But you see, he never pronounced to Goldman the
sentence about split. It is a slander! A dishonest invention A calumny,
etc.!

As far as I remember, my article on morals begins with a remark about
the moral sweatings of the disorientated petty bourgeois. We have now a
new occurrence of the same phenomenon in our own party.

The new moralists quote, I heard, my terrible crime concerning Eastman
and Lenin’s Testament. [3] What despicable hypocrites! Eastman published
the document on his own initiative in a moment when our faction decided
to interrupt all public activity in order to avoid a premature split.
Don’t forget it was before the famous Anglo-Russian Trade Union
Committee and before the Chinese Revolution, even before the appearance
of the Zinoviev opposition. We were obliged to maneuver in order to win
time. On the contrary, the Troika wished to utilize Eastman’s
publication in order to provoke a kind of oppositional abortion. They
presented an ultimatum: Either I must sign the declaration written by
the Troika in my name or they will immediately open the fight on the
matter. The opposition center decided unanimously that _this_ issue at
_this_ moment is absolutely unfavorable, that I must accept the
ultimatum and sign my name under a declaration written by the Politburo.
The transforming of this political necessity into an abstract moral
question is only possible for petty-bourgeois fakers who are ready to
proclaim: _Pereat mundus, fiat justicia!_ (the world can perish, long
live justice!), but who have a far more indulgent bookkeeping for their
own daily procedures. And these people imagine that they are
revolutionaries! Our old Mensheviks were real heroes in comparison with
them.

W. RORK [_Leon Trotsky_]

Coyoacan, D.F.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. This letter was written by Trotsky in English.

2. See Trotsky’s letter to Abern, January 29, 1940. – _Ed._

3. In 1925 Max Eastman released for publication in the New York times
the text of Lenbin’s Testament and included it in his book SINCE LENIN
DIED.

At the hearings of teh Dewey Commission, Trotsky gave th3 following
explanation for disavowing Eastman at that time.

“Eastman published this document without consulting me and the others,
and by these means he sharpened terribly the inner struggle in the
Soviet Union, in the Politburo, which was the beginning of the split. We
tried on our side to avoid a split. The majority of the Politburo asked
me, demanded of me, to take a position toward this. It was a very
diplomatic document that I signed at that time.” (THE CASE OF LEON
TROTSKY, p.429) – _Ed._



THREE LETTERS TO FARRELL DOBBS [1]


 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

First Published: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENSE OF MARXISM, New York 1942.
Checked against: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENCE OF MARXISM, London 1966,
pp.201-206.
All footnotes stem from the latter edition.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

March 4, 1940

Dear Comrade Dobbs,

It is of course difficult for me to follow from here the feverish
political evolution of the opposition. But I agree that they produce
more and more the impression of people who are hastening to burn all the
bridges behind them. Burnham’s article _Science and Style_ is not
unexpected in itself. But the calm acceptance of the article by
Shachtman, Abern and the others is the most disappointing symptom, not
only from the theoretical and political point of view, but also from
that of their genuine ideas concerning the unity of the Party.

So far as I can judge from here, they wish a split under the name of
unity. Shachtman finds, or better to say invents “historical
precedents.” In the Bolshevik Party the opposition had its own public
papers, etc. He forgets only that the Party at that time had hundreds 0f
thousands of members, that the discussion had as its task to reach these
hundreds of thousands and to convince them. Under such conditions it was
not easy to confine the discussion to internal circles. On the other
hand the danger of the co-existence of the Party and the opposition
papers was mitigated by the fact that the final decision depended upon
hundreds of thousands of workers and not upon two small groups. The
American Party has only a comparatively small number of members, the
discussion was and is more than abundant. The demarcation lines seem to
be firm enough, at least for the next period. Under such conditions for
the opposition to have their own public paper or magazine is a means not
to convince the Party but to appeal against the Party to the external
world.

The homogeneity and cohesion of a revolutionary propaganda organization
such as the SWP must be incomparably greater than that of a mass party.
I agree with you that under such conditions the Fourth International
should and could not admit a purely fictitious unity under the cover of
which two independent organizations address the external world with
different theories, different pro grams, different slogans and different
organizational principles. Under these conditions an open split would be
a thousand times preferable to such a hypocritical unity.

The opposition refers also to the fact that we had in certain periods
two parallel groups in the same country. But such abnormal situations
were temporarily admitted only in two cases: When the political
physiognomy of both groups or of one of them was not clear enough and
the Fourth International needed time in order to make up its own mind
about the matter; or a co-existence of two groups was admitted in the
case of a very sharp but limited concrete disagreement (entrance in the
PSOP [2], etc.). The situation in the United States is absolutely
different. We had a united party with a serious tradition, now we have
two organizations one of which, thanks to its social composition and
external pressure, entered, during a period of a couple of months, into
an irreconcilable conflict with our theory, our program, our politics,
our organizational methods.

If they agree to work with you on the basis of democratic centralism,
you can hope to convince and to win over the best elements by common
practice. (They have the same right to hope to convince you.) But as an
independent organization with their own publication they can only
develop in Burnham’s direction. In this case the Fourth International
can not have, in my opinion, the slightest interest in granting them its
cover, i.e., to camouflage before the workers their inevitable
degeneration. On the contrary, the interests of the Fourth International
would be in this case to force the opposition to have its experience
absolutely independently from us, not only with out the protection of
our banner, but on the contrary, with the sharpest warning openly
addressed by us to the masses.

This is why the convention has not only the right but the duty to
formulate a sharp and clear alternative: Either a genuine unity on the
principle of democratic centralism (with serious and large guarantees
for the Minority _inside_ the Party) or an open, clear and demonstrative
break before the forum of the working class. [3]

With best greetings,
W. RORK [_Leon Trotsky_]

P.S. I just received the Cleveland resolution on Party unity. My
impression: The rank and file of the Minority do not wish a split. The
leaders are interested not in a political but a purely journalistic
activity. The leaders presented a resolution on Party split under the
name of a resolution on Party unity with the purpose of involving their
followers in a split. The resolution says: “Minorities of the Bolshevik
Party both before and during the First World War” had their own public
political journals. What minorities? At what time? What journals? The
leaders induce their followers into an error in order to camouflage
their split intentions.

All hopes of the Minority leaders are based on their literary
capacities. They assure one another that their paper would surely excel
that of the Majority. Such was always the hope of the Russian Mensheviks
who as a petty-bourgeois faction had more intellectuals and able
journalists. But their hopes were in vain. A fluent pen is not
sufficient to create a revolutionary party: a granite theoretical base
is necessary, a scientific program, a consistency in political thinking
and firm organizational principles. The opposition as an opposition has
nothing of all that; it is the opposite of all that. This is why I agree
with you completely: If they wish to present Burnham’s theories,
Shachtman’s politics and Abern’s organizational methods to the external
public opinion, they should do it in their own name without any
responsibility of the Party or of the Fourth International.

W.R.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

April 4, 1940

Dear Comrade Dobbs,

When you receive this letter, the convention will have already
progressed and you will probably have a clear idea if the split is
unavoidable. In this case the Abern question would lose its interest.
But in the case that the Minority makes a retreat, I permit myself to
insist upon my previous propositions. The necessity of preserving the
secrets of the discussions and decisions in the National Committee is a
very important interest but not the only one and in the present
situation not the most important. About 40 per cent of Party members
believe Abern is the best organizer. If they remain inside the Party,
you cannot help but give Abern the chance to show his superiority in
organizational matters or to compromise himself. In the first session of
the new National Committee, the first decision should proclaim that
nobody has the right to divulge the internal happenings in the National
Committee except the committee as a whole or its official institutions
(Political Committee or Secretariat). The Secretariat could in its turn
concretize the rules of secrecy. If, in spite of all, a leak occurs, an
official investigation should be made and if Abern should be guilty, he
should receive a public warning; in case of another offense, he should
be eliminated from the Secretariat. Such a procedure, in spite of its
temporary disadvantages is, in the long run, incomparably more favorable
than to leave Abern, the New York Organizer, outside the Secretariat,
i.e., outside the real control of the Secretariat.

I understand very well that you are satisfied with the present
Secretariat. In case of a split it is possibly the best Secretariat one
could wish. But if the unity is preserved, you can’t have a Secretariat
composed only of Majority representatives. You should possibly have a
Secretariat even of five members – three Majorityites and two
Minorityites.

If the Opposition is wavering, it would be best to let them know in an
informal way: We are ready to retain Shachtman as a member not only of
the Political Committee but also of our editorial staff; we are even
ready to include Abern in the Secretariat; we are willing to consider
other combinations of the same kind; the only thing we cannot accept is
the transformation of the Minority into an independent political factor.

* * *

I received a letter from Lebrun on the IEC. A peculiar people! They
believe that now in the period of the death agony of capitalism, under
the conditions of war and coming illegality, Bolshevik centralism should
be abandoned in favor of unlimited democracy. Everything is topsy-turvy!
But their democracy has a purely individual meaning: Let me do as I
please. Lebrun and Johnson were elected to the IEC on the basis of
certain principles and as representatives of certain organizations. Both
abandoned the principles and ignored completely their own organizations.
These “democrats” acted completely as Bohemian freelancers. Should we
have the possibility of convoking an international congress, they would
surely be dismissed with the severest blame. They themselves don’t doubt
it. At the same time, they consider themselves as unremovable senators –
in the name of democracy!

As the French say, we must take war-time measures during a war. This
means that we must adapt the leading body of the Fourth International to
the real relationship of forces in our sections. There is more democracy
in this than in the pretensions of the unremovable senators.

If this question comes up for discussion, you can quote these lines as
my answer to Lebrun’s document.

W. RORK [_Leon Trotsky_]

Coyoacan, D.F.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

April 16, 1940

Dear Comrade Dobbs,

We received also your and Joe’s communications on the convention. As far
as we can judge from here, you did everything you could in order to
preserve the unity of the Party. If under these conditions the Minority
nevertheless commits a split, it will only show to every worker how far
they are from the principles of Bolshevism and how hostile to the
proletarian majority 0f the Party. About the details of your decisions,
we will judge more concretely when we have more information.

* * *

I permit myself to call to your attention another article, namely that
of Gerland against Burnham concerning symbolic logic, the logic of
Bertrand Russell and the others. The article is very sharp and in the
case of the opposition’s remaining in the Party and Burnham on the
editorial board of the NEW INTERNATIONAL the article should possibly be
rewritten from the point of view of “friendliness” of expressions. But
the presentation of symbolic logic is very serious and good and seems to
me very useful especially for the American readers.

Comrade Weber devoted also an important part of his last article to the
same item. My opinion is that he should elaborate this part in the form
of an independent article for the _New International_. We should now
continue systematically and seriously our theoretical campaign in favor
of dialectical materialism.

* * *

Jim’s pamphlet [4] is excellent. It is the writing of a genuine workers’
leader. If the discussion had not produced more than this document, it
would be justified.

With friendliest greetings for you all,
W. RORK [_Leon Trotsky_]

Coycacan, D.F.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. These letters were written by Trotsky in English.

2. PSOP – Socialist Party of Workers and Peasants of France. – _Ed._

3. The International Executive Committee should, a long time ago, have
presented such an alternative, but unfortunately the IEC does not exist.
– _L.T._

4. This refers to THE STRUGGLE FOR A PROLETARIAN PARTY, by James P.
Cannon. – _Ed._



PETTY-BOURGEOIS MORALISTS AND THE PROLETARIAN PARTY [1]


 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

First Published: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENSE OF MARXISM, New York 1942.
Checked against: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENCE OF MARXISM, London 1966,
pp.207-211.
All footnotes stem from the latter edition.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The discussion in the Socialist Workers Party of the United States was
thorough and democratic. The preparations for the convention were
carried out with absolute loyalty. The minority participated in the
convention, recognizing thereby its legality and authoritativeness. The
majority offered the minority all the necessary guarantees permitting it
to conduct a struggle for its own views after the convention. The
minority demanded a license to appeal to the masses over the head of the
party. The majority naturally rejected this monstrous pretension.
Meanwhile, behind the back of the party the minority indulged in shady
machinations and appropriated the NEW INTERNATIONAL which had been
published through the efforts of the entire party and of the Fourth
International. I should add that the majority had agreed to assign the
minority two posts out of the five on the editorial board of this
theoretical organ. But how can an intellectual “aristocracy” remain the
minority in a workers’ party? To place a professor on equal plane with a
worker – after all, that’s “bureaucratic conservatism”!

In his recent polemical article against me, Burnham explained that
socialism is a “moral ideal.” To be sure, this is not so very new. At
the opening of the last century, morality served as the basis for the
“True German Socialism” which Marx and Engels criticized at the very
beginning of their activity. At the beginning of our century, the
Russian Social Revolutionaries counterpoised the “moral ideal” to
materialistic socialism. Sad to say, these bearers of morality turned
out to be common swindlers in the field of politics. In 1917 they
betrayed the workers completely into the hands of the bourgeoisie and
foreign imperialism.

Long political experience has taught me that whenever a petty- bourgeois
professor or journalist begins talking about high moral standards it is
necessary to keep a firm hand on one’s pocketbook. It happened this
time, too. In the name of a “moral ideal” a petty-bourgeois intellectual
has picked the proletarian party’s pocket of its theoretical organ. Here
you have a tiny living example of the organizational methods of these
innovators, moralists and champions of democracy.

What is party democracy in the eyes of an “educated” petty bourgeois? A
regime which permits him to say and write whatever he pleases. What is
“bureaucratism” in the eyes of an “educated” petty bourgeois? A regime
in which the proletarian majority enforces by democratic methods its
decisions and discipline. Workers, bear this firmly in mind!

The petty-bourgeois minority of the SWP split from the proletarian
majority on the basis of a struggle against revolutionary Marxism.
Burnham proclaimed dialectic materialism to be incompatible with his
motheaten “science.” Shachtman proclaimed revolutionary Marxism to be of
no moment from the standpoint of “practical tasks.” Abern hastened to
hook up his little booth with the anti-Marxist bloc. And now these
gentlemen label the magazine they filched from the party an “organ of
revolutionary Marxism.” What is this, if not ideological charlatanism?
Let the readers demand of these editors that they publish the sole
programmatic work of the minority, namely, Burnham’s article, _Science
and Style_. If the editors were not preparing to emulate a peddler who
markets rotten merchandise under fancy labels, they would themselves
have felt obliged to publish this article. Everybody could then see for
himself just what kind of “revolutionary Marxism” is involved here, But
they _will not dare do so_. They are ashamed to show their true faces.
Burnham is skilled at hiding his all too revealing articles and
resolutions in his briefcase, while Shachtman has made a profession of
serving as an attorney for other people’s views through lack of any
views of his own.

The very first “programmatic” articles of the purloined organ already
reveal completely the light-mindedness and hollowness of this new
anti-Marxist grouping which appears under the label of the “Third Camp.”
What is this animal? There is the camp of capitalism; there is the camp
of the proletariat. But is there perhaps a “third camp” – a
petty-bourgeois sanctuary? In the nature of things, it is nothing else.
But, as always, the petty bourgeois camouflages his “camp” with the
paper flowers of rhetoric. Let us lend our ears! Here is one camp:
France and England. There’s another camp: Hitler and Stalin. And a third
camp: Burnham, with Shachtman. The Fourth International turns out for
them to be in Hitler’s camp (Stalin made this discovery long ago). And
so, a new great slogan: Muddlers and pacifists of the world, all ye
suffering from the pin-pricks of fate, rally to the “third” camp!

But the whole trouble is that two warring camps do not at all exhaust
the bourgeois world. What about all the neutral and semi- neutral
countries? What about the United States? Where should Italy and Japan be
assigned? The Scandinavian countries? India? China? We have in mind not
the revolutionary Indian or Chinese workers but rather India and China
as oppressed countries. The schoolboy schema of the three camps leaves
out a trifling detail: the colonial world, the greater portion of
mankind!

India is participating in the imperialist war on the side of Great
Britain. Does this mean that our attitude toward India – not the Indian
Bolsheviks but _India_ – is the same as toward Great Britain? If there
exist in this world, in addition to Shachtman and Burnham, only two
imperialist camps, then where, permit me to ask, shall we put India? A
Marxist will say that despite India’s being an integral part of the
British Empire and India’s participating in the imperialist war; despite
the perfidious policy of Gandhi and other nationalist leaders, our
attitude toward India is altogether different from our attitude toward
England. We defend India against England. Why then cannot our attitude
toward the Soviet Union be different from our attitude toward Germany
despite the fact that Stalin is allied with Hitler? Why can’t we defend
the more progressive social forms which are capable of development
against reactionary forms which are capable only of decomposition? We
not only can but we must The theoreticians of the stolen magazine
replace class analysis with a mechanistic construction very captivating
to petty-bourgeois intellectuals because of its pseudo-symmetry. Just as
the Stalinists camouflage their subservience to national socialism (the
Nazis) with harsh epithets addressed to the imperialist democracies, so
Shachtman and Co. cover up their capitulation to American petty.
bourgeois public opinion with the pompous phraseology of the “third
camp.” As if this “third camp” (what is it? a party? a club? a League of
Abandoned Hopes? a “People’s Front”?) is free from the obligation of
having a correct policy toward the petty bourgeoisie, the trade unions,
India and the USSR!

Only the other day Shachtman referred to himself in the press as a
“Trotskyist.” If _this_ be Trotskyism then I at least am no Trotskyist.
XVith the present ideas of Shachtman, not to mention Burn- ham, I have
nothing in common. I used to collaborate actively with the NEW
INTERNATIONAL, protesting in letters against Shachtman’s frivolous
attitude toward theory and his unprincipled concessions to Burnham, the
strutting petty-bourgeois pedant. But at the time both Burnham and
Shachtman were kept in check by the party and the International. Today
the pressure of petty-bourgeois democracy has unbridled them. Toward
their new magazine my attitude can only be the same as toward all other
petty-bourgeois counterfeits of Marxism. As for their “organizational
methods” and political “morality,” these evoke in me nothing but
contempt.

Had conscious agents of the class enemy operated through Shachtman, they
could not have advised him to do anything different from what he himself
has perpetrated. He united with anti-Marxists to wage a struggle against
Marxism. He helped fuse together a petty-bourgeois faction against the
workers. He refrained from utilizing internal party democracy and from
making an honest effort to convince the proletarian majority. He
engineered a split under the conditions of a world war. To crown it all,
he threw over this split the veil of a petty and dirty scandal, which
seems especially designed to provide our enemies with ammunition. Such
are these “democrats,” such are their “morals”!

But all this will prove of no avail. They are bankrupt. Despite the
betrayals of unstable intellectuals and the cheap gibes of all their
democratic cousins, the Fourth International will march forward on its
road, creating and educating a genuine selection of proletarian
revolutionists capable of understanding what the party is, what loyalty
to the banner means, and what revolutionary discipline signifies.

Advanced workers! Not one cent’s worth of confidence in the “third
front” of the petty bourgeoisie!

April 23, 1940

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. This article was first printed in the Socialist appeal of May 4,
1940. The minority split from the SWP after the party convention in
April 1940. Burnham, Shachtman and Abern, who held posts by party
appointment on the party’s theoretical organ, THE NEW INTERNATIONAL, and
who were trustees for teh party in the New International Publishing
Company, usurped the name of the magazine and appropriated its mailing
rights as their personla property. – _Ed._



BALANCE SHEET OF THE FINNISH EVENTS


 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Written: 25 April 1940.
First Published: _FOURTH INTERNATIONAL_, Vol.1 No.2, June 1940,
pp.41-44.
Reprinted: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENSE OF MARXISM, New York 1942.
Checked Against: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENCE OF MARXISM, London 1966,
pp.212-222.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

They Couldn’t Foresee

“WE” FORESAW the alliance with Hitler – write Shachtman and Burnham –
but the seizure of Eastern Poland? the invasion of Finland? – no, “we”
couldn’t foresee these events. Such completely improbable and utterly
unexpected events necessitate, they insist, a complete upheaval in our
politics. These politicians labored under the impression apparently that
Stalin needed an alliance with Hitler in order to roll Easter eggs with
him. They “foresaw” the alliance (when? where?) but couldn’t foresee
what it was for and why.

They recognize the right of the workers’ state to maneuver between the
imperialist camps and to conclude agreements with one against another.
These agreements should, obviously, have as their goal the defense of
the workers’ state, the acquisition of economic, strategical and other
advantages, and, if circumstances permit, the extension of the base of
the workers’ state. The degenerated workers’ state attempts to gain
these ends with its own bureaucratic methods, which at every step come
into conflict with the interests of the world proletariat. But exactly
what is so unexpected and so unpredictable about the Kremlin’s attempt
to get as much as it could from its alliance with Hitler?

If our ill-starred politicians failed to foresee “this” it is only
because they fail to think a single question seriously through to the
end. During the protracted negotiations with the Anglo-French delegation
in the summer of 1939, the Kremlin openly demanded military control over
the Baltic States. Because England and France refused to grant him this
control, Stalin broke off negotiations. This alone clearly indicated
that an agreement with Hitler would secure Stalin at least control over
the Baltic states. Politically mature people the world over approached
the matter from precisely this standpoint, asking themselves: Just how
will Stalin accomplish this task? Will he resort to military force? And
so on. The course of events depended, however, a great deal more on
Hitler than on Stalin. Generally speaking, concrete events cannot be
predicted. But the main direction of the events as they actually
unfolded contained nothing essentially new.

Because of the degeneration of the workers’ state, the Soviet Union
turned out at the threshold of the second imperialist war to be far
weaker than it need have been. Stalin’s agreement with Hitler had as its
objective the securing of the USSR from a German assault and, generally,
securing the USSR from being drawn into a major war. While seizing
Poland, Hitler had to protect himself on the East. Stalin was compelled,
with Hitler’s permission, to invade Eastern Poland in order to avail
himself of some supplementary guarantees against Hitler on the Western
boundary of the USSR. As a result of these events, however, the USSR
acquired a common frontier with Germany, and by virtue of this very fact
the danger from a victorious Germany became much more direct, while
Stalin’s dependence on Hitler was greatly increased.

The episode of the partitioning of Poland had its development and sequel
in the Scandinavian arena. Hitler could not have failed to give some
intimation to his “friend” Stalin that he planned to seize the
Scandinavian countries. Stalin could not have failed to break into a
cold sweat. After all, this signified complete German domination of the
Baltic Sea, of Finland, and hence constituted a direct threat to
Leningrad. Once again Stalin had to seek supplementary guarantees
against his ally, this time in Finland. However, he met with serious
resistance there. The “military excursion” dragged on. Meanwhile
Scandinavia threatened to become the arena of major warfare. Hitler, who
had completed his preparations for the blow against Denmark and Norway,
demanded that Stalin conclude an early peace. Stalin had to cut his
plans short, and renounce sovietizing Finland. These are the salient
features of the course of events in the European Northwest.

 

Small Nations in the Imperialist War

Under the conditions of World War, to approach the question of the fate
of small states from the standpoint of “national independence,”
“neutrality,” etc., is to remain in the sphere of imperialist mythology.
The struggle involves world domination. The question of the existence of
the USSR will be solved in passing. This problem which today remains in
the background, will at a certain moment come to the forefront. So far
as the small and second rate states are concerned, they are already
today pawns in the hands of the great powers. The sole freedom they
still retain, and this only to a limited extent, is the freedom of
choosing between masters.

Two governments struggle for a while in Norway: The government of the
Norwegian Nazis, covered by the German troops in the South, and the old
social-democratic government with their King in the North. Should the
Norwegian workers have supported the “democratic” camp against the
fascist? Following the analogy with Spain, it might at first glance
appear as if this question should be answered in the affirmative. In
reality this would be the crudest kind of blunder. In Spain there was an
isolated civil war; the intervention of foreign imperialist powers,
however important in itself, nevertheless remained of secondary
character. What is involved in Norway is the direct and immediate clash
between two imperialist camps in whose hands the warring Norwegian
governments are only auxiliary tools. On the world arena we support
neither the camp of the Allies nor the camp of Germany. Consequently we
have not the slightest reason or justification for supporting either one
of their temporary tools within Norway itself.

The very same approach must be applied to Finland. From the standpoint
of the strategy of the world proletariat, Finnish resistance was no more
an act of independent national defense than is the resistance of Norway.
This was best demonstrated by the Finnish government itself which
preferred to cease all resistance rather than have Finland completely
transformed into a military base of England, France and the United
States. Secondary factors like the national independence of Finland or
Norway, the defense of democracy, etc., however important in themselves,
are now intertwined in the struggle of infinitely more powerful world
forces and are completely subordinate to them. We must discount these
secondary factors and determine our policy in accordance with the basic
factors.

The programmatic theses of the Fourth International on the war gave an
exhaustive answer to this question six years ago. The theses state: “The
idea of national defense especially if it coincides with the idea of the
defense of democracy, can most readily be utilized to dupe the workers
of small and neutral countries (Switzerland, in particular Belgium, the
Scandinavian countries ...).” And further on: “Only petty-bourgeois
blockheads (like Robert Grimm) from a god-forsaken Swiss village could
seriously believe that the World War into which he will be drawn is a
means for defending the independence of Switzerland.” Other
petty-bourgeois equally stupid imagined that world war is a means for
defending Finland, that it is possible to determine proletarian
_strategy_ on the basis of a _tactical_ episode such as the invasion of
Finland by the Red Army.

 

Georgia and Finland

Just as during strikes directed against big capitalists, the workers
often bankrupt in passing highly respectable petty-bourgeois concerns,
so in a military struggle against imperialism, or in seeking military
guarantees against imperialism, the workers’ stateeven completely
healthy and revolutionary – may find itself compelled to violate the
independence of this or that small state. Tears over the ruthlessness of
the class struggle on either the domestic or the international arena may
properly be shed by democratic Philistines but not by proletarian
revolutionists.

The Soviet Republic in 1921 forcefully sovietized Georgia which
constituted an open gateway for imperialist assault in the Caucasus.
From the standpoint of the principles of national self-determination, a
good deal might have been said in objection to such sovietization. From
the standpoint of extending the arena of the socialist revolution,
military intervention in a peasant country was more than a dubious act.
From the standpoint of the self-defense of the workers’ state surrounded
by enemies, forceful sovietization was justified: The safeguarding of
the socialist revolution comes before formal democratic principles.

World imperialism for a long time utilized the question of violence in
Georgia as the rallying cry in mobilizing world public opinion against
the Soviets. The Second International took the lead in this campaign.
The Entente aimed at the preparation of a possible new military
intervention against the Soviets.

In exactly the same way as in the case of Georgia, the world bourgeoisie
utilized the invasion of Finland in mobilizing public opinion against
the USSR. The social-democracy in this case too came out as the vanguard
of democratic imperialism. The unhappy “third camp” of the stampeding
petty-bourgeois brings up the rear.

Along with the striking similarity between these two instances of
military intervention there is, however, a profound difference – the
present USSR is far from being the Soviet Republic of 1921. The 1934
theses of the Fourth International on War declare: “The monstrous
development of Soviet bureaucratism and the wretched living conditions
of the toilers have extremely reduced the attractive power of the USSR
for the world working class.” The Soviet-Finnish war revealed
graphically and completely that within gunshot of Leningrad, the cradle
of the October revolution, the present regime of the USSR is incapable
of exercising an attractive force. Yet it does not follow from this that
the USSR must be surrendered to the imperialists but only that the USSR
must be torn out of the hands of the bureaucracy.

 

“Where Is the Civil War?”

“But where is the Civil War in Finland which you promised?” demand the
leaders of the former opposition, who have now become the leaders of the
“third camp.” I promised nothing. I only analyzed one of the possible
variants of the further development of the Soviet-Finnish conflict. The
seizure of isolated bases in Finland was as probable as the complete
occupation of Finland. The seizure of bases presupposed maintaining the
bourgeois regime throughout the rest of the country. Occupation
presupposed a social overturn which would be impossible without
involving the workers and poorer farmers in civil war. The initial
diplomatic negotiations between Moscow and Helsinki indicated an attempt
to solve the question in the way it was solved with the other Baltic
states. Finland’s resistance compelled the Kremlin to seek its ends
through military measures. Stalin could justify the war before the
broadest masses only by sovietizing Finland. The appointment of the
Kuusmen government indicated that the fate awaiting Finland was not that
of the Baltic states but that of Poland, where Stalin – no matter what
the amateur columnists of the “third camp” scribble – found himself
compelled to provoke civil war and to overthrow property relations.

I specified several times that _if_ the war in Finland was not submerged
in a general war, and _if_ Stalin was not compelled to retreat before a
threat from the outside, then he would be forced to carry through the
sovietizing of Finland. This task by itself was much more difficult than
the sovietizing of Eastern Poland. More difficult from a _military_
standpoint, for Finland happened to be better prepared. More difficult
from a _national_ standpoint, for Finland possesses a long tradition of
struggle for national independence from Russia, whereas the Ukrainians
and the White Russians were fighting against Poland. More difficult from
a _social_ standpoint, for the Finnish bourgeoisie had in its own way
solved the pre-capitalist agrarian problem through the creation of an
agricultural petty-bourgeoisie. Nevertheless the military victory of
Stalin over Finland would unquestionably have made fully possible an
overthrow of property relations with more or less assistance from the
Finnish workers and small farmers.

Why then didn’t Stalin carry out this plan? Because a colossal
mobilization of bourgeois public opinion began against the USSR. Because
England and France seriously posed the question of military
intervention. Finally – last but not least in importance – because
Hitler could wait no longer. The appearance of English and French troops
in Finland would have meant a direct threat to Hitler’s Scandinavian
plans which were based on conspiracy and surprise. Caught in the vise of
a twofold danger – on one side from the Allies and from the other,
Hitler-Stalin renounced sovietizing Finland, limiting himself to the
seizure of isolated strategical positions.

The partisans of the “third camp” (the camp of the stampeding
petty-bourgeois) now piece together the following construction: Trotsky
deduced the civil war in Finland from the class nature of the USSR;
inasmuch as no civil war occurred, that signifies the USSR is not a
workers’ state. In reality there was no necessity whatever for logically
“deducing” a possible civil war in Finland from a sociological
definition of the USSR – it was sufficient to base oneself on the
experience in Eastern Poland. The overturn in property relations which
was accomplished there could have been achieved only by the state that
issued from the October revolution. This overturn was forced upon the
Kremlin oligarchy through its struggle for self-preservation under
specific conditions. There was not the slightest ground for doubting
that _under analogous conditions_ it would find itself compelled to
repeat the very same operation in Finland. That was all I pointed out.
But conditions changed during the course of the struggle. War, like
revolution, often develops abrupt turns. With the cessation of military
operations on the part of the Red Army, naturally there could be no talk
of the unfolding of civil war in Finland.

Every historical prognosis is always conditional, and the more concrete
the prognosis, the more conditional it is. A prognosis is not a
promissory note which can be cashed on a given date. Prognosis outlines
only the definite trends of the development. But along with these trends
a different order of forces and tendencies operate, which at a certain
moment begin to predominate. All those who seek exact predictions of
concrete events should consult the astrologists. Marxist prognosis aids
only in orientation. I made reservations several times as to the
conditionality of my prognosis as _one_ of several possible variants. To
clutch now, as the rock of salvation, at the tenth rate historical fact
that the fate of Finland was temporarily determined on the pattern of
Lithuania, Latvia and Esthonia rather than the pattern of Eastern Poland
can occur only to sterile scholastics or – the leaders of the “third
camp.”

 

The Defense of the Soviet Union

Stalin’s assault upon Finland was not of course _solely_ an act in
defense of the USSR. The politics of the Soviet Union is guided by the
Bonapartist bureaucracy. This bureaucracy is first and foremost
concerned with its power, its prestige, its revenues. It defends itself
much better than it defends the USSR. It defends itself at the expense
of the USSR and at the expense of the world proletariat. This was
revealed only too clearly throughout the entire development of the
Soviet-Finnish conflict. We cannot therefore either directly or
indirectly take upon ourselves even a shadow of responsibility for the
invasion of Finland which represents only a single link in the chain of
the politics of the Bonapartist bureaucracy.

It is one thing to solidarize with Stalin, defend his policy, assume
responsibility for it – as does the triply infamous Comintern – it is
another thing to explain to the world working class that no matter what
crimes Stalin may be guilty of we cannot permit world imperialism to
crush the Soviet Union, reestablish capitalism, and convert the land of
the October revolution into a colony. This explanation likewise
furnishes the basis for our defense of the USSR.

The attempt of the conjunctural defeatists, i.e., the adventurers in
defeatism, to extricate themselves from their difficulty by promising
that in the event the Allies intervene they will change their defeatist
policy to a defensist one is a contemptible evasion. It is in general
not easy to determine one’s policies according to a stop watch,
especially under wartime conditions. In the critical days of the
Soviet-Finnish war, as has now become known – the Allied general staffs
reached the conclusion that serious and quick aid to Finland could come
only through destroying the Murmansk railway by bombing it from the air.
From the point of view of strategy this was quite correct. The question
of intervention or non-intervention by the Allied air forces hung by a
hair. From the same hair apparently, the principled position of the
“third camp” also dangled. But from the very beginning we considered
that it was necessary to determine one’s position in accordance with the
basic class camps in the war. This is much more reliable.

 

No Surrender to the Enemy of Positions Already Won

The policy of defeatism is not punishment of a given government for this
or that crime it has committed but a conclusion from the class
relationships. The Marxist line of conduct in war is not based on
abstract moral and sentimental considerations but on the social
appraisal of a regime in its reciprocal relations with other regimes. We
supported Abyssinia not because the Negus was politically or “morally”
superior to Mussolini but because the defense of a backward country
against colonial oppression deals a blow to imperialism, which is the
main enemy of the world working class. We defend the USSR independently
of the policy of the Moscow Negus for two fundamental reasons. First,
the defeat of the USSR would supply imperialism with new colossal
resources and could prolong for many years the death agony of capitalist
society. Secondly, the social foundations of the USSR, cleansed of the
parasitic bureaucracy are capable of assuring unbounded economic and
cultural progress, while the capitalist foundations disclose no
possibilities except further decay.

What unmasks the noisy critics most of all is that they continued to
consider the USSR a workers’ state at a time when Stalin was destroying
the Bolshevik party; when he was strangling the proletarian revolution
in Spain; when he was betraying the world revolution in the name of
“People’s Fronts” and “collective security.” Under all these conditions
they recognized the necessity of defending the USSR as a workers’ state!
But no sooner did this same Stalin invade “democratic” Finland, no
sooner did bourgeois public opinion of the imperialist democracies –
which covered up and approved all Stalins’ crimes against the
communists, the workers and the peasants – raise a howl to the skies,
than our innovators immediately declared: “Yes, this is intolerable!”
And following Roosevelt they declared a moral embargo against the Soviet
Union.

Educated witch-doctor Burnham’s reasoning on the theme that by defending
the USSR we _thereby_ defend Hitler, is a neat little specimen of
petty-bourgeois fatheadedness which seeks to force contradictory reality
into the framework of a two-dimensional syllogism. By defending the
Soviet Republic after the Brest-Litovsk peace did the workers support
Hohenzollern? Yes or no? The programmatic theses of the Fourth
International on war which deal in detail with this question, establish
categorically that agreements between a soviet state and this or that
imperialist state do not place any restrictions upon the revolutionary
party of that state. The interests of the world revolution stand above
an isolated diplomatic combination, however justifiable the latter may
be in and of itself. By defending the USSR we struggle far more
seriously against Stalin, as well as Hitler, than do Burnham and Co.

It is true, Burnham and Shachtman do not stand alone. Leon Jouhaux, the
notorious agent of French capitalism, also waxes indignant over the fact
that the “Trotskyists defend the USSR.” Who should be indignant if not
he! But our attitude toward the USSR is the same as our attitude towards
the CGT (General Confederation of Labor) we defend it against the
bourgeoisie despite the fact that the Confederation is headed by
scoundrels like Leon Jouhaux who deceive and betray the workers at every
step. The Russian Mensheviks likewise are howling: “The Fourth
International is in a Blind Alley!” because the Fourth International
still continues to recognize the USSR as a workers’ state. These
gentlemen themselves are members of the Second International, which is
led by such eminent traitors as the typical bourgeois mayor Huysmans,
and Leon Blum, who betrayed an exceptionally favorable revolutionary
situation in June 1936 and thereby made possible the present war. The
Mensheviks recognize the parties of the Second International as
_workers’_ parties but refuse to recognize the Soviet Union as a
_workers’_ state on the ground that at its head stand bureaucratic
traitors. This falsehood reeks with brazenness and cynicism. Stalin,
Mobtoy, and the rest, as a social layer are no better and no worse than
the Blums, Jouhaux, Citrines, Thomases, etc. The difference between them
is only this, that Stalin and Co. exploit and cripple the viable
economic foundation of socialist development, while the Blums cling to
the thoroughly rotted foundation of capitalist society.

The workers’ state must be taken as it has emerged from the merciless
laboratory of history and not as it is imagined by a “socialist”
professor, reflectively exploring his nose with his finger. It is the
duty of revolutionists to defend every conquest of the working class
even though it may he distorted by the pressure of hostile forces. Those
who cannot defend old positions will never conquer new ones.

April 25, 1940



A LETTER TO JAMES P. CANNON [1]


 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

First Published: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENSE OF MARXISM, New York 1942.
Checked against: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENCE OF MARXISM, London 1966,
p.223.
All footnotes stem from the latter edition.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

May 28, 1940

Dear Comrades,

The resignation of Burnham [2] is an excellent confirmation of our
analysis and prognosis concerning the ex-Minority. We don’t believe that
it is the last separation.

W.R. [_Leon Trotsky_]

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. This letter was written by Trotsky in English.

2. Burnham’s letter proclaiming his open repudiation of socialism and at
the same time announcing his resignation from teh self-styled “Workers
Party” set up by the minority after their split in April 1940 is dated
May 21, 1940. The text, never made public by Burnham’s collaborators,
was printed in the August 1940 issue of FOURTH INTERNATIONAL and can be
found here. – _Ed._



A LETTER TO ALBERT GOLDMAN [1]


 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

First Published: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENSE OF MARXISM, New York 1942.
Checked against: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENCE OF MARXISM, London 1966,
p.224.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

June 5, 1940

Dear Friend,

Burnham doesn’t recognize dialectics but dialectics does not permit him
to escape from its net. He is caught as a fly in a web. The blow he gave
to Shachtman is irreparable. What a lesson on principled and
unprincipled blocs! And poor Abern. Four years ago, he found the
protector for his family clique in the person of Holy Father Muste and
his altar boy Spector; now he repeated the same experiment with the
secularized Catholic, Burnham and his attorney, Shachtman ... In the
good old days we waited, often for years and decades for a verification
of a prognosis. Now the tempo of events is so feverish that the
verification comes unexpectedly the next day. Poor Shachtman!

With best wishes,
LEON TROTSKY

Coyoacan, D.F.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. This letter was written by Trotsky in English.



ON THE “WORKERS” PARTY [1]


 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

First Published: Fourth International, Vol.1 No.5, October 1940; as part
of the article _Some Questions on American Problems_. Reprinted: Leon
Trotsky, IN DEFENSE OF MARXISM, New York 1942.
Checked against: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENCE OF MARXISM, London 1966,
p.224.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

QUESTION: _In your opinion were there enough political differences
between the majority and the minority to warrant a split?_

TROTSKY: Here it is also necessary to consider the question
dialectically, not mechanically. What does this terrible word
“dialectics” mean? It means to consider things in their development, not
in their static situation. If we take the political differences as they
are, we can say they were not sufficient for a split, but if they
developed a tendency to turn away from the proletariat in the direction
of petty-bourgeois circles, then the same differences can have an
absolutely different value; a different weight; if they are connected
with a different social group. This is a very important point.

We have the fact that the minority split away from us, in spite of all
the measures taken by the majority not to split. This signifies that
their inner social feeling was such that it is impossible for them to go
together with us. It is a petty-bourgeois tendency, not a proletarian.
If you wish a new confirmation of this, we have an excel lent example in
the article of Dwight Macdonald.

First of all, what characterizes a proletarian revolutionary? No one is
obliged to participate in a revolutionary party, but if he does
participate, he considers the party seriously. If we dare to call the
people for a revolutionary change of society, we carry a tremendous
responsibility, which we must consider very seriously. And what is our
theory, but merely the tools of our action? These tools are our Marxist
theory because up to today we have not found better tools. A worker is
not fantastic about tools – if they are the best tools he can get he is
careful with them; he does not abandon them or demand fantastic
non-existent tools.

Burnham is an intellectual snob. He picks up one party, aban dons it,
takes up another. A worker cannot do this. If he enters a revolutionary
party, addresses the people, calls them for action, it is the same as a
general during a war – he must know where he is leading them. What would
you think of a general who said he thought the guns were bad – that it
would be better to wait for ten years until they had invented better
guns, so everybody had better go home. That is the way Burnham reasons.
So he abandoned the party. But the unemployed remain, and the war
remains. These things cannot be postponed. Therefore it is only Burnham
who has postponed his action.

Dwight Macdonald is not a snob, but a bit stupid. I quote:

“The intellectual, if he is to serve any useful function in society,
must not deceive either himself or others, must not accept as good coin
what he knows is counterfeit, must not forget in a moment of crisis what
he has learned over a period of years and decades.”

Good. Absolutely correct. I quote again:

“Only if we meet the stormy and terrible years ahead with both
skepticism and devotion – skepticism towards all theories, governments
and social systems; devotion to the revolutionary fight of the masses –
only then can we justify ourselves as intellectuals.”

Here is one of the leaders of the so-called “Workers” Party, who
considers himself not a proletarian but an “intellectual.” He speaks of
skepticism toward all theories.

We have prepared ourselves for this crisis by studying, by building a
scientific method, and our method is Marxism. Then the crisis comes and
Mr. Macdonald says “be skeptical of all theories,” and then talks about
devotion to the revolution without replacing it with any new theory.
Unless it is this skeptical theory of his own. How can we work without a
theory? What is the fight of the masses and what is a revolutionary? The
whole article is scandalous and a party which can tolerate such a man as
one of its leaders is not serious.

I quote again:

“What is the nature of the beast (fascism), then? Trotsky insists it is
no more nor less than the familiar phenomenon of Bonapartism, in which a
clique maintains itself in power by playing one class off against
another, thus giving the State power a temporary autonomous character.
But these modern totalitarian regimes are not temporary affairs; they
have already changed the underlying economic and social structure, not
only manipulating the old forms but also destroying their inner
vitality. Is the Nazi bureaucracy a new ruling class, then, and fascism
a new form of society, comparable to capitalism? That doesn’t seem to be
true either.”

Here he creates a new theory, a new definition of fascism but he wishes,
nevertheless, that we should be skeptical toward all theories. So also
to the workers he would say that the instruments and tools they work
with are not important but they must have devotion to their work I think
the workers would find a very sharp expression for such a statement.

It is very characteristic of the disappointed intellectual. He sees the
war, the terrible epoch ahead, with losses, with sacrifices, and he is
afraid. He begins to propagate skepticism and still he believes it is
possible to unify skepticism with revolutionary devotion. We can only
develop a revolutionary devotion if we are sure it is rational and
possible, and we cannot have such assurances without a work ing theory.
He who propagates theoretical skepticism is a traitor.

We analyzed in fascism different elements:

1.  The element which fascism has in common with the old Bona partism is
    that it used the antagonisms of classes in order to give to the
    state power the greatest independence. But we have always underlined
    that the old Bonapartism was in a time of an ascending bourgeois
    society, while fascism is a state power of the declining bourgeois
    society.
2.  That fascism is an attempt of the bourgeois class to over come, to
    overstep, the contradiction between the new technique and private
    property without eliminating the private property. It is the
    “planned economy” of fascism. It is an attempt to save private prop
    erty and at the same time to check private property.
3.  To overstep the contradiction between the new, modern technique of
    productive forces within the limited borders of the national state.
    This new technique cannot be limited by the borders of the old
    national state and fascism attempts to overcome this contra diction.
    The result is the war. We have already analyzed all these elements.

Dwight Macdonald will abandon the party just as Burnham did, but
possibly because he is a little lazier, it will come later.

Burnham was considered “good stuff” at one time? Yes, the proletarian
party in our epoch must make use of every intellectual who can
contribute to the party. I spent many months on Diego Rivera, to save
him for our movement, but did not succeed. But every International has
had an experience of this kind. The First International had troubles
with the poet, Freiligrath, who was also very capricious. The Second and
Third Internationals had trouble with Maxim Gorki. The Fourth
International with Rivera. In every case they separated from us.

Burnham was, of course, closer to the movement, but Cannon bad his
doubts about him. He can write, and has some formal skill in thinking,
not deep, but adroit. He can accept your idea, develop it, write a fine
article about it – and then forget it. The author can forget – but the
worker cannot. However, so long as we can use such people, well and
good. Mussolini at one time was also “good stuff”!

Coyoacan, D.F.
August 7, 1940

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. This article was written by Trotsky in English.



A LETTER TO ALBERT GOLDMAN


------------------------------------------------------------------------

Written: 9 August 1940 in English.
First Published: FOURTH INTERNATIONAL, Vol.1 No.5, October 1940, p.126.
Reprinted: IN DEFENSE OF MARXISM, New York 1942.
Checked against: IN DEFENCE OF MARXISM, London 1966, pp.229-230.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

August 9, 1940
Albert Goldman

Dear Friend:

I don’t know whether you have seen Dwight Macdonald’s article in the
August issue of his PARTISAN REVIEW.

This man was a disciple of Burnham, the intellectual snob. After Burnham
deserted, Dwight Macdonald was left in Shachtman’s party as the lone
representative of “Science”.

On the question of fascism, Macdonald serves up a poor compilation of
plagiarisms from our arsenal which he represents as his own discoveries
and to which he opposes some banalities that he characterizes as our
ideas. The whole-without perspective, without proportion and without
elementary intellectual honesty.

However, this is not the worst. Burnham’s orphan proclaims: “We must
examine again with a cold and skeptical eye, the most basic premises of
Marxism.” (Page 266) And what must the poor “Workers Party” do during
this period of examination? What must the proletariat do? They should
wait of course, for the result of Dwight Macdonald’s study. This result
will probably be Macdonald’s desertion himself into the camp of Burnham.

The last four lines of the article can be nothing but preparation for
personal desertion. “Only if we meet the stormy and terrible years ahead
with both skepticism and devotion – skepticism towards all theories,
governments and social systems; devotion to the revolutionary fight of
the masses – only then can we justify ourselves as intellectuals.”

Revolutionary activity based upon theoretical skepticism is the most
awkward of inner contradictions. “Devotion to the revolutionary fight of
the masses” is impossible without theoretical understanding of the laws
of this revolutionary fight. Revolutionary devotion is possible only if
one gains the assurance that his devotion is reasonable, adequate; that
it corresponds to its aim. Such assurance can be created only by
theoretical insight into the class struggle. “ Skepticism towards all
theories” is nothing but preparation for personal desertion.

Shachtman remains silent; as “General Secretary” he is too busy to
defend the “most basic premises of Marxism” from petty bourgeois
philistines and snobs ...

Fraternally yours,
L. TROTSKY



A LETTER TO CHRIS ANDREWS [1]


 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

First Published: Extract from _Another Thought on Conscription_, FOURTH
INTERNATIONAL, Vol.1 No.5, October 1940. Reprinted: Leon Trotsky, IN
DEFENSE OF MARXISM, New York 1942.
Checked against: Leon Trotsky, IN DEFENCE OF MARXISM, London 1966,
p.223.
All footnotes stem from the latter edition.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

August 17, 1940

Dear Chris:

I very much enjoyed your appreciation of the anti-pacifist position
accepted by the party. There are two great advantages to this position:
first, it is revolutionary in its essence and based upon the whole
character of our epoch, when all questions will be decided not only by
arms of critics, but by critiques of arms; second, it is completely free
of sectarianism. We do not oppose to events and to the feelings of the
masses an abstract affirmation of our sanctity.

The poor LABOR ACTION of August 12th writes: “In his fight against
conscription we are with Lewis 100 per cent.” We are not with Lewis for
even a single per cent, because Lewis tries to defend the Capitalist
Fatherland with completely outdated means. The great majority of the
workers understand or feel that these means (professional voluntary
armament) are outdated from a military point of view and extremely
dangerous from a class point of view. That is why the workers are for
conscription. It is a very confused and contradictory form of adhering
to the “arming of the proletariat.” We do not flatly reject this great
historical change, as do the sectarians of all kinds. We say
“Conscription? Yes. But made by our selves.” It is an excellent point of
departure.

With best greetings, I am,
Fraternally,
YOUR OLD MAN [_Leon Trotsky_]

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. This letter was written by Trotsky in English.
